





Radio One, Inc.
















































MENU

 





 













SUGGESTED TOPICS








 

 


Subscribe



  Hi, 




Sign In
Register






Items added to cart

Your Shopping Cart is empty.
Visit our store




 









MY LIBRARY
TOPIC FEEDS
PURCHASES
ACTIVITY
ACCOUNT SETTINGS
EMAIL PREFERENCES
LOG OUT










SUGGESTED TOPICS





















HBR STORE
 > 
Case Studies
 > 
Finance & Accounting






Radio One, Inc.
case study
Richard S. RubackPauline Fischer


















 Save
 Share












8.95



 Save
 Share





Format
				




PDF
Hardcopy Black & White






Format


PDF
Hardcopy Black & White



Language

English
English
Spanish
Spanish









Add copyright permissions.
							Quantity discounts.



Number of Copyright Permissions









Language

English
Spanish



Quantity





Buying for your team?  





Add to cart
			












Description



Access to case studies expires six months after purchase date.



Publication Date: September 26, 2000

 Radio One (NYSE: ROIA and RIOAK), the largest radio group targeting African-Americans in the country, had the opportunity to acquire 12 urban stations in the top 50 markets from Clear Channel Communications, Inc. (NYSE: CCU) in the winter of 2000. The stations were being sold by Clear Channel Communications, Inc. to obtain Federal Communications Commission (FCC) approval for its acquisition of AMFM, Inc. (NYSE: AFM). Radio One was also negotiating the acquisition of nine stations in Charlotte, North Carolina, Augusta, Georgia, and Indianapolis, Indiana. The proposed acquisitions would double the size of Radio One. The case focuses on the strategic and financial evaluation of the proposed acquisitions.


Product #: 201025-PDF-ENG

Pages: 15


Related Topics:

Financial management
Mergers & acquisitions






How to Download



To download this product after your purchase, simply sign-in to hbr.org and visit the "Purchases" area of your account.




Education & Student Discounts




Educators: Register as a Premium Educator at 
					hbsp.harvard.edu
					, plan a course, and save your students up to 50% with your academic discount.
					

Students: Tell your instructors about the savings at 
					hbsp.harvard.edu.
					











Business Bookshelf
Summaries and excerpts of the latest books, special offers, and more from Harvard Business Review Press.





Sign up





Signed up









          Loading...     


    Customers Who Viewed This Item Also Viewed        Loading...      


                      


       1-4 copies  $8.95   5-10 copies  $8.75     11-49 copies  $8.50   50-499 copies  $8.25     500+  $8.00      Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.         1-4 copies  $8.95   5-10 copies  $8.75     11-49 copies  $8.50   50-499 copies  $8.25     500+  $8.00      Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.         1-4 copies  $8.95   5-10 copies  $8.75     11-49 copies  $8.50   50-499 copies  $8.25     500+  $8.00      Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.         1-4 copies  $8.95   5-10 copies  $8.75     11-49 copies  $8.50   50-499 copies  $8.25     500+  $8.00      Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.         1-9  $3.75   10-49  $3.50     50–499  $3.25   500+  $3.00    Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.         1-9  $4.50   10-49  $4.00     50–499  $3.50   500+  $3.00    Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.         1-9  $4.50   10-49  $4.00     50–499  $3.50   500+  $3.00    Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.         1-9  $9.50   10-49  $8.50     50–499  $7.50   500+  $7.00    Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.         1-9  list price   10-49  20% off list     50–99  30% off list   100-499  40% off list     500–999  45% off list   1000-2499  50% off list     2500+  55% off list      Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.         1-9  list price   10-49  20% off list     50-499  30% off list   500+  40% off list    Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.         1-9  list price   10-49  20% off list     50-499  30% off list   500+  40% off list    Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.         1-9  list price   10-49  20% off list     50-499  30% off list   500+  40% off list    Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.         1-9  list price   10-49  20% off list     50-499  30% off list   500+  40% off list    Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.         1-250  list price   251-500  10% off list     501-1000  20% off list   1001–2000  25% off list     2001+  30% off list      Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.         1-9  list price   10-49  10% off list     50-99  20% off list   100+  30% off list    Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.         1-9  list price   10-49  20% off list     50-499  30% off list   500+  40% off list    Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.         1-9  list price   10-49  20% off list     50-499  30% off list   500+  40% off list    Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order.      When you place your first order on HBR.org and enter your credit card information and shipping address, 'Speed-Pay' ordering is enabled. 'Speed-Pay' is a service that saves the credit card details from your most recent purchase and allows you to re-use that card for future purchases. If you click the Speed-Pay button on any product detail page, your order will be charged to the most recent credit card information attached to your account and shipped (if applicable) to the last address we have on file for you. For more details   Educators: Register as a Premium Educator at hbsp.harvard.edu, plan a course, and save your students up to 50% with your academic discount.   Students: Tell your instructors about the savings at hbsp.harvard.edu.   _____________________     1-4  $8.95 each   5-10  $8.75 each     11-49  $8.50 each   50-499  $8.25 each     500+  $8.00 each     Note: Quantity pricing discounts will be reflected at Checkout, prior to submitting your order. If you need to make additional copies to distribute, please purchase copyright permission.      Ebook: A digital book provided in three formats (PDF, ePub, and Mobi) for the price of one.  Accessible within “My Library” upon purchase. Hardcopy, paperback, softbound, magazine: Physical copy shipped from our warehouse to your requested shipping location. PDF: PDF digital file. Accessible within “My Library” upon purchase. Bundle: A themed collection containing two or more items at a special savings. Note: Some of our products are available in other languages besides English, for example a “Spanish PDF” format means you will receive a PDF in the Spanish language.    A security code is added protection against credit card fraud. It is a 3 or 4 digit number appearing on the front or back of your credit card. See examples below.  Visa and Mastercard The security code has 3 digits and appears on the BACK of the card in the signature panel. American Express  The Card Identification Number (CID/4DBC) is a four-digit, non-embossed (flat) number that is printed on every American Express Card. The CID/4DBC is ALWAYS located ABOVE the embossed (raised) account number on the face of the card. In some instances, the CID/4DBC is located on the left side of the card, but is always above the account number. Some cards have a four-digit number embossed below the account number, but this is not the CID/4DBC   If you have a promotion code, please enter it below. This promotion code field is case sensitive so please type all capital letters.     This product is intended for individual use only. To learn more about volume discounts for organizations and license opportunities for consultants, contact Lindsey.Dietrich@harvardbusiness.org.      Unable to locate your subscription account #? Click here 






  














 

Motorola Two Way Radio Dealer Orlando Florida Radio One














 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 






















Call Us Toll Free 800-771-9191







 





















The MOTOTRBO Experts
The experienced staff at Radio One are the MOTOTRBO Experts. We can install and manage your digital two way radio system with GPS and data applications. Find out more Click here.





Motorola SL300
The MOTOTRBO SL300 provides reliable push-to-talk communication for the mobile, everyday user in an ultra-slim and rugged profile. Learn More.





Motorola Two-way Radios
Radio One sells and services the complete line of Motorola professional two-way radios. Please click here more information.





Two-way Radio Rentals
Radio One have the largest two-way radio rental inventory in the country. Find out more and Get a Quote Today.





WAVE 3000
WAVE 3000 delivers instant and secure broadband push-to-talk (PTT) communications for small to medium businesses. Learn more.





Motorola Two-way Radio Repair
We are an authorized Service Specialist. We have our own factory trained staff of experienced service professionals who are totally committed to keeping your system performing at peak efficiency. Please click here more information.











Learn More

Radio One Is A Leading Motorola Solutions Channel Partner
RADIO ONE is one of the largest Motorola Solutions Channel Partners in the United States. We provide communications solutions, FCC licensing assistance and rentals of communications systems to enterprise and government customers. 

Learn More






Radio One Wins Motorola Solutions Award
Radio One Awarded the Motorola Solutions Empower Circle Partner Recognition
We are pleased to announce that for the fifth year in a row Radio One was awarded the Motorola Empower Circle Partner recognition. The Motorola Solutions Empower Cirlce recognizes the top 50 Motorola Solutions partners worldwide. Motorola Solutions Vice Presidents Jack Molloy, Scott Adler, John Kedzierski, Scott Montana, Massimo Sangiovanni, and Jason Winkler joined all the Empower Circle winners in Cancun, Mexico to celebrate this achievement. Radio One thanks all our customers for the confidence you place in Radio One and Motorola Solutions for your radio communications needs. 
Click here to read the latest news.




MOTOTRBO Apps – Visit Our Apps Store »







Teldio

Teldio delivers solutions targeted at improving worker efficiency, employee safety & cost reduction for enterprise customers.








Genesis

GW3-TRBO connects as a fully integrated peer on IP Site Connect or Capacity Plus MOTOTRBO networks, and through the XRT9000 Gateway








DApage

Optimized for work ticket system integration connecting Motorola MOTOTRBO™ two way digital radios to your work ticket order system.








SynergyMMS

SynergyMMS is the maintenance management solution preferred by several of the world’s largest hotel companies.









TwistedPair

WAVE bt TwistedPair is the only technology capable of delivering a complete IP dispatch application for MOTOTRBO radios.








HotSOS

With HotSOS and MOTOTRBO digital two-way radios, you can make certain that your guests' experiences are exceptional.








Hotel Expert

HotelEXPERT does an extensive job tracking labor, parts and service recovery costs on a service order in the hospitality industry.








TurboVUi™ Dispatch

CTI Products offers a console-type solution for applications requiring connection to many MOTOTRBO digital radios









Industry Solutions – View All Industry Solutions »






Education Solutions





Transportation Solutions





Hospitality Solutions





Manufacturing Solutions






Retail Solutions





Fire and EMS Solutions





HealthcareSolutions





Utilities Solutions





 





 MOTOROLA, MOTO, MOTOROLA SOLUTIONS and the Stylized M Logo are trademarks or registered trademarks of Motorola Trademark Holdings, LLC and are used under license. All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. ©  Motorola Solutions, Inc. All rights reserved.















 


Motorola Portable Two-way Radios Radio One Florida Nevada Texas
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
























Call Us Toll Free 800-771-9191

























Portable Radios





Our Products



Contact Radio One
 Request a Quote


Current Promotions



Government Grants



MOTOTRBO Selector Guide



Download Our MOTOTRBO Catalog



Radios Vs Cell Phones







Portable radios make dedicated two-way communications faster, clearer, and easier to use for users on
the move. These practical radios can easily help increase productivity by keeping users communicating, while allowing them to concentrate on the job at hand.
Motorola Professional Digital Portable Radios

Industry/Government Radios
The next-generation professional two-way radio communications solution is here. MOTOTRBO is the first digital two-way radio system from Motorola specifically designed to meet the requirements of professional organizations that need a customizable business critical communication solution using licensed spectrum.

Motorola CP200d
Motorola SL300
Motorola SL 7550e
Motorola SL 7580e
Motorola SL 7590e
Motorola XPR 3300e
Motorola XPR 3500e
Motorola XPR 7350e
Motorola XPR 7380e
Motorola XPR 7550e
Motorola XPR 7580e

MOTOTRBO Portable Radios


Motorola Commercial Portable Radios

Business Radios


Motorola BPR40
Motorola CP185
Motorola DTR650 
Motorola VL50

Motorola Commercial Portable Radios


Discontinued Motorola Two Way Radios
These products may no longer be manufactured or available for sale, but here you’ll find information on how to upgrade, replace or repair your product. 
Discontinued Motorola Two Way Radios












 MOTOROLA, MOTO, MOTOROLA SOLUTIONS and the Stylized M Logo are trademarks or registered trademarks of Motorola Trademark Holdings, LLC and are used under license. All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. ©  Motorola Solutions, Inc. All rights reserved.














 


Radio One Rental Offices Florida California Texas Nevada Northern Virginia
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
























Call Us Toll Free 800-771-9191







 















Two Way Radio Rental Locations





Two-way Radio Rentals



Rent a Two-way Radio Today
 Rental Request


Current Promotions



Government Grants



Download Our MOTOTRBO Catalog







Radio One has regional two-way radio rental locations in the following cities.

Orlando, Florida
Radio One (Corporate Office)
            	7041 Grand National Dr. Ste. 116 
            	Orlando, FL 32819 
Phone: 407-352-9242
Contact the Orlando office.


Anahelm, California
Radio One (Rental Office)
2238 N. Glassell Street, Suite A 
Orange, CA 92865-2742 
Phone: 714-453-9062
Contact the Ananheim office.


Chantilly, Virginia
Radio One (Rental Office)
            	  14113 Robert Paris Court, Suite 103
           	    Chantilly, VA 20151-4200
Phone: 202-800-8510
Contact the Chantilly office.


Dallas, Texas
Radio One (Rental Office)
           	    1701 W. Northwest Hwy., Suite 100 
           	    Grapevine, TX 76051 
Phone: 214-427-4495            	
Contact the Dallas office.


Las Vegas, Nevada
Radio One (Rental Office)
           	    Address:  5940 S Rainbow Blvd
Las Vegas, NV 89118 
Phone: 702-835-9257
Contact the Las Vegas office.


 
 









 MOTOROLA, MOTO, MOTOROLA SOLUTIONS and the Stylized M Logo are trademarks or registered trademarks of Motorola Trademark Holdings, LLC and are used under license. All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. ©  Motorola Solutions, Inc. All rights reserved.













 


Wireless Communications Solutions for Law Enforcement Radio One
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
























Call Us Toll Free 800-771-9191







 
















Law Enforcement Solutions






Industry Solutions



Contact Radio One
 Request a Quote


Current Promotions



Government Grants



Download Our MOTOTRBO Catalog








Radio One provides Motorola Solutions two-way radio accessories to police departments throughout the State of Florida and nationwide.
Make Law Enforcement Data Work For You
Connecting Police Officers To The Communities They Serve…
Safer cities are thriving cities. Statistics indicate that a dollar invested in public safety returns $5 in economic growth. On the flip side, they suggest that a homicide can cause 70 citizens to move away. Every time technology helps prevent a crime, it profoundly improves community relations and police safety.
Community-based data also help law enforcement organizations better connect with the citizens they protect. Police receive information from remote sensors, text messages, and posts on social media like Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, and YouTube. Another source is video citizens send from their cell phones, as well as video from street and parking lot cameras operated by businesses and municipal organizations.
The challenge, of course, is how to aggregate and analyze all these data streams, turning them into intelligence that command centers can immediately send to officers on the street and use later for post-incident analysis.
…And Helping Them Focus On Their Mission
Even as public safety networks are becoming more complex, advanced intelligent solutions are simplifying data management across multiple agencies that operate in multiple jurisdictions in our communities. Network operators have visibility and control across unified communication networks, applications, and fleets of devices. This can lead to insights and investigative leads that can solve crimes.
Network complexity also creates security challenges. Ransomware viruses infect computers and demand ransoms to unlock data. And that is just one example. The reality is that cyber criminals create more than 60 million malware programs every year, and law enforcement agencies must protect themselves from all of them.
As police agencies rely more on technology to protect communities and first responders, many are turning to Motorola Solutions to help plan, deploy, protect, and manage their systems. Partnering with a trusted leader gives forces confidence to focus less on their technology and more on their mission.
Implementing A Body-Worn Camera Program: Finding The Right Focus For Your Agency
Body-worn cameras are quickly becoming a predominant tool for digital evidence capture to protect officers and the citizens they serve. Body-worn cameras record the content that agencies need to build transparency and accountability with the public. Because they openly document events, body-worn cameras can elevate service while they deepen community trust. At the same time, they can help your agency enhance training, improve officer safety and implement best practices.
Components
APX Radios For Reliable EMS Lifelines
When you’re responding to an emergency call, your radio is your patient’s lifeline to life-saving treatment. It’s also your lifeline to safety and security. That’s why in emergency medicine every two-way radio conversation is crucial. Motorola APX™ portable radios provide leading-edge noise suppression technology, so that every responder can be sure that his or her calls will be clear and understandable even under chaotic, noisy conditions. APX radios are ergonomically designed to be easy to use even in difficult environments. They’re also ruggedized to withstand the hazards of field use, from drops to excessive heat or cold to immersion in water. APX radios also enable EMS to utilize voice and data, and offer interoperability for communications with agencies in other communities and jurisdictions.
Motorola APX™ P25 Radios
Redefining Body-Worn Camera Systems
The Unified, Simplified, Smart Digital Evidence Management Solution
Powered by the Si Series & CommandCentral Vault
Motorola’s Digital Evidence Management Solution is comprised of the Si Series Video Speaker Microphone and CommandCentral Vault Digital Evidence Management Software. Combined, they provide a unified, simplified, smart approach to capturing, storing, managing and sharing multimedia content for greater public transparency and accountability.
Si500 Video Speaker Microphone
The Si500 Video Speaker Microphone (VSM) dramatically increases situational awareness, information gathering and evidence collection in the field. Part of the revolutionary Si Series, it delivers all the mission-critical capabilities first responders, commanders and investigators want in one exceptionally smart collaborative device.
Motorola Body-Worn Cameras
Motorola CommandCentral Vault
Capturing Video Is Not Hard, Managing It Shouldn't Be Either
What you do with video evidence after capturing it is what can make the difference in addressing accountability concerns with the public and protecting officers and citizens alike. Take an innovative approach to content management with a complete workflow to store, manage and share your body-worn video from CommandCentral Vault.
CommandCentral Vault
LEX L10 Mission Critical LTE Device
The LTE Handheld For Law Enforcement
The LEX L10 is a mission-critical handheld device that, unlike consumer-grade smartphones, addresses the unique needs of law enforcement. With a customizable, role-based user interface, it intelligently aggregates and prioritizes data, presenting only critical information based on the user’s current status or activity. Designed for the streets, the LEX L10 features dual 1-Watt front-facing speakers for optimized audio performance, a Gorilla Glass display, and a textured push-to-talk button.
Motorola  LTE User Devices
Dispatch Consoles
Mobilize And Inform When And Where It's Needed Most
As the world continues to become more connected, the expectation for instant coordination and a seamless flow of information is increasing. Empower your dispatchers to coordinate faster and provide the intelligence necessary to support those in field and the community they serve.
Motorola P25 Dispatch Consoles
WAVE Work Group Communications
Simple, Interoperable Communications
WAVE provides a communications architecture that eliminates barriers between different radio and broadband communications networks. Police, fire, EMS, and any other work partners can all communicate over PTT with WAVE, no matter what radio or broadband device they use. Add neighboring communities to your system for interoperable communications across borders, eliminating the need for multiple radios and facilitating better real-time coordination.
Smart Data For Smarter Operations
WAVE’s optional real-time location tracking gives you greater visibility to your entire operation. Supervisors and command staff see an improved real-time view of resources for increased situational awareness and better decisions. Integrated messaging provides a way to minimize radio traffic and provide quick reference information in loud or discrete environments. The result is faster and more coordinated responses, smarter decisions and safer outcomes.
WAVE Work Group Communications
Downloads
Application Briefs/Fact Sheets

APX Series Audio Quality
Motorola Raises the Bar on P25 Two-Way Radio Security 
MOTOTRBO™ HAZLOC Certification

Brochures and Spec Sheets

Motorola Law Enforcement-at-a-Glance Brochure
Motorola APX™ Portable Radios: Safety Refined
Motorola  APX ™ Project 25 Radio Accessories
IMPRES™ Smart Energy Batteries
How Technology is Transforming the Golden Hour
Motorola and TRX Systems Indoor Location


WAVE Work Group Communications

WAVE OnCloud Brochure
WAVE OnCloud Data Sheet
WAVE Connections Data Sheet
WAVE Mobile Communicator
WAVE 3000 Data Sheet
WAVE 5000 Data Sheet


Case Studies

First Responders Stay Connected with APX™ 7000 P25 Multiband Radios
One Radio. Multiple Bands. Instant Interoperability.

Videos

Please click here to see MOTOTRBO Videos

White Papers

When it Comes to Your Safety, We Go to the Extreme.









 MOTOROLA, MOTO, MOTOROLA SOLUTIONS and the Stylized M Logo are trademarks or registered trademarks of Motorola Trademark Holdings, LLC and are used under license. All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. ©  Motorola Solutions, Inc. All rights reserved.













 


Wireless communications solutions for the healthcare industry Radio One
















 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
























Call Us Toll Free 800-771-9191







 
















Healthcare Solutions






Industry Solutions



Contact Radio One
 Request a Quote


Current Promotions



Government Grants



Download Our MOTOTRBO Catalog








Radio One provides two-way radio and wireless communication solutions to the healthcare industry in Florida and nationwide. Extend mobility to the point of care and beyond with solutions that combine Motorola's world-class mobility products and healthcare software applications from our partners. Our healthcare solutions allow you to share real-time information anywhere, inside or outside the facility, for increased patient safety and more attentive care.
When Healthcare Facilities Are Safe And Efficient, Staff Can Excel
Create an environment that is safe and secure, where staff can perform at their best. Manage incidents and emergencies, and prevent security breaches from happening.  
Provide a high-quality experience for patients and visitors with well-run facilities. Real-time communications can strengthen safety, elevate service and improve overall efficiency.
MOTOTRBO™: The Heart Of Real-Time Communication And Response
Learn how Indiana University Health North Central Region connected their network of hospitals and staff with clear communications that are "always available." They’re at the forefront of preparedness using a reliable communication system that scales across its entire network and can continually adapt new features. MOTOTRBO helps them become safer, more secure, and more efficient.
“If a tornado knocks power out, the radios still work. Phones and Internet connections may go down, but our MOTOTRBO radios will not.”
Junior Ochoa, Security Officer, IU Health North Central Region
Read the Healthcare Case Study
Exceptional Capacity And Extended Coverage From Next-Gen MOTOTRBO
The backbone of integrated healthcare communications is the MOTOTRBO digital platform. This flexible and adaptable solution includes digital two-way radios, accessories, applications, systems and support services. MOTOTRBO connects staff and equipment together to provide clear, secure and discreet communications. And it is HIPAA-compliant to protect the confidentiality of patient data.
Next-generation MOTOTRBO radios are helping healthcare facilities establish a safer, more productive environment. They deliver expanded capacity, extended coverage and enhanced controls for reliable communications across single or multiple locations. Plus, these leading-edge devices provide even more game-changing advantages, including business-essential systems, applications and accessories. 
Many Users. Different Devices. Multiple Locations.
Optimized to work together, while meeting the unique needs of every user. One unified voice providing peace of mind. Think of MOTOTRBO as collaboration transformed.
Learn more about MOTOTRBO for Healthcare
20 Reasons Next-Gen MOTOTRBO™ Has Transformed Expectations
You'll see the difference immediately. From reception to maintenance, in the emergency room or at an off-site location, here's 20 ways Motorola is helping healthcare providers work more safely and efficiently in the most demanding environments and challenging situations.
Experience outstanding audio clarity, double the capacity, twice the battery life and superior coverage. Next-generation MOTOTRBO empowers your team with text messaging, text to speech, integrated GPS, Bluetooth® 4.0, increased data capabilities, location tracking and more.
Download the MOTOTRBO Infographic
Connect Anyone, On Any Device, Anywhere
Leverage the resources you already have to communicate with personnel on their own devices. WAVE securely extends your radio’s reach to those who may not carry radios. Now the director away from the hospital or the head of security at an out-of-town convention can talk on their smartphones with radio users at your facility.
WAVE connects virtually any device – smart-phones, tablets, laptops, landlines and more – on any public or private mobile data network, including Wi-Fi. You get seamless and secure connectivity, the responsiveness of push-to-talk communications, and the freedom to keep service plans and devices.
Learn more about WAVE Workgroup Communications
Integrated Healthcare Communications The Heart Of Real-Time Collaboration And Response
We understand your challenges and innovate advanced technology for healthcare. Our integrated solutions can help you improve everyday and emergency communications and enhance external collaboration with other providers and public safety. Motorola is at the forefront of developing secure, reliable, resilient technology that transforms healthcare.
Unlike other wireless systems, digital two-way radio means you aren’t dependent on an external network or commercial carrier for a real-time flow of information. When a crisis occurs, you’ll have private, “always-available” communications to streamline collaboration and speed response.
Connect Without Boundaries
Move beyond network, device, and geographic boundaries.
How do you make communicating as easy as if your team was standing next to each other?
Whether you’re in the office, on site, or at a conference hundreds of miles away, with Motorola’s Team Communications solution your team is always just a “push” away.
Your workers can use the devices they already own – whether it’s smartphones, radios, tablets, computers or telephones – or you can equip them with ones that are right for their responsibilities and workplace. They’ll have access to real-time information and the colleagues they need to get the job done right. And you leverage the devices and infrastructure you already have in place.
One platform. One provider. All your communications equipment. Connect all teams instantly, from any network or device, and with added intelligence with Team Communications from Motorola Solutions.

Radios
Smartphones
Telephones
Computers
Internet of Things

Using Unified Workgroup Communications, network, device, and geographic boundaries are overcome – your team members can connect from their preferred device to other team members, anywhere, anytime with business-critical information.
Learn about Motorola Team Communications
Components
MOTOTRBO
From reception to maintenance, in the emergency room or at an off-site location, Motorola is
helping healthcare providers work more safely and efficiently in the most demanding environments and challenging situations. Healthcare providers around the world are transforming their workplace with the renowned MOTOTRBO digital platform and expertly integrated systems, applications, accessories and services. MOTOTRBO connects different people, departments and equipment to keep operations running smoothly, prevent crises from happening, and manage them swiftly and effectively when they do.

DMR (MOTOTRBO) Radios
The MOTOTRBO two-way radio portfolio offers you a wide choice of devices, from simple voice-only models to feature-rich voice and data radios. All work together seamlessly to deliver advanced features to enhance your safety, productivity and efficiency.
DMR (MOTOTRBO) Radios


MOTOTRBO Systems

No matter how large or small your enterprise, MOTOTRBO offers a wide range of systems specifically designed for your business – for the days ahead and the years beyond. You get the best of two-way radio with digital technology and enjoy integrated voice and data communication, increased capacity, enhanced features and exceptional voice quality, across the city and around the globe.
MOTOTRBO Systems


MOTOTRBO Applications

Benefit from solutions designed to fit your needs and strategies to be more productive, more efficient and more effective. Find the application to meet your specific needs and take your communications to the next level.
A few examples include:
Dispatch scans the GPS-enabled console to see where security staff are and repositions them via text messages. All communications are encrypted to comply with HIPAA regulations.
With the Work Order Ticketing application their radio, a hospital manager can assign tasks to staff members. At the end of the shift, they can review performance and take action if needed.
MOTOTRBO Applications


MOTOTRBO Accessories

MOTOTRBO radios are already best in class, but to help you work at your best, you need enhancements targeted to your specific workplace. Motorola developed a line of accessories with unique features designed to optimize the performance of your radio in your work environment, unleashing the full power of the industry’s most advanced digital radio platform. From discreet Bluetooth earpieces to efficient battery solutions, Motorola’s complete portfolio of accessories optimizes the performance of your MOTOTRBO radio. They are designed to help you perform your best, wherever you work, and unleash the power of the industry’s most advanced digital radio platform.
MOTOTRBO Accessories


WAVE OnCloud
WAVE OnCloud is a Push-to-Talk (PTT) service that connects phones, computers and radios together — all while making the most of your existing resources, systems and investments. Because it lives in the cloud, WAVE OnCloud is inherently cost-effective.

WAVE Workgroup Communications


MAKE SAFETY AND SECURITY A PRIORITY
There’s never been a better time to bring Unified Communications to your healthcare facility. Have one of our representatives contact you for a complimentary analysis of your communications needs.
Contact Us
Downloads
Application Briefs/Fact Sheets

MOTOTRBO™ HAZLOC Certification
MOTOTRBO Text Messaging: Share Information Quickly, Discreetly and Safely

Brochures and Spec Sheets

Motorola Solutions Healthcare Vertical Brochure
MOTOTRBO

MOTOTRBO Systems At a Glance
MOTOTRBO Two-Way Radios At a Glance
MOTOTRBO Two-Way Radio Solutions At A Glance

MOTOTRBO Accessories

MOTOTRBO Professional Series Radio Accessories 
MOTOTRBO™ Commercial Radio Accessories


WAVE Work Group Communications

WAVE OnCloud Brochure
WAVE OnCloud Data Sheet
WAVE Connections Data Sheet
WAVE Mobile Communicator
WAVE 3000 Data Sheet
WAVE 5000 Data Sheet


Case Studies

Greenville Hospital System University Medical Center Increases Security with MOTOTRBO™
Indiana Hospitals Stay Ahead Of Threats With Leading-Edge Communications

Presentations

Radios Vs Cell Phones
Where Cell Phones Fall Short, Digital Radios Keep You Going

Videos

Please click here to see MOTOTRBO Videos

White Papers

Business-Critical communications: Benefits of Selecting Two-Way Radios over Cell Phones
Improving Hospital Security with Two-Way Radios White Paper

MOTOTRBO 

MOTOTRBO™ Bluetooth® Audio & Data
Next Generation MOTOTRBO™ Delivers Industry-Leading Audio

Team Communications

Top Six Priorities for Team Communications White Paper


WAVE Work Group Communications

Wave Broadband PTT New Voice of Enterprise White Paper










 MOTOROLA, MOTO, MOTOROLA SOLUTIONS and the Stylized M Logo are trademarks or registered trademarks of Motorola Trademark Holdings, LLC and are used under license. All other trademarks are the property of their respective owners. ©  Motorola Solutions, Inc. All rights reserved.















Radio One, Inc ..:: Kelrad.com ::.. LTR, Two Way Radio, Conventional, Trunking, Public Safety



















































































































 Home  About Us  Go Digital  Georgia Dispatch  Service and Repair  FAQ  Contact Us 
 Commercial Radio  Public Safety  Radio Rentals  Consoles & Specialty  Site Map 
























©Kelrad/Radio One, Inc.  All Rights Reserved4405 International Blvd, Norcross, GA 30093   678-218-9900 (v)   678-218-9903 (f)   email 








Radio One, Inc. is a fully licensed and insured 2-way radio shop located in Atlanta, Georgia. Radio One is an authorized dealer of Kenwood, EF Johnson, Icom, Tait, Hyt, Zetron, Vega-Telex and more. Radio One's customers range in size from small three mobile fleets to large, city-wide police forces. Two-way radios, conventional radios, digital radios, trunking systems, paging systems, public safety systems, system requirements ... Radio One is experienced in all aspects of sales, installation and maintenance.

The Radio One business model is simple: combining great customer service, a knowledable, caring sales force, highly trained, first-rate technicians with affordable, high quality products equals both a happy customer and a satisfying consumer experience.







Radio One, Inc.                                                                                                          - Miami                                             , FL         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



FL



Miami



Radio Broadcasting Stations



Radio Broadcasting Stations



                            Radio One, Inc.
                                    



 





















R 


Radio One, Inc.                                                                                                         
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



2828 W FLAGLER ST MIAMI, FL 33135
Get Directions



(305) 644-0800
www.radio-one.com                                                                                       





Business Info



 Founded --
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue --
 Employee Count 20
 Industries Radio Broadcasting Stations
 Contacts Kervin Clenante                                                                                                         







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message










VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







R

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

























 









Urban One - Representing Black America


































































































































 



You seem to have Javascript disabled. This website needs javascript in order to function properly!        


























 







 


[sta_anchor id=”brands”]


OUR BRANDS































 
Urban
is the New
Mainstream.


 OUR REACH







Million Unique Visitors








Million App Streams








% of Black America Reached








Million Video Streams


 IN THE MEDIA







%


91% of Blacks believe advertising on black media is more relevant.



%


Blacks spend almost 30% more time watching videos on the Internet than the general population.



%


Blacks watch TV 42% more than the general population.



%


70% of Blacks continue to connect to urban radio.


 
We are
One of a
Kind.


 SOCIAL MEDIA#urban1


@ VIEW ON INSTAGRAM












 


























































Radio One Inc - NASDAQ:ROIAK - Stock Quote & News - TheStreet






















 





















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street













































 






















Radio One Inc (ROIAK)
Follow




                                    2.00
                                

0.00
(0.00)




                        NASDAQ : Services
                    

Jul 24, 2017 1:51 PM EDT












Prev Close
  2.00


Open
2.00


Day Low/High

                                    2.00 /
                                    2.04


52 Wk Low/High

                                    1.75 /
                                    3.50
                                


Volume
3.75K


Avg Volume 
72.40K











Exchange
NASDAQ


Shares Outstanding
48.33M


Market Cap
159.48M


P/E Ratio

                                        
                                            N/A
                                        
                                    


Div & Yield

                                        
                                            N.A. (N.A)
                                        
                                    























Trade with Jim Cramer 14 Days FREE 









Latest News




IONE Digital Launches The Provocative 'CASSIUS' Urban Millennial Lifestyle Platform And Calls Out Culture Vultures






Radio One Chief Administration Officer To Step Down At End Of Year













Radio One, Inc. First Quarter 2017 Results Conference Call


Apr 17, 2017 7:00 PM EDT









Radio One, Inc. 2016 Year End Results Conference Call


Feb 23, 2017 2:35 PM EST













Some Divine Investing Ideas From Apollo Global Management
APO's 13F filing shows the firm is skeptical about valuation and price, but here are my takeaways.

Feb 17, 2017 11:00 AM EST









IOne Digital Launches REVOLUTION, A Virtual Reality Experience
iOne Digital releases powerful VR capability for their millennial and urban audiences

Feb 8, 2017 3:41 PM EST









Interactive One Taps Marielle Bobo, Formerly Of Ebony Magazine, As Executive Director Of Style And Special Projects
Bobo will lead fashion, beauty and creative direction at Interactive One

Feb 3, 2017 7:00 AM EST













TV One Announces Blockbuster Drama "EMPIRE" Coming To Its Programming Line-up This Summer
On Wednesday, April 13, the eve of TV One's Annual Upfront Presentation, President Brad Siegel announced the acquisition of blockbuster drama EMPIRE.

Apr 14, 2016 9:49 AM EDT













Denise Boutte As Tamara Johnson In TV One's Original Thriller "Second Sight." Photo Credit: Matt Harbicht
Starring as a young teacher plagued with visions, Tatyana Ali ( Zoe Ever After, Love That Girl!, The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air) returns to TV One in the new made-for-television movie Second Sight .

Apr 7, 2016 4:17 PM EDT













CNN And TV ONE To Host Democratic Presidential Town Hall On March 13
CNN will partner with TV ONE to host the "CNN-TV ONE Ohio Democratic Presidential Town Hall" on Sunday, March 13 from 8-10 p.

Mar 10, 2016 3:31 PM EST













A Sneak Peek At TV One's New Brand Promise To REPRESENT The Best Of Black Culture And Entertainment - Past, Present And Future. (Courtesy Credit: TV One)
Building on a strong legacy, TV One, the network dedicated to Black viewers, is introducing a new brand promise to REPRESENT the best of Black culture and entertainment - past, present and future.

Feb 3, 2016 3:43 PM EST













TV One's Change Agents: History In The Making "Becoming The Change: Tyree Guyton" By Alton Glass (Courtesy: TV One)
In celebration of Black History Month, TV One is debuting Change Agents: History in the Making , 21 short films produced by four award-winning content creators, airing every weeknight throughout February.

Jan 28, 2016 6:17 PM EST













TV One's New Docu-series "Rickey Smiley For Real" Premieres On Tuesday, Nov. 10 At 8 P.m. ET. (Graphic: Business Wire)
Nationally syndicated radio personality, host and stand-up comedian Rickey Smiley returns to TV One with the premiere of his new docu-series Rickey Smiley For Real on Tuesday, Nov.

Oct 27, 2015 5:35 PM EDT









Where the Money Was Made the Last 5 Years
Only one fund category (of 20) has beaten the S&P 500 over half a decade.

Jun 3, 2015 11:30 AM EDT













3 Stocks Pushing The Media Industry Lower
TheStreet highlights 3 stocks pushing the Media industry lower today.

Nov 4, 2014 3:33 PM EST













4 Stocks Under $10 to Trade for Breakouts
These under-$10 stocks are within range of triggering breakout trades.

Oct 1, 2014 7:00 AM EDT









Ratings Changes Today
Upgrades: ALTV, ANCB, ASBB, CONN, DANG, DJCO, ERB, GHL, GIFI, IESC, LOGI, REED, SFLY, TASR, TCRD, TRAK 
    
Downgrades: GEF, GEF.B, ROIAK, SPAN, TOF 
    
Initiations: BBLU, DSS, FNJN 
    
Read on to get TheStreet Quant Ratings' detailed report:

Sep 2, 2014 11:00 AM EDT













Radio One is Now Oversold (ROIAK)
Legendary investor Warren Buffett advises to be fearful when others are greedy, and be greedy when others are fearful. One way we can try to measure the level of fear in a given stock is through a technical analysis indicator called the Relative Strength Index, or RSI, which measures momentum on a scale of zero to 100.

Aug 4, 2014 12:18 PM EDT













Short Interest In Radio One Expands By 16.6%
The most recent short interest data has been released by the NASDAQ for the 07/15/2014 settlement date, which shows a 527,812 share increase in total short interest for Radio One Inc , to 3,713,161, an increase of 16.57% since 06/30/2014. Total short interest is just one way to look at short data; another metric that we here at Dividend Channel find particularly useful is the "days to cover" metric because it considers both the total shares short and the average daily volume of shares traded.

Jul 25, 2014 3:49 PM EDT









Ratings Changes Today
Upgrades:  ROIAK 
    
Downgrades: MTG, RCII, SCVL   
    
Initiations: None
    
Read on to get TheStreet Quant Ratings' detailed report:

Jul 16, 2014 11:00 AM EDT













Radio One Inc Stock Downgraded (ROIAK)
Radio One (Nasdaq:ROIAK) has been downgraded by TheStreet Ratings from from a hold to sell.

May 12, 2014 11:17 AM EDT









Ratings Changes Today
    
    
    
Upgrades:  APA, DIOD, HALL, HCN, HGT, HMPR, LABC, POZN, VLCCF, WGL  
    
Downgrades:  BBOX, CIB, DNKN, DSCO, EBS, ECPG, ERII, EVC, FLY, HILL, JAZZ, LBTYA, LBTYB, NSEC, PCO, PHG, PHMD, PRO, ROIA, ROIAK, SINA, SP, SUNE, VIV  
    
Initiations:  AFH, APAM, LMCA, LMCB 
    
Read on to get TheStreet Quant Ratings' detailed report:
    


May 9, 2014 11:00 AM EDT













Why Radio One (ROIAK) Stock Is Down On Thursday
Radio One (ROIAK) stock is lower today after the company reported a net loss for the 2014 first quarter.

May 8, 2014 11:51 AM EDT













Radio One Enters Oversold Territory (ROIAK)
Legendary investor Warren Buffett advises to be fearful when others are greedy, and be greedy when others are fearful. One way we can try to measure the level of fear in a given stock is through a technical analysis indicator called the Relative Strength Index, or RSI, which measures momentum on a scale of zero to 100.

Apr 8, 2014 11:58 AM EDT









Next Bounce Could See Fewer Buyers
A stalled recovery wave could print a lower high, sending the market into a correction that lasts several months.

Jan 28, 2014 6:38 PM EST













4 Stocks Under $10 Making Big Moves
When a stock makes a large-percentage move, it is often just the start of a new major trend -- a trend that can lead to huge profits.

Sep 25, 2013 8:40 AM EDT













Radio One Inc. Stock Upgraded (ROIAK)
Radio One (Nasdaq:ROIAK) has been upgraded by TheStreet Ratings from a sell to hold.

Aug 15, 2013 11:10 AM EDT









Ratings Changes Today

    

Upgrades: BIG, CCIH, IFT, JDSU, NRGM, ROIA, ROIAK, TIPT 
 
Downgrades: EEP, EXPE, IOT, MINI, MOS, POT, TK, UMC   

Initiations: None

Read on to get TheStreet Quant Ratings' detailed report:



Aug 14, 2013 1:52 PM EDT













4 Stocks Under $10 Making Big Moves
Regardless of the reason behind it, when a stock makes a large-percentage move, it is often just the start of a new major trend -- a trend that can lead to huge profits.

Aug 2, 2013 8:22 AM EDT













5 Earnings Stocks Poised to Pop
These heavily shorted stocks could get squeezed much higher if they report positive earnings this week.

Mar 14, 2012 1:01 PM EDT



















Next






Load More








From Our Partners



Radio One reports Q1 results

SeekingAlpha



Midday Gainers / Losers

SeekingAlpha



Radio One reports Q4 results

SeekingAlpha



Radio One Maybe The One

SeekingAlpha



Radio One reports Q3 results

SeekingAlpha



Radio One reports Q2 results

SeekingAlpha



Five Stocks Making Moves Under $10

Benzinga


































 











Trending


Trump Just Resurrected the Ugly Practice Known as Civil Forfeiture for No Reason


Amazon: The Most Valuable Company on the Planet


Amazon Is a Beast -- 6 Big Business Stories You Have Already Missed


Dow Lower as GE Shares Resume Their Slide, Nasdaq Touches All-Time High


GM May Slash Six Car Models to Combat Slumping Sales, Avoid Plant Layoffs











Advertising Partners



 






 






 






 


























 

























 







































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 














Radio One, Inc.                                                                                                          - Indianapolis                                      , IN         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



IN



Indianapolis



Radio Broadcasting Stations



Radio Broadcasting Stations



                            Radio One, Inc.
                                    



 





















R 


Radio One, Inc.                                                                                                         
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



21 E SAINT JOSEPH ST INDIANAPOLIS, IN 46204
Get Directions



(317) 266-9600
www.radio-one.com                                                                                       





Business Info



 Founded --
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue --
 Employee Count 52
 Industries Radio Broadcasting Stations
 Contacts Deon Laingston                                                                                                          







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message










VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







R

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

















Urban One - Wikipedia





















 






Urban One

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Radio One (company))

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Urban One, Inc.


Type

Public


Traded as
NASDAQ: UONEK


Industry
Media


Founded
1980


Founder
Cathy Hughes


Headquarters
1010 Wayne Avenue
Floor 14
Silver Spring, MD 20910



Area served

United States



Key people

Cathy Hughes
(Chairman)
Alfred C. Liggins III
(President & CEO)


Revenue
 US$ 441.4 million (2014)[1]



Operating income

 US$ 77.2 million (2014)[1]



Net income

 US$ -42.7 million (2014)[1]


Total assets
 US$ 1.4 billion (2014)[2]


Total equity
 US$ 18.9 million (2014)[2]



Number of employees

1,011 (2015)[3]


Divisions
Reach Media
TV One
Interactive One
NewsOne


Website
radio-one.com


Urban One, Inc. is an American media company with holdings in radio, cable television and digital media. Urban One owns and operates 55 radio stations in 16 US markets. It is the largest African American-owned broadcasting company in the US, and the largest radio broadcaster targeting African American and urban listeners.[4] The company's station offerings are primarily hip-hop, rap, R&B, talk radio and news.
As of 2014, the company under the previous name Radio One (until May 2017) was the ninth-highest earning African-American business in the United States.[5]
Urban One owns Reach Media, the largest radio network targeting African American and urban listeners;[6] a majority stake in TV One, a cable television network targeting African American women; and Interactive One, a digital publisher with brands and websites targeting urban users.[7]



Contents


1 History
2 Launches

2.1 TV One
2.2 Interactive One


3 Acquisitions

3.1 Radio stations
3.2 Reach Media
3.3 Print
3.4 Internet


4 Divestures
5 Personalities
6 Stations
7 Milestones
8 See also
9 References
10 External links



History[edit]
Urban One was founded as Radio One in 1980 by Cathy Hughes, a then-recently divorced single mother, with the purchase of the Washington, DC radio station WOL-AM for $995,000.[8][9][10] She changed the station's programming format from all-music to one that examined politics and culture from an African American perspective.[8] Hughes purchased her second station, WMMJ in Washington, seven years later, which began to turn a profit once she converted it into a rhythm and blues station.[9] This established Radio One's early strategy of purchasing small, underperforming radio stations in urban markets and refocusing them to serve the demographics of their communities.[9]
After joining the company in 1985 and managing its day-to-day operations since 1993, Hughes' son, Alfred C. Liggins III, took over as CEO in 1997, with Hughes becoming the board's chairperson.[9][11][12] Under the guidance of recently appointed CEO Liggins, Radio One went public on May 6, 1999, while continuing to be controlled by the family.[13][14] The company's initial public offering was for 6.5 million shares at $24 per share.[12] This made Hughes the first African American woman to chair a public company.[8][11] As of 2010, Hughes and Liggins control 90% of Radio One's voting stock.[15]
In 2001, Radio One expanded into 22 markets, with 18 million listeners, making it the nation's largest urban-market radio broadcasting company.[14] Radio One reached a peak of owning 70 stations in 22 markets in 2007.[16] It is the largest African American-owned-and-operated broadcast company in the US.[11][17]




Radio One logo and slogan used until May 8, 2017.


In 1996, Radio One moved its corporate offices from Washington, DC, to Lanham, Maryland.[18] The company is now based in Silver Spring, Maryland.[8]
Radio One announced that it would rename itself as Urban One, Inc. on January 1, 2017. Each entity will still retain their current brandings (radio stations will still operate under the branding of Radio One, and the same applies to TV One, Interactive One, and Reach Media). This follows the company's move into broader holdings such as the soon-to-open MGM National Harbor casino in Washington DC.[19] The name change was completed on May 8, 2017.[20]
Launches[edit]
TV One[edit]
In January 2003, Radio One and Comcast announced an agreement to a joint venture to create a television network aimed at African Americans ages 25–54.[21] On January 19, 2004, on Martin Luther King Jr.'s birthday, Radio One launched the television station TV One, airing African American entertainment, lifestyle and scripted shows, in 2.2 million households.[4][15][22] Liggins serves as chairman of TV One.[15] Brad Siegel was hired as president of TV One in late 2014.[23]
By the end of 2007, TV One was in 42.2 million homes.[4] In 2011, Comcast and NBC merged, with all Comcast cable holdings subsequently managed by NBC. Also in 2011, Radio One's ownership stake in TV One grew from 36.8% to 50.8%.[24] In 2012, TV One changed its programming, doubling the amount of original content, and changing the logo, while keeping its target audience. As of 2012, TV One reaches 57.4 million US homes.[25]
In March 2015, Radio One announced a deal to buy out Comcast's 47.9% share of TV One for $550 million. To assist with the deal, Radio One refinanced $119 million in outstanding debt, and will ultimately refinance debt totaling approximately $1 billion.[26]
Interactive One[edit]
In 2008, Radio One launched Interactive One, an online portfolio of digital brands, to complement their other media companies. Interactive One operates numerous digital brands, including News One, The Urban Daily and Hello Beautiful.[27][28] In 2011, Interactive One entered into an editorial and sales partnership with NBC News, aligning News One with NBC's The Grio.[29] As of 2013, Interactive One also has a partnership with Global Grind, a website founded by Russell Simmons and focused on pop culture and music content for African American and Hispanic audiences.[30] In 2015, Interactive One launched HB Studios, a video production studio focused on creating scripted and unscripted programming about women and the diversity of their experiences. The programming will be featured on the iOne Women Channel, HelloBeautiful.com, YouTube and Facebook.[31][32]
As of 2011, Interactive was the largest network of owned and operated sites aimed at an African American audience.[33] As of 2014, Interactive One reaches over 18 million unique monthly users on its platform through over 80 national and local brands.[34]
Acquisitions[edit]
Radio stations[edit]
In 1995, Radio One purchased WKYS-FM in Washington, DC, for $34 million, and also entered the Atlanta market by purchasing WHAT-FM for $4.5 million.[18] In 1997, the company entered the Philadelphia market with its purchase of WPHI-FM for $20 million. The company added numerous stations in the second half of the 1990s, including stations in Atlanta, St. Louis, Boston, Cleveland, Richmond, San Francisco, Detroit and Boston.[13][18][35]
In 2000, Radio One purchased 12 stations for approximately $1.3 billion from Clear Channel, bringing Radio One into Los Angeles, Dallas, Houston and Miami, along with stations in Cleveland and Greenville, South Carolina. Soon after, Radio One added two more Dallas stations.[9][18][36] In total, the company added 21 radio stations in 2000.[18]
In February 2001, Radio One purchased rival company Blue Chip Broadcasting for approximately $135 million ($45 million cash with the remainder in stock). The purchase included 15 radio stations owned and operated by Cincinnati-based Blue Chip in Ohio, Minnesota and Kentucky. Earlier that month, Radio One had also purchased another Dallas radio station for $52.5 million.[37] In June 2001, Radio One purchased Georgia radio station WPEZ-FM from US Broadcasting for $55 million.[38]
In 2004, Radio One purchased KRTS-FM in Houston for approximately $72.5 million in cash, giving it three stations in the Houston market.[39] Also in 2004, Radio One purchased country station WSNJ in Bridgeton, New Jersey, for $35 million. It had been on the air since 1937 and family-owned by the Ed and Katherine Bold family for over 50 years.[40]
In 2011, Radio One changed stations in Houston, Cincinnati and Columbus, Ohio, from African American to general interest formats, due to low ratings.[41]
Reach Media[edit]
In November 2004, Radio One acquired a 53% stake in Reach Media, a Texas-based media company owned by radio host Tom Joyner, for $56.1 million in cash and stock.[42][43] The deal also gave Radio One ownership rights to Joyner's syndicated Tom Joyner Morning Show, which was at the time airing on 115 stations to 8 million listeners; and news website BlackAmericaWeb.com, which had at the time approximately 800,000 members, giving Radio One its first strong Internet presence.[43]
In 2005, Radio One teamed up with Reach Media to launch a new African American-centered talk radio network, with programming hosted by the Reverend Al Sharpton, to be broadcast on up to 10 of Radio One's stations, as well as stations owned by other companies.[13] In December 2012, under a new deal, Radio One increased its ownership stake in Reach Media to 80%.[44] That same month, Radio One announced that the following year, it would merge its Syndication One urban programming lineup with Reach Media.[45][46]
Print[edit]
In January 2007, Radio One purchased GIANT magazine for $275,000.[47][48] In December 2009, the company suspended publication of the print version of the bi-monthly magazine, relaunching it online as GIANTLife.com. The website is a part of the Interactive One network.[49]
Internet[edit]
In 2008, Radio One acquired social networking firm Community Connect, the parent company of BlackPlanet, AsianAvenue and MiGente, for $38 million. BlackPlanet at the time had 20 million members and was the nation's fourth-most visited social networking site.[50]
Divestures[edit]
From 2006 through the beginning of 2008, Radio One sold nearly $150 million in assets, primarily underperforming radio stations.[48] In 2007, Radio One sold 10 stations to Main Line Broadcasting for approximately $76 million in cash. The stations sold were in Radio One's markets with the smallest African American populations. The sale decreased the number of Radio One's stations from 71 to 61.[51]
Personalities[edit]
Radio One operates a variety of syndicated shows, with hosts including Tom Joyner, Russ Parr, Yolanda Adams, Rickey Smiley, Bishop T.D. Jakes, DL Hughley and the Reverend Al Sharpton.[52]
Stations[edit]
As of October 2015, Urban One's Radio One division operates 53 radio stations in 16 markets.[53]


Market
Station and Frequency
Owned since
Format
Notes


Atlanta
WAMJ 107.5 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WHTA 107.9 FM
2001
Mainstream urban



WPZE 102.5 FM
2004
Urban gospel



WUMJ 97.5 FM
1995
Classic hip-hop
Simulcast of W275BK


Baltimore
WERQ-FM 92.3 FM
1993
Mainstream urban



WOLB 1010 AM

News/Talk



WWIN 1400 AM

Urban gospel



WWIN-FM 95.9 FM
1992
Urban adult contemporary



Boston
WILD 1090 AM
2001
News/Talk



Charlotte
WOSF 105.3 FM
2012
Urban oldies



WQNC 92.7 FM

Urban contemporary



WPZS 100.9 FM
2004
Urban gospel



Cincinnati
WOSL 100.3 FM
2006
Urban Oldies



WDBZ 1230 AM
2007
Talk/Urban gospel



WIZF 101.1 FM

Urban contemporary



Cleveland
WENZ 107.9 FM
1999
Mainstream urban



WERE 1490 AM
2000
News/Talk



WJMO 1300 AM
1999
Urban gospel



WZAK 93.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary



Columbus, Ohio
WCKX 107.5 FM

Mainstream Urban



WJYD 107.1 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban Gospel
Licensed to Circleville, Ohio


WBMO 106.3 FM
late 1990s
Classic Hip-Hop



WXMG 95.5 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban adult contemporary
Licensed to Lancaster, Ohio


Dallas/Fort Worth
KBFB 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KSOC 94.5 FM
2002
Classic hip-hop



Detroit
WCHB 1200 AM
1998
News/Talk
Has LP simulcast on W260CB 99.9 FM


WDMK 105.9 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WPZR 102.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WGPR 107.5 FM
2011*
Mainstream urban
*Under LMA with International Free and Accepted Modern Masons


Houston
KBXX 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KMJQ 102.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
Operates an urban gospel format on KMJQ-HD2


KROI 92.1 FM
2004
CHR/Top-40



Indianapolis
WHHH 96.3 FM

Rhythmic contemporary



WNOW-FM 100.9 FM

CHR/Top 40



WTLC 1310 AM
2001
Urban gospel



WTLC-FM 106.7 FM
2001
Urban adult contemporary



Philadelphia
WPHI-FM 103.9 FM
1996
Classic hip-hop



WPPZ-FM 107.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WRNB 100.3 FM
2001
Urban oldies



Raleigh/Durham
WFXC 107.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
both WFXC and WFXK are simulcasts


WFXK 104.3 FM


WNNL 103.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WQOK 97.5 FM
2000
Mainstream urban



Richmond, Virginia
WCDX 92.1 FM

Mainstream urban



WKJM 99.3 FM

Urban adult contemporary
both WKJM and WKJS are simulcasts


WKJS 105.7 FM


WPZZ 104.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WTPS 1240 AM
late 1990s
News/Talk



St. Louis
WFUN-FM 95.5 FM
1999
Urban oldies



WHHL 104.1 FM
2005
Mainstream urban



Washington, DC
WKYS 93.9 FM
early 1990s (?)
Urban contemporary



WMMJ 102.3 FM
1987
Urban adult contemporary



WOL 1450 AM
1980
News/Talk
First property of Radio One and its flagship


WPRS-FM 104.1 FM
2006
Urban gospel



WYCB 1340 AM

Urban gospel



Milestones[edit]


Year
Event


1980
Radio One founded by Cathy Hughes.[8]


1997
Alfred C. Liggins III succeeds Hughes as president and CEO.[9]


1999
Goes public on NASDAQ, trading as ROIA (later changed to ROIAK).[8]


2000
Acquires 12 Clear Channel stations.[18]


2004
TV One launched in joint venture with Comcast.[8]


Purchases a majority stake in Reach Media.[42]


2008
Launches Interactive One.[27]


Acquires social networking firm Community Connect.[50]


2015
Announces deal to buy out Comcast's share of TV One.[26]


See also[edit]


African American portal
Radio portal



Inner City Broadcasting Corporation
TV One
Interactive One
Cathy Hughes
Tom Joyner

References[edit]


^ a b c Radio One Inc. Income Statement, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b Radio One Inc. Balance Sheet, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ Radio One Inc. Profile, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b c Felicia R. Lee, "A Network for Blacks With Sense of Mission", The New York Times, December 11, 2007.
^ "BE 100's 2014". Black Enterprise. Retrieved 2016-11-22. 
^ "Radio One increases stake in Reach Media, makes plans to launch a new Urban network", Target Market News, December 3, 2012.
^ "Blacks In Wax Features Radio One Founder Cathy Hughes", New Pittsburgh Courier, September 26, 2014.
^ a b c d e f g Steven Overly, "With purchase of radio station WOL in 1980, Cathy Hughes launched a media empire", The Washington Post, August 11, 2014.
^ a b c d e f Clea Simon, "Mining an Untapped Market, Radio One Becomes a Force", The New York Times, December 25, 2000.
^ Chandrani Ghosh, "The Comeback Queen", Forbes, September 20, 1999.
^ a b c Jessie Carney Smith, ed., Black Firsts: 4,000 Ground-Breaking and Pioneering Historical Events, Canton, MI: Visible Ink Press, 2003, pp. 63-64.
^ a b Robyn D. Clarke, "High-Frequency Profits", Black Enterprise, June 2000.
^ a b c Clea Simon, "WILD to air new African-American talk-radio network", Boston Globe, October 29, 2005.
^ a b "Radio One's Number One", Wharton Alumni Magazine, Spring 2007.
^ a b c Joe Flint, "Latest protestor of Comcast – NBC deal plays race card and has ex-FCC chairman on board", Los Angeles Times, April 27, 2010.
^ Gail Mitchell, "Q&A: Cathy Hughes", Billboard, December 3, 2005, p. 25.
^ Janean Chun, "Cathy Hughes, Radio One: From Teen Mom to Media Mogul", Huffington Post, September 26, 2012.
^ a b c d e f "Radio One, Inc. History", Funding Universe. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One To Rename As Urban One Inc. - Radio Insight (published November 3, 2016)
^ Radio One Completes Name Change To Urban One - Radio Insight (published May 8, 2017)
^ Seth Schiesel, "Comcast and Radio One in TV Joint Venture", The New York Times, January 13, 2003.
^ Rob Owen, "Tuned In: TV One aims to be BET for grown-ups", Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, January 12, 2006.
^ "Brad Siegel Named TV One President", Deadline.com, December 17, 2014.
^ Wayne Barrett, "Al Sharpton's Radio Power Play", The Daily Beast, July 28, 2011.
^ Sijie Wang, "TV One Rebrands Around Storytelling", The Hollywood Reporter, June 20, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One Gears Up for TV One Deal", Inside Radio, March 20, 2015.
^ a b Nicholas Carlson, "Former AOL Entertainment Boss Mike Rich Goes To Interactive One", Business Insider, July 9, 2010.
^ C. Daniel Baker, "Interactive One Studios Adds Russell Simmons' GlobalGrind.com to its Roster", Black Enterprise, April 15, 2013.
^ Tanzina Vega, "Black News In New Focus", The New York Times, July 11, 2011.
^ William Launder, "Digital Marketer Links Up With Russell Simmons", The Wall Street Journal, April 15, 2013.
^ Todd Spangler, "Interactive One Launches Digital Studio to Produce Series for Women of Color", Variety, February 11, 2015.
^ Jessica Klein, "Interactive One Will Launch HB Studios with Doc 'Women of Color'", Video Ink, February 11, 2015.
^ Matthew Flamm, "Urban websites face off", Crain's New York Business, June 12, 2011.
^ "Interactive One Launches Elev8, a New Site Devoted to Uplifting", PR Newswire, October 27, 2013.
^ "Radio One to Acquire Another Philadelphia Station", The New York Times, December 4, 1999.
^ "Radio One to Buy 12 Clear Channel Stations", The New York Times, March 14, 2000.
^ "Radio One Buying Rival Blue Chip Broadcasting", The New York Times, February 9, 2001.
^ "Radio Broadcaster for Black Listeners to Buy Station", The New York Times, June 27, 2001.
^ "Radio One Acquires Third Station in Houston Market", The New York Times, May 25, 2004.
^ G. Patrick Pawling, "Vintage Radio, Down to Farm Reports and School Menus, Is Signing Off", The New York Times, February 1, 2004.
^ Ben Sisario, "A Radio Merger in New York Reflects a Shifting Industry", The New York Times, April 29, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One to boost Joyner", Los Angeles Times, November 23, 2004.
^ a b Andrea K. Walker, "Radio One to acquire Joyner company", Baltimore Sun, November 23, 2004.
^ Ann Brown, "Radio Play: Radio One Increases Investment in Tom Joyner's Reach Media", Madame Noire, December 5, 2012.
^ "Syndication One To Consolidate With Reach Media", All Access, December 3, 2012.
^ "Alfred Liggins and David Kantor On The Radio One Reach Media Merger", The Urban Daily, March 20, 2013.
^ "Radio One Picks Up Giant Magazine", The New York Times, January 4, 2007.
^ a b Anita Huslin, "Radio One's Losses Grow, Stock Declines", The Washington Post, February 22, 2008.
^ Amanda Ernst, "Giant Magazine Suspends Publication, Moves To Web", Mediabistro, November 30, 2009.
^ a b Dan Frommer, "BlackPlanet Parent Community Connect Sells To Radio One For $38 Million", Business Insider, April 11, 2008.
^ Jeff Clabaugh, "Arlington Capital Partners buys 10 Radio One stations", Washington Business Journal, May 18, 2007.
^ "Reaching Our Audience Wherever They Are", radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One, radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.


External links[edit]

Radio One official website
TV One official website
Reach Media official website
Interactive One official website







v
t
e


Urban One



Key people



Cathy Hughes (Chairman and CEO)





Radio shows



The Tom Joyner Morning Show (via Reach Media under contract)
Russ Parr Morning Show (via AURN)
The Yolanda Adams Morning Show
The Donnie Simpson Show










Radio stations (under the Radio One division)



Mainstream urban



KBFB
KBXX
WCDX
WCKX
WENZ
WERQ-FM
WGPR1
WHHL
WHTA
WIZF
WKYS
WQNC
WQOK





Urban adult
contemporary



KMJQ
WAMJ
WBMO
WDCJ
WDMK
WFXC
WFXK
WKJM
WKJS
WMMJ
WRNB
WTLC-FM
WUMJ
WWIN-FM
WXMG
WZAK





Urban gospel



WJMO
WJYD
WNNL
WPPZ-FM
WPRS-FM
WPZE
WPZR
WPZS
WPZZ
WTLC
WWIN
WYCB





Urban talk



WCHB
WDBZ
WERE
WOL
WOLB





CHR



WNOW-FM
KROI





Rhythmic CHR



WHHH





Rhythmic Oldies



WFUN-FM
WOSF
WOSL





Classic hip hop



KSOC
WPHI-FM
W275BK





China Radio International



WILD





ESPN Radio



WTPS
WXGI













Other






WDNI-CD (Telemundo)
TV One
Interactive One











1 Owned by International Free and Accepted Modern Masons and operated by Radio One under an LMA.










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Urban_One&oldid=788423291"					
Categories: Radio One (company)Radio broadcasting companies of the United StatesCompanies based in MarylandCompanies established in 1980Companies listed on NASDAQ 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 09:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Urban One - Wikipedia





















 






Urban One

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Radio One (company))

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Urban One, Inc.


Type

Public


Traded as
NASDAQ: UONEK


Industry
Media


Founded
1980


Founder
Cathy Hughes


Headquarters
1010 Wayne Avenue
Floor 14
Silver Spring, MD 20910



Area served

United States



Key people

Cathy Hughes
(Chairman)
Alfred C. Liggins III
(President & CEO)


Revenue
 US$ 441.4 million (2014)[1]



Operating income

 US$ 77.2 million (2014)[1]



Net income

 US$ -42.7 million (2014)[1]


Total assets
 US$ 1.4 billion (2014)[2]


Total equity
 US$ 18.9 million (2014)[2]



Number of employees

1,011 (2015)[3]


Divisions
Reach Media
TV One
Interactive One
NewsOne


Website
radio-one.com


Urban One, Inc. is an American media company with holdings in radio, cable television and digital media. Urban One owns and operates 55 radio stations in 16 US markets. It is the largest African American-owned broadcasting company in the US, and the largest radio broadcaster targeting African American and urban listeners.[4] The company's station offerings are primarily hip-hop, rap, R&B, talk radio and news.
As of 2014, the company under the previous name Radio One (until May 2017) was the ninth-highest earning African-American business in the United States.[5]
Urban One owns Reach Media, the largest radio network targeting African American and urban listeners;[6] a majority stake in TV One, a cable television network targeting African American women; and Interactive One, a digital publisher with brands and websites targeting urban users.[7]



Contents


1 History
2 Launches

2.1 TV One
2.2 Interactive One


3 Acquisitions

3.1 Radio stations
3.2 Reach Media
3.3 Print
3.4 Internet


4 Divestures
5 Personalities
6 Stations
7 Milestones
8 See also
9 References
10 External links



History[edit]
Urban One was founded as Radio One in 1980 by Cathy Hughes, a then-recently divorced single mother, with the purchase of the Washington, DC radio station WOL-AM for $995,000.[8][9][10] She changed the station's programming format from all-music to one that examined politics and culture from an African American perspective.[8] Hughes purchased her second station, WMMJ in Washington, seven years later, which began to turn a profit once she converted it into a rhythm and blues station.[9] This established Radio One's early strategy of purchasing small, underperforming radio stations in urban markets and refocusing them to serve the demographics of their communities.[9]
After joining the company in 1985 and managing its day-to-day operations since 1993, Hughes' son, Alfred C. Liggins III, took over as CEO in 1997, with Hughes becoming the board's chairperson.[9][11][12] Under the guidance of recently appointed CEO Liggins, Radio One went public on May 6, 1999, while continuing to be controlled by the family.[13][14] The company's initial public offering was for 6.5 million shares at $24 per share.[12] This made Hughes the first African American woman to chair a public company.[8][11] As of 2010, Hughes and Liggins control 90% of Radio One's voting stock.[15]
In 2001, Radio One expanded into 22 markets, with 18 million listeners, making it the nation's largest urban-market radio broadcasting company.[14] Radio One reached a peak of owning 70 stations in 22 markets in 2007.[16] It is the largest African American-owned-and-operated broadcast company in the US.[11][17]




Radio One logo and slogan used until May 8, 2017.


In 1996, Radio One moved its corporate offices from Washington, DC, to Lanham, Maryland.[18] The company is now based in Silver Spring, Maryland.[8]
Radio One announced that it would rename itself as Urban One, Inc. on January 1, 2017. Each entity will still retain their current brandings (radio stations will still operate under the branding of Radio One, and the same applies to TV One, Interactive One, and Reach Media). This follows the company's move into broader holdings such as the soon-to-open MGM National Harbor casino in Washington DC.[19] The name change was completed on May 8, 2017.[20]
Launches[edit]
TV One[edit]
In January 2003, Radio One and Comcast announced an agreement to a joint venture to create a television network aimed at African Americans ages 25–54.[21] On January 19, 2004, on Martin Luther King Jr.'s birthday, Radio One launched the television station TV One, airing African American entertainment, lifestyle and scripted shows, in 2.2 million households.[4][15][22] Liggins serves as chairman of TV One.[15] Brad Siegel was hired as president of TV One in late 2014.[23]
By the end of 2007, TV One was in 42.2 million homes.[4] In 2011, Comcast and NBC merged, with all Comcast cable holdings subsequently managed by NBC. Also in 2011, Radio One's ownership stake in TV One grew from 36.8% to 50.8%.[24] In 2012, TV One changed its programming, doubling the amount of original content, and changing the logo, while keeping its target audience. As of 2012, TV One reaches 57.4 million US homes.[25]
In March 2015, Radio One announced a deal to buy out Comcast's 47.9% share of TV One for $550 million. To assist with the deal, Radio One refinanced $119 million in outstanding debt, and will ultimately refinance debt totaling approximately $1 billion.[26]
Interactive One[edit]
In 2008, Radio One launched Interactive One, an online portfolio of digital brands, to complement their other media companies. Interactive One operates numerous digital brands, including News One, The Urban Daily and Hello Beautiful.[27][28] In 2011, Interactive One entered into an editorial and sales partnership with NBC News, aligning News One with NBC's The Grio.[29] As of 2013, Interactive One also has a partnership with Global Grind, a website founded by Russell Simmons and focused on pop culture and music content for African American and Hispanic audiences.[30] In 2015, Interactive One launched HB Studios, a video production studio focused on creating scripted and unscripted programming about women and the diversity of their experiences. The programming will be featured on the iOne Women Channel, HelloBeautiful.com, YouTube and Facebook.[31][32]
As of 2011, Interactive was the largest network of owned and operated sites aimed at an African American audience.[33] As of 2014, Interactive One reaches over 18 million unique monthly users on its platform through over 80 national and local brands.[34]
Acquisitions[edit]
Radio stations[edit]
In 1995, Radio One purchased WKYS-FM in Washington, DC, for $34 million, and also entered the Atlanta market by purchasing WHAT-FM for $4.5 million.[18] In 1997, the company entered the Philadelphia market with its purchase of WPHI-FM for $20 million. The company added numerous stations in the second half of the 1990s, including stations in Atlanta, St. Louis, Boston, Cleveland, Richmond, San Francisco, Detroit and Boston.[13][18][35]
In 2000, Radio One purchased 12 stations for approximately $1.3 billion from Clear Channel, bringing Radio One into Los Angeles, Dallas, Houston and Miami, along with stations in Cleveland and Greenville, South Carolina. Soon after, Radio One added two more Dallas stations.[9][18][36] In total, the company added 21 radio stations in 2000.[18]
In February 2001, Radio One purchased rival company Blue Chip Broadcasting for approximately $135 million ($45 million cash with the remainder in stock). The purchase included 15 radio stations owned and operated by Cincinnati-based Blue Chip in Ohio, Minnesota and Kentucky. Earlier that month, Radio One had also purchased another Dallas radio station for $52.5 million.[37] In June 2001, Radio One purchased Georgia radio station WPEZ-FM from US Broadcasting for $55 million.[38]
In 2004, Radio One purchased KRTS-FM in Houston for approximately $72.5 million in cash, giving it three stations in the Houston market.[39] Also in 2004, Radio One purchased country station WSNJ in Bridgeton, New Jersey, for $35 million. It had been on the air since 1937 and family-owned by the Ed and Katherine Bold family for over 50 years.[40]
In 2011, Radio One changed stations in Houston, Cincinnati and Columbus, Ohio, from African American to general interest formats, due to low ratings.[41]
Reach Media[edit]
In November 2004, Radio One acquired a 53% stake in Reach Media, a Texas-based media company owned by radio host Tom Joyner, for $56.1 million in cash and stock.[42][43] The deal also gave Radio One ownership rights to Joyner's syndicated Tom Joyner Morning Show, which was at the time airing on 115 stations to 8 million listeners; and news website BlackAmericaWeb.com, which had at the time approximately 800,000 members, giving Radio One its first strong Internet presence.[43]
In 2005, Radio One teamed up with Reach Media to launch a new African American-centered talk radio network, with programming hosted by the Reverend Al Sharpton, to be broadcast on up to 10 of Radio One's stations, as well as stations owned by other companies.[13] In December 2012, under a new deal, Radio One increased its ownership stake in Reach Media to 80%.[44] That same month, Radio One announced that the following year, it would merge its Syndication One urban programming lineup with Reach Media.[45][46]
Print[edit]
In January 2007, Radio One purchased GIANT magazine for $275,000.[47][48] In December 2009, the company suspended publication of the print version of the bi-monthly magazine, relaunching it online as GIANTLife.com. The website is a part of the Interactive One network.[49]
Internet[edit]
In 2008, Radio One acquired social networking firm Community Connect, the parent company of BlackPlanet, AsianAvenue and MiGente, for $38 million. BlackPlanet at the time had 20 million members and was the nation's fourth-most visited social networking site.[50]
Divestures[edit]
From 2006 through the beginning of 2008, Radio One sold nearly $150 million in assets, primarily underperforming radio stations.[48] In 2007, Radio One sold 10 stations to Main Line Broadcasting for approximately $76 million in cash. The stations sold were in Radio One's markets with the smallest African American populations. The sale decreased the number of Radio One's stations from 71 to 61.[51]
Personalities[edit]
Radio One operates a variety of syndicated shows, with hosts including Tom Joyner, Russ Parr, Yolanda Adams, Rickey Smiley, Bishop T.D. Jakes, DL Hughley and the Reverend Al Sharpton.[52]
Stations[edit]
As of October 2015, Urban One's Radio One division operates 53 radio stations in 16 markets.[53]


Market
Station and Frequency
Owned since
Format
Notes


Atlanta
WAMJ 107.5 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WHTA 107.9 FM
2001
Mainstream urban



WPZE 102.5 FM
2004
Urban gospel



WUMJ 97.5 FM
1995
Classic hip-hop
Simulcast of W275BK


Baltimore
WERQ-FM 92.3 FM
1993
Mainstream urban



WOLB 1010 AM

News/Talk



WWIN 1400 AM

Urban gospel



WWIN-FM 95.9 FM
1992
Urban adult contemporary



Boston
WILD 1090 AM
2001
News/Talk



Charlotte
WOSF 105.3 FM
2012
Urban oldies



WQNC 92.7 FM

Urban contemporary



WPZS 100.9 FM
2004
Urban gospel



Cincinnati
WOSL 100.3 FM
2006
Urban Oldies



WDBZ 1230 AM
2007
Talk/Urban gospel



WIZF 101.1 FM

Urban contemporary



Cleveland
WENZ 107.9 FM
1999
Mainstream urban



WERE 1490 AM
2000
News/Talk



WJMO 1300 AM
1999
Urban gospel



WZAK 93.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary



Columbus, Ohio
WCKX 107.5 FM

Mainstream Urban



WJYD 107.1 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban Gospel
Licensed to Circleville, Ohio


WBMO 106.3 FM
late 1990s
Classic Hip-Hop



WXMG 95.5 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban adult contemporary
Licensed to Lancaster, Ohio


Dallas/Fort Worth
KBFB 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KSOC 94.5 FM
2002
Classic hip-hop



Detroit
WCHB 1200 AM
1998
News/Talk
Has LP simulcast on W260CB 99.9 FM


WDMK 105.9 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WPZR 102.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WGPR 107.5 FM
2011*
Mainstream urban
*Under LMA with International Free and Accepted Modern Masons


Houston
KBXX 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KMJQ 102.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
Operates an urban gospel format on KMJQ-HD2


KROI 92.1 FM
2004
CHR/Top-40



Indianapolis
WHHH 96.3 FM

Rhythmic contemporary



WNOW-FM 100.9 FM

CHR/Top 40



WTLC 1310 AM
2001
Urban gospel



WTLC-FM 106.7 FM
2001
Urban adult contemporary



Philadelphia
WPHI-FM 103.9 FM
1996
Classic hip-hop



WPPZ-FM 107.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WRNB 100.3 FM
2001
Urban oldies



Raleigh/Durham
WFXC 107.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
both WFXC and WFXK are simulcasts


WFXK 104.3 FM


WNNL 103.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WQOK 97.5 FM
2000
Mainstream urban



Richmond, Virginia
WCDX 92.1 FM

Mainstream urban



WKJM 99.3 FM

Urban adult contemporary
both WKJM and WKJS are simulcasts


WKJS 105.7 FM


WPZZ 104.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WTPS 1240 AM
late 1990s
News/Talk



St. Louis
WFUN-FM 95.5 FM
1999
Urban oldies



WHHL 104.1 FM
2005
Mainstream urban



Washington, DC
WKYS 93.9 FM
early 1990s (?)
Urban contemporary



WMMJ 102.3 FM
1987
Urban adult contemporary



WOL 1450 AM
1980
News/Talk
First property of Radio One and its flagship


WPRS-FM 104.1 FM
2006
Urban gospel



WYCB 1340 AM

Urban gospel



Milestones[edit]


Year
Event


1980
Radio One founded by Cathy Hughes.[8]


1997
Alfred C. Liggins III succeeds Hughes as president and CEO.[9]


1999
Goes public on NASDAQ, trading as ROIA (later changed to ROIAK).[8]


2000
Acquires 12 Clear Channel stations.[18]


2004
TV One launched in joint venture with Comcast.[8]


Purchases a majority stake in Reach Media.[42]


2008
Launches Interactive One.[27]


Acquires social networking firm Community Connect.[50]


2015
Announces deal to buy out Comcast's share of TV One.[26]


See also[edit]


African American portal
Radio portal



Inner City Broadcasting Corporation
TV One
Interactive One
Cathy Hughes
Tom Joyner

References[edit]


^ a b c Radio One Inc. Income Statement, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b Radio One Inc. Balance Sheet, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ Radio One Inc. Profile, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b c Felicia R. Lee, "A Network for Blacks With Sense of Mission", The New York Times, December 11, 2007.
^ "BE 100's 2014". Black Enterprise. Retrieved 2016-11-22. 
^ "Radio One increases stake in Reach Media, makes plans to launch a new Urban network", Target Market News, December 3, 2012.
^ "Blacks In Wax Features Radio One Founder Cathy Hughes", New Pittsburgh Courier, September 26, 2014.
^ a b c d e f g Steven Overly, "With purchase of radio station WOL in 1980, Cathy Hughes launched a media empire", The Washington Post, August 11, 2014.
^ a b c d e f Clea Simon, "Mining an Untapped Market, Radio One Becomes a Force", The New York Times, December 25, 2000.
^ Chandrani Ghosh, "The Comeback Queen", Forbes, September 20, 1999.
^ a b c Jessie Carney Smith, ed., Black Firsts: 4,000 Ground-Breaking and Pioneering Historical Events, Canton, MI: Visible Ink Press, 2003, pp. 63-64.
^ a b Robyn D. Clarke, "High-Frequency Profits", Black Enterprise, June 2000.
^ a b c Clea Simon, "WILD to air new African-American talk-radio network", Boston Globe, October 29, 2005.
^ a b "Radio One's Number One", Wharton Alumni Magazine, Spring 2007.
^ a b c Joe Flint, "Latest protestor of Comcast – NBC deal plays race card and has ex-FCC chairman on board", Los Angeles Times, April 27, 2010.
^ Gail Mitchell, "Q&A: Cathy Hughes", Billboard, December 3, 2005, p. 25.
^ Janean Chun, "Cathy Hughes, Radio One: From Teen Mom to Media Mogul", Huffington Post, September 26, 2012.
^ a b c d e f "Radio One, Inc. History", Funding Universe. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One To Rename As Urban One Inc. - Radio Insight (published November 3, 2016)
^ Radio One Completes Name Change To Urban One - Radio Insight (published May 8, 2017)
^ Seth Schiesel, "Comcast and Radio One in TV Joint Venture", The New York Times, January 13, 2003.
^ Rob Owen, "Tuned In: TV One aims to be BET for grown-ups", Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, January 12, 2006.
^ "Brad Siegel Named TV One President", Deadline.com, December 17, 2014.
^ Wayne Barrett, "Al Sharpton's Radio Power Play", The Daily Beast, July 28, 2011.
^ Sijie Wang, "TV One Rebrands Around Storytelling", The Hollywood Reporter, June 20, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One Gears Up for TV One Deal", Inside Radio, March 20, 2015.
^ a b Nicholas Carlson, "Former AOL Entertainment Boss Mike Rich Goes To Interactive One", Business Insider, July 9, 2010.
^ C. Daniel Baker, "Interactive One Studios Adds Russell Simmons' GlobalGrind.com to its Roster", Black Enterprise, April 15, 2013.
^ Tanzina Vega, "Black News In New Focus", The New York Times, July 11, 2011.
^ William Launder, "Digital Marketer Links Up With Russell Simmons", The Wall Street Journal, April 15, 2013.
^ Todd Spangler, "Interactive One Launches Digital Studio to Produce Series for Women of Color", Variety, February 11, 2015.
^ Jessica Klein, "Interactive One Will Launch HB Studios with Doc 'Women of Color'", Video Ink, February 11, 2015.
^ Matthew Flamm, "Urban websites face off", Crain's New York Business, June 12, 2011.
^ "Interactive One Launches Elev8, a New Site Devoted to Uplifting", PR Newswire, October 27, 2013.
^ "Radio One to Acquire Another Philadelphia Station", The New York Times, December 4, 1999.
^ "Radio One to Buy 12 Clear Channel Stations", The New York Times, March 14, 2000.
^ "Radio One Buying Rival Blue Chip Broadcasting", The New York Times, February 9, 2001.
^ "Radio Broadcaster for Black Listeners to Buy Station", The New York Times, June 27, 2001.
^ "Radio One Acquires Third Station in Houston Market", The New York Times, May 25, 2004.
^ G. Patrick Pawling, "Vintage Radio, Down to Farm Reports and School Menus, Is Signing Off", The New York Times, February 1, 2004.
^ Ben Sisario, "A Radio Merger in New York Reflects a Shifting Industry", The New York Times, April 29, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One to boost Joyner", Los Angeles Times, November 23, 2004.
^ a b Andrea K. Walker, "Radio One to acquire Joyner company", Baltimore Sun, November 23, 2004.
^ Ann Brown, "Radio Play: Radio One Increases Investment in Tom Joyner's Reach Media", Madame Noire, December 5, 2012.
^ "Syndication One To Consolidate With Reach Media", All Access, December 3, 2012.
^ "Alfred Liggins and David Kantor On The Radio One Reach Media Merger", The Urban Daily, March 20, 2013.
^ "Radio One Picks Up Giant Magazine", The New York Times, January 4, 2007.
^ a b Anita Huslin, "Radio One's Losses Grow, Stock Declines", The Washington Post, February 22, 2008.
^ Amanda Ernst, "Giant Magazine Suspends Publication, Moves To Web", Mediabistro, November 30, 2009.
^ a b Dan Frommer, "BlackPlanet Parent Community Connect Sells To Radio One For $38 Million", Business Insider, April 11, 2008.
^ Jeff Clabaugh, "Arlington Capital Partners buys 10 Radio One stations", Washington Business Journal, May 18, 2007.
^ "Reaching Our Audience Wherever They Are", radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One, radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.


External links[edit]

Radio One official website
TV One official website
Reach Media official website
Interactive One official website







v
t
e


Urban One



Key people



Cathy Hughes (Chairman and CEO)





Radio shows



The Tom Joyner Morning Show (via Reach Media under contract)
Russ Parr Morning Show (via AURN)
The Yolanda Adams Morning Show
The Donnie Simpson Show










Radio stations (under the Radio One division)



Mainstream urban



KBFB
KBXX
WCDX
WCKX
WENZ
WERQ-FM
WGPR1
WHHL
WHTA
WIZF
WKYS
WQNC
WQOK





Urban adult
contemporary



KMJQ
WAMJ
WBMO
WDCJ
WDMK
WFXC
WFXK
WKJM
WKJS
WMMJ
WRNB
WTLC-FM
WUMJ
WWIN-FM
WXMG
WZAK





Urban gospel



WJMO
WJYD
WNNL
WPPZ-FM
WPRS-FM
WPZE
WPZR
WPZS
WPZZ
WTLC
WWIN
WYCB





Urban talk



WCHB
WDBZ
WERE
WOL
WOLB





CHR



WNOW-FM
KROI





Rhythmic CHR



WHHH





Rhythmic Oldies



WFUN-FM
WOSF
WOSL





Classic hip hop



KSOC
WPHI-FM
W275BK





China Radio International



WILD





ESPN Radio



WTPS
WXGI













Other






WDNI-CD (Telemundo)
TV One
Interactive One











1 Owned by International Free and Accepted Modern Masons and operated by Radio One under an LMA.










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Urban_One&oldid=788423291"					
Categories: Radio One (company)Radio broadcasting companies of the United StatesCompanies based in MarylandCompanies established in 1980Companies listed on NASDAQ 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 09:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Urban One - Wikipedia





















 






Urban One

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Radio One (company))

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Urban One, Inc.


Type

Public


Traded as
NASDAQ: UONEK


Industry
Media


Founded
1980


Founder
Cathy Hughes


Headquarters
1010 Wayne Avenue
Floor 14
Silver Spring, MD 20910



Area served

United States



Key people

Cathy Hughes
(Chairman)
Alfred C. Liggins III
(President & CEO)


Revenue
 US$ 441.4 million (2014)[1]



Operating income

 US$ 77.2 million (2014)[1]



Net income

 US$ -42.7 million (2014)[1]


Total assets
 US$ 1.4 billion (2014)[2]


Total equity
 US$ 18.9 million (2014)[2]



Number of employees

1,011 (2015)[3]


Divisions
Reach Media
TV One
Interactive One
NewsOne


Website
radio-one.com


Urban One, Inc. is an American media company with holdings in radio, cable television and digital media. Urban One owns and operates 55 radio stations in 16 US markets. It is the largest African American-owned broadcasting company in the US, and the largest radio broadcaster targeting African American and urban listeners.[4] The company's station offerings are primarily hip-hop, rap, R&B, talk radio and news.
As of 2014, the company under the previous name Radio One (until May 2017) was the ninth-highest earning African-American business in the United States.[5]
Urban One owns Reach Media, the largest radio network targeting African American and urban listeners;[6] a majority stake in TV One, a cable television network targeting African American women; and Interactive One, a digital publisher with brands and websites targeting urban users.[7]



Contents


1 History
2 Launches

2.1 TV One
2.2 Interactive One


3 Acquisitions

3.1 Radio stations
3.2 Reach Media
3.3 Print
3.4 Internet


4 Divestures
5 Personalities
6 Stations
7 Milestones
8 See also
9 References
10 External links



History[edit]
Urban One was founded as Radio One in 1980 by Cathy Hughes, a then-recently divorced single mother, with the purchase of the Washington, DC radio station WOL-AM for $995,000.[8][9][10] She changed the station's programming format from all-music to one that examined politics and culture from an African American perspective.[8] Hughes purchased her second station, WMMJ in Washington, seven years later, which began to turn a profit once she converted it into a rhythm and blues station.[9] This established Radio One's early strategy of purchasing small, underperforming radio stations in urban markets and refocusing them to serve the demographics of their communities.[9]
After joining the company in 1985 and managing its day-to-day operations since 1993, Hughes' son, Alfred C. Liggins III, took over as CEO in 1997, with Hughes becoming the board's chairperson.[9][11][12] Under the guidance of recently appointed CEO Liggins, Radio One went public on May 6, 1999, while continuing to be controlled by the family.[13][14] The company's initial public offering was for 6.5 million shares at $24 per share.[12] This made Hughes the first African American woman to chair a public company.[8][11] As of 2010, Hughes and Liggins control 90% of Radio One's voting stock.[15]
In 2001, Radio One expanded into 22 markets, with 18 million listeners, making it the nation's largest urban-market radio broadcasting company.[14] Radio One reached a peak of owning 70 stations in 22 markets in 2007.[16] It is the largest African American-owned-and-operated broadcast company in the US.[11][17]




Radio One logo and slogan used until May 8, 2017.


In 1996, Radio One moved its corporate offices from Washington, DC, to Lanham, Maryland.[18] The company is now based in Silver Spring, Maryland.[8]
Radio One announced that it would rename itself as Urban One, Inc. on January 1, 2017. Each entity will still retain their current brandings (radio stations will still operate under the branding of Radio One, and the same applies to TV One, Interactive One, and Reach Media). This follows the company's move into broader holdings such as the soon-to-open MGM National Harbor casino in Washington DC.[19] The name change was completed on May 8, 2017.[20]
Launches[edit]
TV One[edit]
In January 2003, Radio One and Comcast announced an agreement to a joint venture to create a television network aimed at African Americans ages 25–54.[21] On January 19, 2004, on Martin Luther King Jr.'s birthday, Radio One launched the television station TV One, airing African American entertainment, lifestyle and scripted shows, in 2.2 million households.[4][15][22] Liggins serves as chairman of TV One.[15] Brad Siegel was hired as president of TV One in late 2014.[23]
By the end of 2007, TV One was in 42.2 million homes.[4] In 2011, Comcast and NBC merged, with all Comcast cable holdings subsequently managed by NBC. Also in 2011, Radio One's ownership stake in TV One grew from 36.8% to 50.8%.[24] In 2012, TV One changed its programming, doubling the amount of original content, and changing the logo, while keeping its target audience. As of 2012, TV One reaches 57.4 million US homes.[25]
In March 2015, Radio One announced a deal to buy out Comcast's 47.9% share of TV One for $550 million. To assist with the deal, Radio One refinanced $119 million in outstanding debt, and will ultimately refinance debt totaling approximately $1 billion.[26]
Interactive One[edit]
In 2008, Radio One launched Interactive One, an online portfolio of digital brands, to complement their other media companies. Interactive One operates numerous digital brands, including News One, The Urban Daily and Hello Beautiful.[27][28] In 2011, Interactive One entered into an editorial and sales partnership with NBC News, aligning News One with NBC's The Grio.[29] As of 2013, Interactive One also has a partnership with Global Grind, a website founded by Russell Simmons and focused on pop culture and music content for African American and Hispanic audiences.[30] In 2015, Interactive One launched HB Studios, a video production studio focused on creating scripted and unscripted programming about women and the diversity of their experiences. The programming will be featured on the iOne Women Channel, HelloBeautiful.com, YouTube and Facebook.[31][32]
As of 2011, Interactive was the largest network of owned and operated sites aimed at an African American audience.[33] As of 2014, Interactive One reaches over 18 million unique monthly users on its platform through over 80 national and local brands.[34]
Acquisitions[edit]
Radio stations[edit]
In 1995, Radio One purchased WKYS-FM in Washington, DC, for $34 million, and also entered the Atlanta market by purchasing WHAT-FM for $4.5 million.[18] In 1997, the company entered the Philadelphia market with its purchase of WPHI-FM for $20 million. The company added numerous stations in the second half of the 1990s, including stations in Atlanta, St. Louis, Boston, Cleveland, Richmond, San Francisco, Detroit and Boston.[13][18][35]
In 2000, Radio One purchased 12 stations for approximately $1.3 billion from Clear Channel, bringing Radio One into Los Angeles, Dallas, Houston and Miami, along with stations in Cleveland and Greenville, South Carolina. Soon after, Radio One added two more Dallas stations.[9][18][36] In total, the company added 21 radio stations in 2000.[18]
In February 2001, Radio One purchased rival company Blue Chip Broadcasting for approximately $135 million ($45 million cash with the remainder in stock). The purchase included 15 radio stations owned and operated by Cincinnati-based Blue Chip in Ohio, Minnesota and Kentucky. Earlier that month, Radio One had also purchased another Dallas radio station for $52.5 million.[37] In June 2001, Radio One purchased Georgia radio station WPEZ-FM from US Broadcasting for $55 million.[38]
In 2004, Radio One purchased KRTS-FM in Houston for approximately $72.5 million in cash, giving it three stations in the Houston market.[39] Also in 2004, Radio One purchased country station WSNJ in Bridgeton, New Jersey, for $35 million. It had been on the air since 1937 and family-owned by the Ed and Katherine Bold family for over 50 years.[40]
In 2011, Radio One changed stations in Houston, Cincinnati and Columbus, Ohio, from African American to general interest formats, due to low ratings.[41]
Reach Media[edit]
In November 2004, Radio One acquired a 53% stake in Reach Media, a Texas-based media company owned by radio host Tom Joyner, for $56.1 million in cash and stock.[42][43] The deal also gave Radio One ownership rights to Joyner's syndicated Tom Joyner Morning Show, which was at the time airing on 115 stations to 8 million listeners; and news website BlackAmericaWeb.com, which had at the time approximately 800,000 members, giving Radio One its first strong Internet presence.[43]
In 2005, Radio One teamed up with Reach Media to launch a new African American-centered talk radio network, with programming hosted by the Reverend Al Sharpton, to be broadcast on up to 10 of Radio One's stations, as well as stations owned by other companies.[13] In December 2012, under a new deal, Radio One increased its ownership stake in Reach Media to 80%.[44] That same month, Radio One announced that the following year, it would merge its Syndication One urban programming lineup with Reach Media.[45][46]
Print[edit]
In January 2007, Radio One purchased GIANT magazine for $275,000.[47][48] In December 2009, the company suspended publication of the print version of the bi-monthly magazine, relaunching it online as GIANTLife.com. The website is a part of the Interactive One network.[49]
Internet[edit]
In 2008, Radio One acquired social networking firm Community Connect, the parent company of BlackPlanet, AsianAvenue and MiGente, for $38 million. BlackPlanet at the time had 20 million members and was the nation's fourth-most visited social networking site.[50]
Divestures[edit]
From 2006 through the beginning of 2008, Radio One sold nearly $150 million in assets, primarily underperforming radio stations.[48] In 2007, Radio One sold 10 stations to Main Line Broadcasting for approximately $76 million in cash. The stations sold were in Radio One's markets with the smallest African American populations. The sale decreased the number of Radio One's stations from 71 to 61.[51]
Personalities[edit]
Radio One operates a variety of syndicated shows, with hosts including Tom Joyner, Russ Parr, Yolanda Adams, Rickey Smiley, Bishop T.D. Jakes, DL Hughley and the Reverend Al Sharpton.[52]
Stations[edit]
As of October 2015, Urban One's Radio One division operates 53 radio stations in 16 markets.[53]


Market
Station and Frequency
Owned since
Format
Notes


Atlanta
WAMJ 107.5 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WHTA 107.9 FM
2001
Mainstream urban



WPZE 102.5 FM
2004
Urban gospel



WUMJ 97.5 FM
1995
Classic hip-hop
Simulcast of W275BK


Baltimore
WERQ-FM 92.3 FM
1993
Mainstream urban



WOLB 1010 AM

News/Talk



WWIN 1400 AM

Urban gospel



WWIN-FM 95.9 FM
1992
Urban adult contemporary



Boston
WILD 1090 AM
2001
News/Talk



Charlotte
WOSF 105.3 FM
2012
Urban oldies



WQNC 92.7 FM

Urban contemporary



WPZS 100.9 FM
2004
Urban gospel



Cincinnati
WOSL 100.3 FM
2006
Urban Oldies



WDBZ 1230 AM
2007
Talk/Urban gospel



WIZF 101.1 FM

Urban contemporary



Cleveland
WENZ 107.9 FM
1999
Mainstream urban



WERE 1490 AM
2000
News/Talk



WJMO 1300 AM
1999
Urban gospel



WZAK 93.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary



Columbus, Ohio
WCKX 107.5 FM

Mainstream Urban



WJYD 107.1 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban Gospel
Licensed to Circleville, Ohio


WBMO 106.3 FM
late 1990s
Classic Hip-Hop



WXMG 95.5 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban adult contemporary
Licensed to Lancaster, Ohio


Dallas/Fort Worth
KBFB 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KSOC 94.5 FM
2002
Classic hip-hop



Detroit
WCHB 1200 AM
1998
News/Talk
Has LP simulcast on W260CB 99.9 FM


WDMK 105.9 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WPZR 102.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WGPR 107.5 FM
2011*
Mainstream urban
*Under LMA with International Free and Accepted Modern Masons


Houston
KBXX 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KMJQ 102.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
Operates an urban gospel format on KMJQ-HD2


KROI 92.1 FM
2004
CHR/Top-40



Indianapolis
WHHH 96.3 FM

Rhythmic contemporary



WNOW-FM 100.9 FM

CHR/Top 40



WTLC 1310 AM
2001
Urban gospel



WTLC-FM 106.7 FM
2001
Urban adult contemporary



Philadelphia
WPHI-FM 103.9 FM
1996
Classic hip-hop



WPPZ-FM 107.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WRNB 100.3 FM
2001
Urban oldies



Raleigh/Durham
WFXC 107.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
both WFXC and WFXK are simulcasts


WFXK 104.3 FM


WNNL 103.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WQOK 97.5 FM
2000
Mainstream urban



Richmond, Virginia
WCDX 92.1 FM

Mainstream urban



WKJM 99.3 FM

Urban adult contemporary
both WKJM and WKJS are simulcasts


WKJS 105.7 FM


WPZZ 104.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WTPS 1240 AM
late 1990s
News/Talk



St. Louis
WFUN-FM 95.5 FM
1999
Urban oldies



WHHL 104.1 FM
2005
Mainstream urban



Washington, DC
WKYS 93.9 FM
early 1990s (?)
Urban contemporary



WMMJ 102.3 FM
1987
Urban adult contemporary



WOL 1450 AM
1980
News/Talk
First property of Radio One and its flagship


WPRS-FM 104.1 FM
2006
Urban gospel



WYCB 1340 AM

Urban gospel



Milestones[edit]


Year
Event


1980
Radio One founded by Cathy Hughes.[8]


1997
Alfred C. Liggins III succeeds Hughes as president and CEO.[9]


1999
Goes public on NASDAQ, trading as ROIA (later changed to ROIAK).[8]


2000
Acquires 12 Clear Channel stations.[18]


2004
TV One launched in joint venture with Comcast.[8]


Purchases a majority stake in Reach Media.[42]


2008
Launches Interactive One.[27]


Acquires social networking firm Community Connect.[50]


2015
Announces deal to buy out Comcast's share of TV One.[26]


See also[edit]


African American portal
Radio portal



Inner City Broadcasting Corporation
TV One
Interactive One
Cathy Hughes
Tom Joyner

References[edit]


^ a b c Radio One Inc. Income Statement, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b Radio One Inc. Balance Sheet, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ Radio One Inc. Profile, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b c Felicia R. Lee, "A Network for Blacks With Sense of Mission", The New York Times, December 11, 2007.
^ "BE 100's 2014". Black Enterprise. Retrieved 2016-11-22. 
^ "Radio One increases stake in Reach Media, makes plans to launch a new Urban network", Target Market News, December 3, 2012.
^ "Blacks In Wax Features Radio One Founder Cathy Hughes", New Pittsburgh Courier, September 26, 2014.
^ a b c d e f g Steven Overly, "With purchase of radio station WOL in 1980, Cathy Hughes launched a media empire", The Washington Post, August 11, 2014.
^ a b c d e f Clea Simon, "Mining an Untapped Market, Radio One Becomes a Force", The New York Times, December 25, 2000.
^ Chandrani Ghosh, "The Comeback Queen", Forbes, September 20, 1999.
^ a b c Jessie Carney Smith, ed., Black Firsts: 4,000 Ground-Breaking and Pioneering Historical Events, Canton, MI: Visible Ink Press, 2003, pp. 63-64.
^ a b Robyn D. Clarke, "High-Frequency Profits", Black Enterprise, June 2000.
^ a b c Clea Simon, "WILD to air new African-American talk-radio network", Boston Globe, October 29, 2005.
^ a b "Radio One's Number One", Wharton Alumni Magazine, Spring 2007.
^ a b c Joe Flint, "Latest protestor of Comcast – NBC deal plays race card and has ex-FCC chairman on board", Los Angeles Times, April 27, 2010.
^ Gail Mitchell, "Q&A: Cathy Hughes", Billboard, December 3, 2005, p. 25.
^ Janean Chun, "Cathy Hughes, Radio One: From Teen Mom to Media Mogul", Huffington Post, September 26, 2012.
^ a b c d e f "Radio One, Inc. History", Funding Universe. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One To Rename As Urban One Inc. - Radio Insight (published November 3, 2016)
^ Radio One Completes Name Change To Urban One - Radio Insight (published May 8, 2017)
^ Seth Schiesel, "Comcast and Radio One in TV Joint Venture", The New York Times, January 13, 2003.
^ Rob Owen, "Tuned In: TV One aims to be BET for grown-ups", Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, January 12, 2006.
^ "Brad Siegel Named TV One President", Deadline.com, December 17, 2014.
^ Wayne Barrett, "Al Sharpton's Radio Power Play", The Daily Beast, July 28, 2011.
^ Sijie Wang, "TV One Rebrands Around Storytelling", The Hollywood Reporter, June 20, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One Gears Up for TV One Deal", Inside Radio, March 20, 2015.
^ a b Nicholas Carlson, "Former AOL Entertainment Boss Mike Rich Goes To Interactive One", Business Insider, July 9, 2010.
^ C. Daniel Baker, "Interactive One Studios Adds Russell Simmons' GlobalGrind.com to its Roster", Black Enterprise, April 15, 2013.
^ Tanzina Vega, "Black News In New Focus", The New York Times, July 11, 2011.
^ William Launder, "Digital Marketer Links Up With Russell Simmons", The Wall Street Journal, April 15, 2013.
^ Todd Spangler, "Interactive One Launches Digital Studio to Produce Series for Women of Color", Variety, February 11, 2015.
^ Jessica Klein, "Interactive One Will Launch HB Studios with Doc 'Women of Color'", Video Ink, February 11, 2015.
^ Matthew Flamm, "Urban websites face off", Crain's New York Business, June 12, 2011.
^ "Interactive One Launches Elev8, a New Site Devoted to Uplifting", PR Newswire, October 27, 2013.
^ "Radio One to Acquire Another Philadelphia Station", The New York Times, December 4, 1999.
^ "Radio One to Buy 12 Clear Channel Stations", The New York Times, March 14, 2000.
^ "Radio One Buying Rival Blue Chip Broadcasting", The New York Times, February 9, 2001.
^ "Radio Broadcaster for Black Listeners to Buy Station", The New York Times, June 27, 2001.
^ "Radio One Acquires Third Station in Houston Market", The New York Times, May 25, 2004.
^ G. Patrick Pawling, "Vintage Radio, Down to Farm Reports and School Menus, Is Signing Off", The New York Times, February 1, 2004.
^ Ben Sisario, "A Radio Merger in New York Reflects a Shifting Industry", The New York Times, April 29, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One to boost Joyner", Los Angeles Times, November 23, 2004.
^ a b Andrea K. Walker, "Radio One to acquire Joyner company", Baltimore Sun, November 23, 2004.
^ Ann Brown, "Radio Play: Radio One Increases Investment in Tom Joyner's Reach Media", Madame Noire, December 5, 2012.
^ "Syndication One To Consolidate With Reach Media", All Access, December 3, 2012.
^ "Alfred Liggins and David Kantor On The Radio One Reach Media Merger", The Urban Daily, March 20, 2013.
^ "Radio One Picks Up Giant Magazine", The New York Times, January 4, 2007.
^ a b Anita Huslin, "Radio One's Losses Grow, Stock Declines", The Washington Post, February 22, 2008.
^ Amanda Ernst, "Giant Magazine Suspends Publication, Moves To Web", Mediabistro, November 30, 2009.
^ a b Dan Frommer, "BlackPlanet Parent Community Connect Sells To Radio One For $38 Million", Business Insider, April 11, 2008.
^ Jeff Clabaugh, "Arlington Capital Partners buys 10 Radio One stations", Washington Business Journal, May 18, 2007.
^ "Reaching Our Audience Wherever They Are", radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One, radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.


External links[edit]

Radio One official website
TV One official website
Reach Media official website
Interactive One official website







v
t
e


Urban One



Key people



Cathy Hughes (Chairman and CEO)





Radio shows



The Tom Joyner Morning Show (via Reach Media under contract)
Russ Parr Morning Show (via AURN)
The Yolanda Adams Morning Show
The Donnie Simpson Show










Radio stations (under the Radio One division)



Mainstream urban



KBFB
KBXX
WCDX
WCKX
WENZ
WERQ-FM
WGPR1
WHHL
WHTA
WIZF
WKYS
WQNC
WQOK





Urban adult
contemporary



KMJQ
WAMJ
WBMO
WDCJ
WDMK
WFXC
WFXK
WKJM
WKJS
WMMJ
WRNB
WTLC-FM
WUMJ
WWIN-FM
WXMG
WZAK





Urban gospel



WJMO
WJYD
WNNL
WPPZ-FM
WPRS-FM
WPZE
WPZR
WPZS
WPZZ
WTLC
WWIN
WYCB





Urban talk



WCHB
WDBZ
WERE
WOL
WOLB





CHR



WNOW-FM
KROI





Rhythmic CHR



WHHH





Rhythmic Oldies



WFUN-FM
WOSF
WOSL





Classic hip hop



KSOC
WPHI-FM
W275BK





China Radio International



WILD





ESPN Radio



WTPS
WXGI













Other






WDNI-CD (Telemundo)
TV One
Interactive One











1 Owned by International Free and Accepted Modern Masons and operated by Radio One under an LMA.










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Urban_One&oldid=788423291"					
Categories: Radio One (company)Radio broadcasting companies of the United StatesCompanies based in MarylandCompanies established in 1980Companies listed on NASDAQ 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 09:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Urban One - Wikipedia





















 






Urban One

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Radio One (company))

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Urban One, Inc.


Type

Public


Traded as
NASDAQ: UONEK


Industry
Media


Founded
1980


Founder
Cathy Hughes


Headquarters
1010 Wayne Avenue
Floor 14
Silver Spring, MD 20910



Area served

United States



Key people

Cathy Hughes
(Chairman)
Alfred C. Liggins III
(President & CEO)


Revenue
 US$ 441.4 million (2014)[1]



Operating income

 US$ 77.2 million (2014)[1]



Net income

 US$ -42.7 million (2014)[1]


Total assets
 US$ 1.4 billion (2014)[2]


Total equity
 US$ 18.9 million (2014)[2]



Number of employees

1,011 (2015)[3]


Divisions
Reach Media
TV One
Interactive One
NewsOne


Website
radio-one.com


Urban One, Inc. is an American media company with holdings in radio, cable television and digital media. Urban One owns and operates 55 radio stations in 16 US markets. It is the largest African American-owned broadcasting company in the US, and the largest radio broadcaster targeting African American and urban listeners.[4] The company's station offerings are primarily hip-hop, rap, R&B, talk radio and news.
As of 2014, the company under the previous name Radio One (until May 2017) was the ninth-highest earning African-American business in the United States.[5]
Urban One owns Reach Media, the largest radio network targeting African American and urban listeners;[6] a majority stake in TV One, a cable television network targeting African American women; and Interactive One, a digital publisher with brands and websites targeting urban users.[7]



Contents


1 History
2 Launches

2.1 TV One
2.2 Interactive One


3 Acquisitions

3.1 Radio stations
3.2 Reach Media
3.3 Print
3.4 Internet


4 Divestures
5 Personalities
6 Stations
7 Milestones
8 See also
9 References
10 External links



History[edit]
Urban One was founded as Radio One in 1980 by Cathy Hughes, a then-recently divorced single mother, with the purchase of the Washington, DC radio station WOL-AM for $995,000.[8][9][10] She changed the station's programming format from all-music to one that examined politics and culture from an African American perspective.[8] Hughes purchased her second station, WMMJ in Washington, seven years later, which began to turn a profit once she converted it into a rhythm and blues station.[9] This established Radio One's early strategy of purchasing small, underperforming radio stations in urban markets and refocusing them to serve the demographics of their communities.[9]
After joining the company in 1985 and managing its day-to-day operations since 1993, Hughes' son, Alfred C. Liggins III, took over as CEO in 1997, with Hughes becoming the board's chairperson.[9][11][12] Under the guidance of recently appointed CEO Liggins, Radio One went public on May 6, 1999, while continuing to be controlled by the family.[13][14] The company's initial public offering was for 6.5 million shares at $24 per share.[12] This made Hughes the first African American woman to chair a public company.[8][11] As of 2010, Hughes and Liggins control 90% of Radio One's voting stock.[15]
In 2001, Radio One expanded into 22 markets, with 18 million listeners, making it the nation's largest urban-market radio broadcasting company.[14] Radio One reached a peak of owning 70 stations in 22 markets in 2007.[16] It is the largest African American-owned-and-operated broadcast company in the US.[11][17]




Radio One logo and slogan used until May 8, 2017.


In 1996, Radio One moved its corporate offices from Washington, DC, to Lanham, Maryland.[18] The company is now based in Silver Spring, Maryland.[8]
Radio One announced that it would rename itself as Urban One, Inc. on January 1, 2017. Each entity will still retain their current brandings (radio stations will still operate under the branding of Radio One, and the same applies to TV One, Interactive One, and Reach Media). This follows the company's move into broader holdings such as the soon-to-open MGM National Harbor casino in Washington DC.[19] The name change was completed on May 8, 2017.[20]
Launches[edit]
TV One[edit]
In January 2003, Radio One and Comcast announced an agreement to a joint venture to create a television network aimed at African Americans ages 25–54.[21] On January 19, 2004, on Martin Luther King Jr.'s birthday, Radio One launched the television station TV One, airing African American entertainment, lifestyle and scripted shows, in 2.2 million households.[4][15][22] Liggins serves as chairman of TV One.[15] Brad Siegel was hired as president of TV One in late 2014.[23]
By the end of 2007, TV One was in 42.2 million homes.[4] In 2011, Comcast and NBC merged, with all Comcast cable holdings subsequently managed by NBC. Also in 2011, Radio One's ownership stake in TV One grew from 36.8% to 50.8%.[24] In 2012, TV One changed its programming, doubling the amount of original content, and changing the logo, while keeping its target audience. As of 2012, TV One reaches 57.4 million US homes.[25]
In March 2015, Radio One announced a deal to buy out Comcast's 47.9% share of TV One for $550 million. To assist with the deal, Radio One refinanced $119 million in outstanding debt, and will ultimately refinance debt totaling approximately $1 billion.[26]
Interactive One[edit]
In 2008, Radio One launched Interactive One, an online portfolio of digital brands, to complement their other media companies. Interactive One operates numerous digital brands, including News One, The Urban Daily and Hello Beautiful.[27][28] In 2011, Interactive One entered into an editorial and sales partnership with NBC News, aligning News One with NBC's The Grio.[29] As of 2013, Interactive One also has a partnership with Global Grind, a website founded by Russell Simmons and focused on pop culture and music content for African American and Hispanic audiences.[30] In 2015, Interactive One launched HB Studios, a video production studio focused on creating scripted and unscripted programming about women and the diversity of their experiences. The programming will be featured on the iOne Women Channel, HelloBeautiful.com, YouTube and Facebook.[31][32]
As of 2011, Interactive was the largest network of owned and operated sites aimed at an African American audience.[33] As of 2014, Interactive One reaches over 18 million unique monthly users on its platform through over 80 national and local brands.[34]
Acquisitions[edit]
Radio stations[edit]
In 1995, Radio One purchased WKYS-FM in Washington, DC, for $34 million, and also entered the Atlanta market by purchasing WHAT-FM for $4.5 million.[18] In 1997, the company entered the Philadelphia market with its purchase of WPHI-FM for $20 million. The company added numerous stations in the second half of the 1990s, including stations in Atlanta, St. Louis, Boston, Cleveland, Richmond, San Francisco, Detroit and Boston.[13][18][35]
In 2000, Radio One purchased 12 stations for approximately $1.3 billion from Clear Channel, bringing Radio One into Los Angeles, Dallas, Houston and Miami, along with stations in Cleveland and Greenville, South Carolina. Soon after, Radio One added two more Dallas stations.[9][18][36] In total, the company added 21 radio stations in 2000.[18]
In February 2001, Radio One purchased rival company Blue Chip Broadcasting for approximately $135 million ($45 million cash with the remainder in stock). The purchase included 15 radio stations owned and operated by Cincinnati-based Blue Chip in Ohio, Minnesota and Kentucky. Earlier that month, Radio One had also purchased another Dallas radio station for $52.5 million.[37] In June 2001, Radio One purchased Georgia radio station WPEZ-FM from US Broadcasting for $55 million.[38]
In 2004, Radio One purchased KRTS-FM in Houston for approximately $72.5 million in cash, giving it three stations in the Houston market.[39] Also in 2004, Radio One purchased country station WSNJ in Bridgeton, New Jersey, for $35 million. It had been on the air since 1937 and family-owned by the Ed and Katherine Bold family for over 50 years.[40]
In 2011, Radio One changed stations in Houston, Cincinnati and Columbus, Ohio, from African American to general interest formats, due to low ratings.[41]
Reach Media[edit]
In November 2004, Radio One acquired a 53% stake in Reach Media, a Texas-based media company owned by radio host Tom Joyner, for $56.1 million in cash and stock.[42][43] The deal also gave Radio One ownership rights to Joyner's syndicated Tom Joyner Morning Show, which was at the time airing on 115 stations to 8 million listeners; and news website BlackAmericaWeb.com, which had at the time approximately 800,000 members, giving Radio One its first strong Internet presence.[43]
In 2005, Radio One teamed up with Reach Media to launch a new African American-centered talk radio network, with programming hosted by the Reverend Al Sharpton, to be broadcast on up to 10 of Radio One's stations, as well as stations owned by other companies.[13] In December 2012, under a new deal, Radio One increased its ownership stake in Reach Media to 80%.[44] That same month, Radio One announced that the following year, it would merge its Syndication One urban programming lineup with Reach Media.[45][46]
Print[edit]
In January 2007, Radio One purchased GIANT magazine for $275,000.[47][48] In December 2009, the company suspended publication of the print version of the bi-monthly magazine, relaunching it online as GIANTLife.com. The website is a part of the Interactive One network.[49]
Internet[edit]
In 2008, Radio One acquired social networking firm Community Connect, the parent company of BlackPlanet, AsianAvenue and MiGente, for $38 million. BlackPlanet at the time had 20 million members and was the nation's fourth-most visited social networking site.[50]
Divestures[edit]
From 2006 through the beginning of 2008, Radio One sold nearly $150 million in assets, primarily underperforming radio stations.[48] In 2007, Radio One sold 10 stations to Main Line Broadcasting for approximately $76 million in cash. The stations sold were in Radio One's markets with the smallest African American populations. The sale decreased the number of Radio One's stations from 71 to 61.[51]
Personalities[edit]
Radio One operates a variety of syndicated shows, with hosts including Tom Joyner, Russ Parr, Yolanda Adams, Rickey Smiley, Bishop T.D. Jakes, DL Hughley and the Reverend Al Sharpton.[52]
Stations[edit]
As of October 2015, Urban One's Radio One division operates 53 radio stations in 16 markets.[53]


Market
Station and Frequency
Owned since
Format
Notes


Atlanta
WAMJ 107.5 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WHTA 107.9 FM
2001
Mainstream urban



WPZE 102.5 FM
2004
Urban gospel



WUMJ 97.5 FM
1995
Classic hip-hop
Simulcast of W275BK


Baltimore
WERQ-FM 92.3 FM
1993
Mainstream urban



WOLB 1010 AM

News/Talk



WWIN 1400 AM

Urban gospel



WWIN-FM 95.9 FM
1992
Urban adult contemporary



Boston
WILD 1090 AM
2001
News/Talk



Charlotte
WOSF 105.3 FM
2012
Urban oldies



WQNC 92.7 FM

Urban contemporary



WPZS 100.9 FM
2004
Urban gospel



Cincinnati
WOSL 100.3 FM
2006
Urban Oldies



WDBZ 1230 AM
2007
Talk/Urban gospel



WIZF 101.1 FM

Urban contemporary



Cleveland
WENZ 107.9 FM
1999
Mainstream urban



WERE 1490 AM
2000
News/Talk



WJMO 1300 AM
1999
Urban gospel



WZAK 93.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary



Columbus, Ohio
WCKX 107.5 FM

Mainstream Urban



WJYD 107.1 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban Gospel
Licensed to Circleville, Ohio


WBMO 106.3 FM
late 1990s
Classic Hip-Hop



WXMG 95.5 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban adult contemporary
Licensed to Lancaster, Ohio


Dallas/Fort Worth
KBFB 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KSOC 94.5 FM
2002
Classic hip-hop



Detroit
WCHB 1200 AM
1998
News/Talk
Has LP simulcast on W260CB 99.9 FM


WDMK 105.9 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WPZR 102.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WGPR 107.5 FM
2011*
Mainstream urban
*Under LMA with International Free and Accepted Modern Masons


Houston
KBXX 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KMJQ 102.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
Operates an urban gospel format on KMJQ-HD2


KROI 92.1 FM
2004
CHR/Top-40



Indianapolis
WHHH 96.3 FM

Rhythmic contemporary



WNOW-FM 100.9 FM

CHR/Top 40



WTLC 1310 AM
2001
Urban gospel



WTLC-FM 106.7 FM
2001
Urban adult contemporary



Philadelphia
WPHI-FM 103.9 FM
1996
Classic hip-hop



WPPZ-FM 107.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WRNB 100.3 FM
2001
Urban oldies



Raleigh/Durham
WFXC 107.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
both WFXC and WFXK are simulcasts


WFXK 104.3 FM


WNNL 103.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WQOK 97.5 FM
2000
Mainstream urban



Richmond, Virginia
WCDX 92.1 FM

Mainstream urban



WKJM 99.3 FM

Urban adult contemporary
both WKJM and WKJS are simulcasts


WKJS 105.7 FM


WPZZ 104.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WTPS 1240 AM
late 1990s
News/Talk



St. Louis
WFUN-FM 95.5 FM
1999
Urban oldies



WHHL 104.1 FM
2005
Mainstream urban



Washington, DC
WKYS 93.9 FM
early 1990s (?)
Urban contemporary



WMMJ 102.3 FM
1987
Urban adult contemporary



WOL 1450 AM
1980
News/Talk
First property of Radio One and its flagship


WPRS-FM 104.1 FM
2006
Urban gospel



WYCB 1340 AM

Urban gospel



Milestones[edit]


Year
Event


1980
Radio One founded by Cathy Hughes.[8]


1997
Alfred C. Liggins III succeeds Hughes as president and CEO.[9]


1999
Goes public on NASDAQ, trading as ROIA (later changed to ROIAK).[8]


2000
Acquires 12 Clear Channel stations.[18]


2004
TV One launched in joint venture with Comcast.[8]


Purchases a majority stake in Reach Media.[42]


2008
Launches Interactive One.[27]


Acquires social networking firm Community Connect.[50]


2015
Announces deal to buy out Comcast's share of TV One.[26]


See also[edit]


African American portal
Radio portal



Inner City Broadcasting Corporation
TV One
Interactive One
Cathy Hughes
Tom Joyner

References[edit]


^ a b c Radio One Inc. Income Statement, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b Radio One Inc. Balance Sheet, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ Radio One Inc. Profile, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b c Felicia R. Lee, "A Network for Blacks With Sense of Mission", The New York Times, December 11, 2007.
^ "BE 100's 2014". Black Enterprise. Retrieved 2016-11-22. 
^ "Radio One increases stake in Reach Media, makes plans to launch a new Urban network", Target Market News, December 3, 2012.
^ "Blacks In Wax Features Radio One Founder Cathy Hughes", New Pittsburgh Courier, September 26, 2014.
^ a b c d e f g Steven Overly, "With purchase of radio station WOL in 1980, Cathy Hughes launched a media empire", The Washington Post, August 11, 2014.
^ a b c d e f Clea Simon, "Mining an Untapped Market, Radio One Becomes a Force", The New York Times, December 25, 2000.
^ Chandrani Ghosh, "The Comeback Queen", Forbes, September 20, 1999.
^ a b c Jessie Carney Smith, ed., Black Firsts: 4,000 Ground-Breaking and Pioneering Historical Events, Canton, MI: Visible Ink Press, 2003, pp. 63-64.
^ a b Robyn D. Clarke, "High-Frequency Profits", Black Enterprise, June 2000.
^ a b c Clea Simon, "WILD to air new African-American talk-radio network", Boston Globe, October 29, 2005.
^ a b "Radio One's Number One", Wharton Alumni Magazine, Spring 2007.
^ a b c Joe Flint, "Latest protestor of Comcast – NBC deal plays race card and has ex-FCC chairman on board", Los Angeles Times, April 27, 2010.
^ Gail Mitchell, "Q&A: Cathy Hughes", Billboard, December 3, 2005, p. 25.
^ Janean Chun, "Cathy Hughes, Radio One: From Teen Mom to Media Mogul", Huffington Post, September 26, 2012.
^ a b c d e f "Radio One, Inc. History", Funding Universe. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One To Rename As Urban One Inc. - Radio Insight (published November 3, 2016)
^ Radio One Completes Name Change To Urban One - Radio Insight (published May 8, 2017)
^ Seth Schiesel, "Comcast and Radio One in TV Joint Venture", The New York Times, January 13, 2003.
^ Rob Owen, "Tuned In: TV One aims to be BET for grown-ups", Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, January 12, 2006.
^ "Brad Siegel Named TV One President", Deadline.com, December 17, 2014.
^ Wayne Barrett, "Al Sharpton's Radio Power Play", The Daily Beast, July 28, 2011.
^ Sijie Wang, "TV One Rebrands Around Storytelling", The Hollywood Reporter, June 20, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One Gears Up for TV One Deal", Inside Radio, March 20, 2015.
^ a b Nicholas Carlson, "Former AOL Entertainment Boss Mike Rich Goes To Interactive One", Business Insider, July 9, 2010.
^ C. Daniel Baker, "Interactive One Studios Adds Russell Simmons' GlobalGrind.com to its Roster", Black Enterprise, April 15, 2013.
^ Tanzina Vega, "Black News In New Focus", The New York Times, July 11, 2011.
^ William Launder, "Digital Marketer Links Up With Russell Simmons", The Wall Street Journal, April 15, 2013.
^ Todd Spangler, "Interactive One Launches Digital Studio to Produce Series for Women of Color", Variety, February 11, 2015.
^ Jessica Klein, "Interactive One Will Launch HB Studios with Doc 'Women of Color'", Video Ink, February 11, 2015.
^ Matthew Flamm, "Urban websites face off", Crain's New York Business, June 12, 2011.
^ "Interactive One Launches Elev8, a New Site Devoted to Uplifting", PR Newswire, October 27, 2013.
^ "Radio One to Acquire Another Philadelphia Station", The New York Times, December 4, 1999.
^ "Radio One to Buy 12 Clear Channel Stations", The New York Times, March 14, 2000.
^ "Radio One Buying Rival Blue Chip Broadcasting", The New York Times, February 9, 2001.
^ "Radio Broadcaster for Black Listeners to Buy Station", The New York Times, June 27, 2001.
^ "Radio One Acquires Third Station in Houston Market", The New York Times, May 25, 2004.
^ G. Patrick Pawling, "Vintage Radio, Down to Farm Reports and School Menus, Is Signing Off", The New York Times, February 1, 2004.
^ Ben Sisario, "A Radio Merger in New York Reflects a Shifting Industry", The New York Times, April 29, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One to boost Joyner", Los Angeles Times, November 23, 2004.
^ a b Andrea K. Walker, "Radio One to acquire Joyner company", Baltimore Sun, November 23, 2004.
^ Ann Brown, "Radio Play: Radio One Increases Investment in Tom Joyner's Reach Media", Madame Noire, December 5, 2012.
^ "Syndication One To Consolidate With Reach Media", All Access, December 3, 2012.
^ "Alfred Liggins and David Kantor On The Radio One Reach Media Merger", The Urban Daily, March 20, 2013.
^ "Radio One Picks Up Giant Magazine", The New York Times, January 4, 2007.
^ a b Anita Huslin, "Radio One's Losses Grow, Stock Declines", The Washington Post, February 22, 2008.
^ Amanda Ernst, "Giant Magazine Suspends Publication, Moves To Web", Mediabistro, November 30, 2009.
^ a b Dan Frommer, "BlackPlanet Parent Community Connect Sells To Radio One For $38 Million", Business Insider, April 11, 2008.
^ Jeff Clabaugh, "Arlington Capital Partners buys 10 Radio One stations", Washington Business Journal, May 18, 2007.
^ "Reaching Our Audience Wherever They Are", radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One, radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.


External links[edit]

Radio One official website
TV One official website
Reach Media official website
Interactive One official website







v
t
e


Urban One



Key people



Cathy Hughes (Chairman and CEO)





Radio shows



The Tom Joyner Morning Show (via Reach Media under contract)
Russ Parr Morning Show (via AURN)
The Yolanda Adams Morning Show
The Donnie Simpson Show










Radio stations (under the Radio One division)



Mainstream urban



KBFB
KBXX
WCDX
WCKX
WENZ
WERQ-FM
WGPR1
WHHL
WHTA
WIZF
WKYS
WQNC
WQOK





Urban adult
contemporary



KMJQ
WAMJ
WBMO
WDCJ
WDMK
WFXC
WFXK
WKJM
WKJS
WMMJ
WRNB
WTLC-FM
WUMJ
WWIN-FM
WXMG
WZAK





Urban gospel



WJMO
WJYD
WNNL
WPPZ-FM
WPRS-FM
WPZE
WPZR
WPZS
WPZZ
WTLC
WWIN
WYCB





Urban talk



WCHB
WDBZ
WERE
WOL
WOLB





CHR



WNOW-FM
KROI





Rhythmic CHR



WHHH





Rhythmic Oldies



WFUN-FM
WOSF
WOSL





Classic hip hop



KSOC
WPHI-FM
W275BK





China Radio International



WILD





ESPN Radio



WTPS
WXGI













Other






WDNI-CD (Telemundo)
TV One
Interactive One











1 Owned by International Free and Accepted Modern Masons and operated by Radio One under an LMA.










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Urban_One&oldid=788423291"					
Categories: Radio One (company)Radio broadcasting companies of the United StatesCompanies based in MarylandCompanies established in 1980Companies listed on NASDAQ 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 09:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Urban One - Wikipedia





















 






Urban One

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Radio One (company))

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Urban One, Inc.


Type

Public


Traded as
NASDAQ: UONEK


Industry
Media


Founded
1980


Founder
Cathy Hughes


Headquarters
1010 Wayne Avenue
Floor 14
Silver Spring, MD 20910



Area served

United States



Key people

Cathy Hughes
(Chairman)
Alfred C. Liggins III
(President & CEO)


Revenue
 US$ 441.4 million (2014)[1]



Operating income

 US$ 77.2 million (2014)[1]



Net income

 US$ -42.7 million (2014)[1]


Total assets
 US$ 1.4 billion (2014)[2]


Total equity
 US$ 18.9 million (2014)[2]



Number of employees

1,011 (2015)[3]


Divisions
Reach Media
TV One
Interactive One
NewsOne


Website
radio-one.com


Urban One, Inc. is an American media company with holdings in radio, cable television and digital media. Urban One owns and operates 55 radio stations in 16 US markets. It is the largest African American-owned broadcasting company in the US, and the largest radio broadcaster targeting African American and urban listeners.[4] The company's station offerings are primarily hip-hop, rap, R&B, talk radio and news.
As of 2014, the company under the previous name Radio One (until May 2017) was the ninth-highest earning African-American business in the United States.[5]
Urban One owns Reach Media, the largest radio network targeting African American and urban listeners;[6] a majority stake in TV One, a cable television network targeting African American women; and Interactive One, a digital publisher with brands and websites targeting urban users.[7]



Contents


1 History
2 Launches

2.1 TV One
2.2 Interactive One


3 Acquisitions

3.1 Radio stations
3.2 Reach Media
3.3 Print
3.4 Internet


4 Divestures
5 Personalities
6 Stations
7 Milestones
8 See also
9 References
10 External links



History[edit]
Urban One was founded as Radio One in 1980 by Cathy Hughes, a then-recently divorced single mother, with the purchase of the Washington, DC radio station WOL-AM for $995,000.[8][9][10] She changed the station's programming format from all-music to one that examined politics and culture from an African American perspective.[8] Hughes purchased her second station, WMMJ in Washington, seven years later, which began to turn a profit once she converted it into a rhythm and blues station.[9] This established Radio One's early strategy of purchasing small, underperforming radio stations in urban markets and refocusing them to serve the demographics of their communities.[9]
After joining the company in 1985 and managing its day-to-day operations since 1993, Hughes' son, Alfred C. Liggins III, took over as CEO in 1997, with Hughes becoming the board's chairperson.[9][11][12] Under the guidance of recently appointed CEO Liggins, Radio One went public on May 6, 1999, while continuing to be controlled by the family.[13][14] The company's initial public offering was for 6.5 million shares at $24 per share.[12] This made Hughes the first African American woman to chair a public company.[8][11] As of 2010, Hughes and Liggins control 90% of Radio One's voting stock.[15]
In 2001, Radio One expanded into 22 markets, with 18 million listeners, making it the nation's largest urban-market radio broadcasting company.[14] Radio One reached a peak of owning 70 stations in 22 markets in 2007.[16] It is the largest African American-owned-and-operated broadcast company in the US.[11][17]




Radio One logo and slogan used until May 8, 2017.


In 1996, Radio One moved its corporate offices from Washington, DC, to Lanham, Maryland.[18] The company is now based in Silver Spring, Maryland.[8]
Radio One announced that it would rename itself as Urban One, Inc. on January 1, 2017. Each entity will still retain their current brandings (radio stations will still operate under the branding of Radio One, and the same applies to TV One, Interactive One, and Reach Media). This follows the company's move into broader holdings such as the soon-to-open MGM National Harbor casino in Washington DC.[19] The name change was completed on May 8, 2017.[20]
Launches[edit]
TV One[edit]
In January 2003, Radio One and Comcast announced an agreement to a joint venture to create a television network aimed at African Americans ages 25–54.[21] On January 19, 2004, on Martin Luther King Jr.'s birthday, Radio One launched the television station TV One, airing African American entertainment, lifestyle and scripted shows, in 2.2 million households.[4][15][22] Liggins serves as chairman of TV One.[15] Brad Siegel was hired as president of TV One in late 2014.[23]
By the end of 2007, TV One was in 42.2 million homes.[4] In 2011, Comcast and NBC merged, with all Comcast cable holdings subsequently managed by NBC. Also in 2011, Radio One's ownership stake in TV One grew from 36.8% to 50.8%.[24] In 2012, TV One changed its programming, doubling the amount of original content, and changing the logo, while keeping its target audience. As of 2012, TV One reaches 57.4 million US homes.[25]
In March 2015, Radio One announced a deal to buy out Comcast's 47.9% share of TV One for $550 million. To assist with the deal, Radio One refinanced $119 million in outstanding debt, and will ultimately refinance debt totaling approximately $1 billion.[26]
Interactive One[edit]
In 2008, Radio One launched Interactive One, an online portfolio of digital brands, to complement their other media companies. Interactive One operates numerous digital brands, including News One, The Urban Daily and Hello Beautiful.[27][28] In 2011, Interactive One entered into an editorial and sales partnership with NBC News, aligning News One with NBC's The Grio.[29] As of 2013, Interactive One also has a partnership with Global Grind, a website founded by Russell Simmons and focused on pop culture and music content for African American and Hispanic audiences.[30] In 2015, Interactive One launched HB Studios, a video production studio focused on creating scripted and unscripted programming about women and the diversity of their experiences. The programming will be featured on the iOne Women Channel, HelloBeautiful.com, YouTube and Facebook.[31][32]
As of 2011, Interactive was the largest network of owned and operated sites aimed at an African American audience.[33] As of 2014, Interactive One reaches over 18 million unique monthly users on its platform through over 80 national and local brands.[34]
Acquisitions[edit]
Radio stations[edit]
In 1995, Radio One purchased WKYS-FM in Washington, DC, for $34 million, and also entered the Atlanta market by purchasing WHAT-FM for $4.5 million.[18] In 1997, the company entered the Philadelphia market with its purchase of WPHI-FM for $20 million. The company added numerous stations in the second half of the 1990s, including stations in Atlanta, St. Louis, Boston, Cleveland, Richmond, San Francisco, Detroit and Boston.[13][18][35]
In 2000, Radio One purchased 12 stations for approximately $1.3 billion from Clear Channel, bringing Radio One into Los Angeles, Dallas, Houston and Miami, along with stations in Cleveland and Greenville, South Carolina. Soon after, Radio One added two more Dallas stations.[9][18][36] In total, the company added 21 radio stations in 2000.[18]
In February 2001, Radio One purchased rival company Blue Chip Broadcasting for approximately $135 million ($45 million cash with the remainder in stock). The purchase included 15 radio stations owned and operated by Cincinnati-based Blue Chip in Ohio, Minnesota and Kentucky. Earlier that month, Radio One had also purchased another Dallas radio station for $52.5 million.[37] In June 2001, Radio One purchased Georgia radio station WPEZ-FM from US Broadcasting for $55 million.[38]
In 2004, Radio One purchased KRTS-FM in Houston for approximately $72.5 million in cash, giving it three stations in the Houston market.[39] Also in 2004, Radio One purchased country station WSNJ in Bridgeton, New Jersey, for $35 million. It had been on the air since 1937 and family-owned by the Ed and Katherine Bold family for over 50 years.[40]
In 2011, Radio One changed stations in Houston, Cincinnati and Columbus, Ohio, from African American to general interest formats, due to low ratings.[41]
Reach Media[edit]
In November 2004, Radio One acquired a 53% stake in Reach Media, a Texas-based media company owned by radio host Tom Joyner, for $56.1 million in cash and stock.[42][43] The deal also gave Radio One ownership rights to Joyner's syndicated Tom Joyner Morning Show, which was at the time airing on 115 stations to 8 million listeners; and news website BlackAmericaWeb.com, which had at the time approximately 800,000 members, giving Radio One its first strong Internet presence.[43]
In 2005, Radio One teamed up with Reach Media to launch a new African American-centered talk radio network, with programming hosted by the Reverend Al Sharpton, to be broadcast on up to 10 of Radio One's stations, as well as stations owned by other companies.[13] In December 2012, under a new deal, Radio One increased its ownership stake in Reach Media to 80%.[44] That same month, Radio One announced that the following year, it would merge its Syndication One urban programming lineup with Reach Media.[45][46]
Print[edit]
In January 2007, Radio One purchased GIANT magazine for $275,000.[47][48] In December 2009, the company suspended publication of the print version of the bi-monthly magazine, relaunching it online as GIANTLife.com. The website is a part of the Interactive One network.[49]
Internet[edit]
In 2008, Radio One acquired social networking firm Community Connect, the parent company of BlackPlanet, AsianAvenue and MiGente, for $38 million. BlackPlanet at the time had 20 million members and was the nation's fourth-most visited social networking site.[50]
Divestures[edit]
From 2006 through the beginning of 2008, Radio One sold nearly $150 million in assets, primarily underperforming radio stations.[48] In 2007, Radio One sold 10 stations to Main Line Broadcasting for approximately $76 million in cash. The stations sold were in Radio One's markets with the smallest African American populations. The sale decreased the number of Radio One's stations from 71 to 61.[51]
Personalities[edit]
Radio One operates a variety of syndicated shows, with hosts including Tom Joyner, Russ Parr, Yolanda Adams, Rickey Smiley, Bishop T.D. Jakes, DL Hughley and the Reverend Al Sharpton.[52]
Stations[edit]
As of October 2015, Urban One's Radio One division operates 53 radio stations in 16 markets.[53]


Market
Station and Frequency
Owned since
Format
Notes


Atlanta
WAMJ 107.5 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WHTA 107.9 FM
2001
Mainstream urban



WPZE 102.5 FM
2004
Urban gospel



WUMJ 97.5 FM
1995
Classic hip-hop
Simulcast of W275BK


Baltimore
WERQ-FM 92.3 FM
1993
Mainstream urban



WOLB 1010 AM

News/Talk



WWIN 1400 AM

Urban gospel



WWIN-FM 95.9 FM
1992
Urban adult contemporary



Boston
WILD 1090 AM
2001
News/Talk



Charlotte
WOSF 105.3 FM
2012
Urban oldies



WQNC 92.7 FM

Urban contemporary



WPZS 100.9 FM
2004
Urban gospel



Cincinnati
WOSL 100.3 FM
2006
Urban Oldies



WDBZ 1230 AM
2007
Talk/Urban gospel



WIZF 101.1 FM

Urban contemporary



Cleveland
WENZ 107.9 FM
1999
Mainstream urban



WERE 1490 AM
2000
News/Talk



WJMO 1300 AM
1999
Urban gospel



WZAK 93.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary



Columbus, Ohio
WCKX 107.5 FM

Mainstream Urban



WJYD 107.1 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban Gospel
Licensed to Circleville, Ohio


WBMO 106.3 FM
late 1990s
Classic Hip-Hop



WXMG 95.5 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban adult contemporary
Licensed to Lancaster, Ohio


Dallas/Fort Worth
KBFB 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KSOC 94.5 FM
2002
Classic hip-hop



Detroit
WCHB 1200 AM
1998
News/Talk
Has LP simulcast on W260CB 99.9 FM


WDMK 105.9 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WPZR 102.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WGPR 107.5 FM
2011*
Mainstream urban
*Under LMA with International Free and Accepted Modern Masons


Houston
KBXX 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KMJQ 102.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
Operates an urban gospel format on KMJQ-HD2


KROI 92.1 FM
2004
CHR/Top-40



Indianapolis
WHHH 96.3 FM

Rhythmic contemporary



WNOW-FM 100.9 FM

CHR/Top 40



WTLC 1310 AM
2001
Urban gospel



WTLC-FM 106.7 FM
2001
Urban adult contemporary



Philadelphia
WPHI-FM 103.9 FM
1996
Classic hip-hop



WPPZ-FM 107.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WRNB 100.3 FM
2001
Urban oldies



Raleigh/Durham
WFXC 107.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
both WFXC and WFXK are simulcasts


WFXK 104.3 FM


WNNL 103.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WQOK 97.5 FM
2000
Mainstream urban



Richmond, Virginia
WCDX 92.1 FM

Mainstream urban



WKJM 99.3 FM

Urban adult contemporary
both WKJM and WKJS are simulcasts


WKJS 105.7 FM


WPZZ 104.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WTPS 1240 AM
late 1990s
News/Talk



St. Louis
WFUN-FM 95.5 FM
1999
Urban oldies



WHHL 104.1 FM
2005
Mainstream urban



Washington, DC
WKYS 93.9 FM
early 1990s (?)
Urban contemporary



WMMJ 102.3 FM
1987
Urban adult contemporary



WOL 1450 AM
1980
News/Talk
First property of Radio One and its flagship


WPRS-FM 104.1 FM
2006
Urban gospel



WYCB 1340 AM

Urban gospel



Milestones[edit]


Year
Event


1980
Radio One founded by Cathy Hughes.[8]


1997
Alfred C. Liggins III succeeds Hughes as president and CEO.[9]


1999
Goes public on NASDAQ, trading as ROIA (later changed to ROIAK).[8]


2000
Acquires 12 Clear Channel stations.[18]


2004
TV One launched in joint venture with Comcast.[8]


Purchases a majority stake in Reach Media.[42]


2008
Launches Interactive One.[27]


Acquires social networking firm Community Connect.[50]


2015
Announces deal to buy out Comcast's share of TV One.[26]


See also[edit]


African American portal
Radio portal



Inner City Broadcasting Corporation
TV One
Interactive One
Cathy Hughes
Tom Joyner

References[edit]


^ a b c Radio One Inc. Income Statement, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b Radio One Inc. Balance Sheet, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ Radio One Inc. Profile, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b c Felicia R. Lee, "A Network for Blacks With Sense of Mission", The New York Times, December 11, 2007.
^ "BE 100's 2014". Black Enterprise. Retrieved 2016-11-22. 
^ "Radio One increases stake in Reach Media, makes plans to launch a new Urban network", Target Market News, December 3, 2012.
^ "Blacks In Wax Features Radio One Founder Cathy Hughes", New Pittsburgh Courier, September 26, 2014.
^ a b c d e f g Steven Overly, "With purchase of radio station WOL in 1980, Cathy Hughes launched a media empire", The Washington Post, August 11, 2014.
^ a b c d e f Clea Simon, "Mining an Untapped Market, Radio One Becomes a Force", The New York Times, December 25, 2000.
^ Chandrani Ghosh, "The Comeback Queen", Forbes, September 20, 1999.
^ a b c Jessie Carney Smith, ed., Black Firsts: 4,000 Ground-Breaking and Pioneering Historical Events, Canton, MI: Visible Ink Press, 2003, pp. 63-64.
^ a b Robyn D. Clarke, "High-Frequency Profits", Black Enterprise, June 2000.
^ a b c Clea Simon, "WILD to air new African-American talk-radio network", Boston Globe, October 29, 2005.
^ a b "Radio One's Number One", Wharton Alumni Magazine, Spring 2007.
^ a b c Joe Flint, "Latest protestor of Comcast – NBC deal plays race card and has ex-FCC chairman on board", Los Angeles Times, April 27, 2010.
^ Gail Mitchell, "Q&A: Cathy Hughes", Billboard, December 3, 2005, p. 25.
^ Janean Chun, "Cathy Hughes, Radio One: From Teen Mom to Media Mogul", Huffington Post, September 26, 2012.
^ a b c d e f "Radio One, Inc. History", Funding Universe. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One To Rename As Urban One Inc. - Radio Insight (published November 3, 2016)
^ Radio One Completes Name Change To Urban One - Radio Insight (published May 8, 2017)
^ Seth Schiesel, "Comcast and Radio One in TV Joint Venture", The New York Times, January 13, 2003.
^ Rob Owen, "Tuned In: TV One aims to be BET for grown-ups", Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, January 12, 2006.
^ "Brad Siegel Named TV One President", Deadline.com, December 17, 2014.
^ Wayne Barrett, "Al Sharpton's Radio Power Play", The Daily Beast, July 28, 2011.
^ Sijie Wang, "TV One Rebrands Around Storytelling", The Hollywood Reporter, June 20, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One Gears Up for TV One Deal", Inside Radio, March 20, 2015.
^ a b Nicholas Carlson, "Former AOL Entertainment Boss Mike Rich Goes To Interactive One", Business Insider, July 9, 2010.
^ C. Daniel Baker, "Interactive One Studios Adds Russell Simmons' GlobalGrind.com to its Roster", Black Enterprise, April 15, 2013.
^ Tanzina Vega, "Black News In New Focus", The New York Times, July 11, 2011.
^ William Launder, "Digital Marketer Links Up With Russell Simmons", The Wall Street Journal, April 15, 2013.
^ Todd Spangler, "Interactive One Launches Digital Studio to Produce Series for Women of Color", Variety, February 11, 2015.
^ Jessica Klein, "Interactive One Will Launch HB Studios with Doc 'Women of Color'", Video Ink, February 11, 2015.
^ Matthew Flamm, "Urban websites face off", Crain's New York Business, June 12, 2011.
^ "Interactive One Launches Elev8, a New Site Devoted to Uplifting", PR Newswire, October 27, 2013.
^ "Radio One to Acquire Another Philadelphia Station", The New York Times, December 4, 1999.
^ "Radio One to Buy 12 Clear Channel Stations", The New York Times, March 14, 2000.
^ "Radio One Buying Rival Blue Chip Broadcasting", The New York Times, February 9, 2001.
^ "Radio Broadcaster for Black Listeners to Buy Station", The New York Times, June 27, 2001.
^ "Radio One Acquires Third Station in Houston Market", The New York Times, May 25, 2004.
^ G. Patrick Pawling, "Vintage Radio, Down to Farm Reports and School Menus, Is Signing Off", The New York Times, February 1, 2004.
^ Ben Sisario, "A Radio Merger in New York Reflects a Shifting Industry", The New York Times, April 29, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One to boost Joyner", Los Angeles Times, November 23, 2004.
^ a b Andrea K. Walker, "Radio One to acquire Joyner company", Baltimore Sun, November 23, 2004.
^ Ann Brown, "Radio Play: Radio One Increases Investment in Tom Joyner's Reach Media", Madame Noire, December 5, 2012.
^ "Syndication One To Consolidate With Reach Media", All Access, December 3, 2012.
^ "Alfred Liggins and David Kantor On The Radio One Reach Media Merger", The Urban Daily, March 20, 2013.
^ "Radio One Picks Up Giant Magazine", The New York Times, January 4, 2007.
^ a b Anita Huslin, "Radio One's Losses Grow, Stock Declines", The Washington Post, February 22, 2008.
^ Amanda Ernst, "Giant Magazine Suspends Publication, Moves To Web", Mediabistro, November 30, 2009.
^ a b Dan Frommer, "BlackPlanet Parent Community Connect Sells To Radio One For $38 Million", Business Insider, April 11, 2008.
^ Jeff Clabaugh, "Arlington Capital Partners buys 10 Radio One stations", Washington Business Journal, May 18, 2007.
^ "Reaching Our Audience Wherever They Are", radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One, radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.


External links[edit]

Radio One official website
TV One official website
Reach Media official website
Interactive One official website







v
t
e


Urban One



Key people



Cathy Hughes (Chairman and CEO)





Radio shows



The Tom Joyner Morning Show (via Reach Media under contract)
Russ Parr Morning Show (via AURN)
The Yolanda Adams Morning Show
The Donnie Simpson Show










Radio stations (under the Radio One division)



Mainstream urban



KBFB
KBXX
WCDX
WCKX
WENZ
WERQ-FM
WGPR1
WHHL
WHTA
WIZF
WKYS
WQNC
WQOK





Urban adult
contemporary



KMJQ
WAMJ
WBMO
WDCJ
WDMK
WFXC
WFXK
WKJM
WKJS
WMMJ
WRNB
WTLC-FM
WUMJ
WWIN-FM
WXMG
WZAK





Urban gospel



WJMO
WJYD
WNNL
WPPZ-FM
WPRS-FM
WPZE
WPZR
WPZS
WPZZ
WTLC
WWIN
WYCB





Urban talk



WCHB
WDBZ
WERE
WOL
WOLB





CHR



WNOW-FM
KROI





Rhythmic CHR



WHHH





Rhythmic Oldies



WFUN-FM
WOSF
WOSL





Classic hip hop



KSOC
WPHI-FM
W275BK





China Radio International



WILD





ESPN Radio



WTPS
WXGI













Other






WDNI-CD (Telemundo)
TV One
Interactive One











1 Owned by International Free and Accepted Modern Masons and operated by Radio One under an LMA.










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Urban_One&oldid=788423291"					
Categories: Radio One (company)Radio broadcasting companies of the United StatesCompanies based in MarylandCompanies established in 1980Companies listed on NASDAQ 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 09:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Urban One - Wikipedia





















 






Urban One

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Radio One (company))

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Urban One, Inc.


Type

Public


Traded as
NASDAQ: UONEK


Industry
Media


Founded
1980


Founder
Cathy Hughes


Headquarters
1010 Wayne Avenue
Floor 14
Silver Spring, MD 20910



Area served

United States



Key people

Cathy Hughes
(Chairman)
Alfred C. Liggins III
(President & CEO)


Revenue
 US$ 441.4 million (2014)[1]



Operating income

 US$ 77.2 million (2014)[1]



Net income

 US$ -42.7 million (2014)[1]


Total assets
 US$ 1.4 billion (2014)[2]


Total equity
 US$ 18.9 million (2014)[2]



Number of employees

1,011 (2015)[3]


Divisions
Reach Media
TV One
Interactive One
NewsOne


Website
radio-one.com


Urban One, Inc. is an American media company with holdings in radio, cable television and digital media. Urban One owns and operates 55 radio stations in 16 US markets. It is the largest African American-owned broadcasting company in the US, and the largest radio broadcaster targeting African American and urban listeners.[4] The company's station offerings are primarily hip-hop, rap, R&B, talk radio and news.
As of 2014, the company under the previous name Radio One (until May 2017) was the ninth-highest earning African-American business in the United States.[5]
Urban One owns Reach Media, the largest radio network targeting African American and urban listeners;[6] a majority stake in TV One, a cable television network targeting African American women; and Interactive One, a digital publisher with brands and websites targeting urban users.[7]



Contents


1 History
2 Launches

2.1 TV One
2.2 Interactive One


3 Acquisitions

3.1 Radio stations
3.2 Reach Media
3.3 Print
3.4 Internet


4 Divestures
5 Personalities
6 Stations
7 Milestones
8 See also
9 References
10 External links



History[edit]
Urban One was founded as Radio One in 1980 by Cathy Hughes, a then-recently divorced single mother, with the purchase of the Washington, DC radio station WOL-AM for $995,000.[8][9][10] She changed the station's programming format from all-music to one that examined politics and culture from an African American perspective.[8] Hughes purchased her second station, WMMJ in Washington, seven years later, which began to turn a profit once she converted it into a rhythm and blues station.[9] This established Radio One's early strategy of purchasing small, underperforming radio stations in urban markets and refocusing them to serve the demographics of their communities.[9]
After joining the company in 1985 and managing its day-to-day operations since 1993, Hughes' son, Alfred C. Liggins III, took over as CEO in 1997, with Hughes becoming the board's chairperson.[9][11][12] Under the guidance of recently appointed CEO Liggins, Radio One went public on May 6, 1999, while continuing to be controlled by the family.[13][14] The company's initial public offering was for 6.5 million shares at $24 per share.[12] This made Hughes the first African American woman to chair a public company.[8][11] As of 2010, Hughes and Liggins control 90% of Radio One's voting stock.[15]
In 2001, Radio One expanded into 22 markets, with 18 million listeners, making it the nation's largest urban-market radio broadcasting company.[14] Radio One reached a peak of owning 70 stations in 22 markets in 2007.[16] It is the largest African American-owned-and-operated broadcast company in the US.[11][17]




Radio One logo and slogan used until May 8, 2017.


In 1996, Radio One moved its corporate offices from Washington, DC, to Lanham, Maryland.[18] The company is now based in Silver Spring, Maryland.[8]
Radio One announced that it would rename itself as Urban One, Inc. on January 1, 2017. Each entity will still retain their current brandings (radio stations will still operate under the branding of Radio One, and the same applies to TV One, Interactive One, and Reach Media). This follows the company's move into broader holdings such as the soon-to-open MGM National Harbor casino in Washington DC.[19] The name change was completed on May 8, 2017.[20]
Launches[edit]
TV One[edit]
In January 2003, Radio One and Comcast announced an agreement to a joint venture to create a television network aimed at African Americans ages 25–54.[21] On January 19, 2004, on Martin Luther King Jr.'s birthday, Radio One launched the television station TV One, airing African American entertainment, lifestyle and scripted shows, in 2.2 million households.[4][15][22] Liggins serves as chairman of TV One.[15] Brad Siegel was hired as president of TV One in late 2014.[23]
By the end of 2007, TV One was in 42.2 million homes.[4] In 2011, Comcast and NBC merged, with all Comcast cable holdings subsequently managed by NBC. Also in 2011, Radio One's ownership stake in TV One grew from 36.8% to 50.8%.[24] In 2012, TV One changed its programming, doubling the amount of original content, and changing the logo, while keeping its target audience. As of 2012, TV One reaches 57.4 million US homes.[25]
In March 2015, Radio One announced a deal to buy out Comcast's 47.9% share of TV One for $550 million. To assist with the deal, Radio One refinanced $119 million in outstanding debt, and will ultimately refinance debt totaling approximately $1 billion.[26]
Interactive One[edit]
In 2008, Radio One launched Interactive One, an online portfolio of digital brands, to complement their other media companies. Interactive One operates numerous digital brands, including News One, The Urban Daily and Hello Beautiful.[27][28] In 2011, Interactive One entered into an editorial and sales partnership with NBC News, aligning News One with NBC's The Grio.[29] As of 2013, Interactive One also has a partnership with Global Grind, a website founded by Russell Simmons and focused on pop culture and music content for African American and Hispanic audiences.[30] In 2015, Interactive One launched HB Studios, a video production studio focused on creating scripted and unscripted programming about women and the diversity of their experiences. The programming will be featured on the iOne Women Channel, HelloBeautiful.com, YouTube and Facebook.[31][32]
As of 2011, Interactive was the largest network of owned and operated sites aimed at an African American audience.[33] As of 2014, Interactive One reaches over 18 million unique monthly users on its platform through over 80 national and local brands.[34]
Acquisitions[edit]
Radio stations[edit]
In 1995, Radio One purchased WKYS-FM in Washington, DC, for $34 million, and also entered the Atlanta market by purchasing WHAT-FM for $4.5 million.[18] In 1997, the company entered the Philadelphia market with its purchase of WPHI-FM for $20 million. The company added numerous stations in the second half of the 1990s, including stations in Atlanta, St. Louis, Boston, Cleveland, Richmond, San Francisco, Detroit and Boston.[13][18][35]
In 2000, Radio One purchased 12 stations for approximately $1.3 billion from Clear Channel, bringing Radio One into Los Angeles, Dallas, Houston and Miami, along with stations in Cleveland and Greenville, South Carolina. Soon after, Radio One added two more Dallas stations.[9][18][36] In total, the company added 21 radio stations in 2000.[18]
In February 2001, Radio One purchased rival company Blue Chip Broadcasting for approximately $135 million ($45 million cash with the remainder in stock). The purchase included 15 radio stations owned and operated by Cincinnati-based Blue Chip in Ohio, Minnesota and Kentucky. Earlier that month, Radio One had also purchased another Dallas radio station for $52.5 million.[37] In June 2001, Radio One purchased Georgia radio station WPEZ-FM from US Broadcasting for $55 million.[38]
In 2004, Radio One purchased KRTS-FM in Houston for approximately $72.5 million in cash, giving it three stations in the Houston market.[39] Also in 2004, Radio One purchased country station WSNJ in Bridgeton, New Jersey, for $35 million. It had been on the air since 1937 and family-owned by the Ed and Katherine Bold family for over 50 years.[40]
In 2011, Radio One changed stations in Houston, Cincinnati and Columbus, Ohio, from African American to general interest formats, due to low ratings.[41]
Reach Media[edit]
In November 2004, Radio One acquired a 53% stake in Reach Media, a Texas-based media company owned by radio host Tom Joyner, for $56.1 million in cash and stock.[42][43] The deal also gave Radio One ownership rights to Joyner's syndicated Tom Joyner Morning Show, which was at the time airing on 115 stations to 8 million listeners; and news website BlackAmericaWeb.com, which had at the time approximately 800,000 members, giving Radio One its first strong Internet presence.[43]
In 2005, Radio One teamed up with Reach Media to launch a new African American-centered talk radio network, with programming hosted by the Reverend Al Sharpton, to be broadcast on up to 10 of Radio One's stations, as well as stations owned by other companies.[13] In December 2012, under a new deal, Radio One increased its ownership stake in Reach Media to 80%.[44] That same month, Radio One announced that the following year, it would merge its Syndication One urban programming lineup with Reach Media.[45][46]
Print[edit]
In January 2007, Radio One purchased GIANT magazine for $275,000.[47][48] In December 2009, the company suspended publication of the print version of the bi-monthly magazine, relaunching it online as GIANTLife.com. The website is a part of the Interactive One network.[49]
Internet[edit]
In 2008, Radio One acquired social networking firm Community Connect, the parent company of BlackPlanet, AsianAvenue and MiGente, for $38 million. BlackPlanet at the time had 20 million members and was the nation's fourth-most visited social networking site.[50]
Divestures[edit]
From 2006 through the beginning of 2008, Radio One sold nearly $150 million in assets, primarily underperforming radio stations.[48] In 2007, Radio One sold 10 stations to Main Line Broadcasting for approximately $76 million in cash. The stations sold were in Radio One's markets with the smallest African American populations. The sale decreased the number of Radio One's stations from 71 to 61.[51]
Personalities[edit]
Radio One operates a variety of syndicated shows, with hosts including Tom Joyner, Russ Parr, Yolanda Adams, Rickey Smiley, Bishop T.D. Jakes, DL Hughley and the Reverend Al Sharpton.[52]
Stations[edit]
As of October 2015, Urban One's Radio One division operates 53 radio stations in 16 markets.[53]


Market
Station and Frequency
Owned since
Format
Notes


Atlanta
WAMJ 107.5 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WHTA 107.9 FM
2001
Mainstream urban



WPZE 102.5 FM
2004
Urban gospel



WUMJ 97.5 FM
1995
Classic hip-hop
Simulcast of W275BK


Baltimore
WERQ-FM 92.3 FM
1993
Mainstream urban



WOLB 1010 AM

News/Talk



WWIN 1400 AM

Urban gospel



WWIN-FM 95.9 FM
1992
Urban adult contemporary



Boston
WILD 1090 AM
2001
News/Talk



Charlotte
WOSF 105.3 FM
2012
Urban oldies



WQNC 92.7 FM

Urban contemporary



WPZS 100.9 FM
2004
Urban gospel



Cincinnati
WOSL 100.3 FM
2006
Urban Oldies



WDBZ 1230 AM
2007
Talk/Urban gospel



WIZF 101.1 FM

Urban contemporary



Cleveland
WENZ 107.9 FM
1999
Mainstream urban



WERE 1490 AM
2000
News/Talk



WJMO 1300 AM
1999
Urban gospel



WZAK 93.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary



Columbus, Ohio
WCKX 107.5 FM

Mainstream Urban



WJYD 107.1 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban Gospel
Licensed to Circleville, Ohio


WBMO 106.3 FM
late 1990s
Classic Hip-Hop



WXMG 95.5 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban adult contemporary
Licensed to Lancaster, Ohio


Dallas/Fort Worth
KBFB 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KSOC 94.5 FM
2002
Classic hip-hop



Detroit
WCHB 1200 AM
1998
News/Talk
Has LP simulcast on W260CB 99.9 FM


WDMK 105.9 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WPZR 102.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WGPR 107.5 FM
2011*
Mainstream urban
*Under LMA with International Free and Accepted Modern Masons


Houston
KBXX 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KMJQ 102.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
Operates an urban gospel format on KMJQ-HD2


KROI 92.1 FM
2004
CHR/Top-40



Indianapolis
WHHH 96.3 FM

Rhythmic contemporary



WNOW-FM 100.9 FM

CHR/Top 40



WTLC 1310 AM
2001
Urban gospel



WTLC-FM 106.7 FM
2001
Urban adult contemporary



Philadelphia
WPHI-FM 103.9 FM
1996
Classic hip-hop



WPPZ-FM 107.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WRNB 100.3 FM
2001
Urban oldies



Raleigh/Durham
WFXC 107.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
both WFXC and WFXK are simulcasts


WFXK 104.3 FM


WNNL 103.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WQOK 97.5 FM
2000
Mainstream urban



Richmond, Virginia
WCDX 92.1 FM

Mainstream urban



WKJM 99.3 FM

Urban adult contemporary
both WKJM and WKJS are simulcasts


WKJS 105.7 FM


WPZZ 104.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WTPS 1240 AM
late 1990s
News/Talk



St. Louis
WFUN-FM 95.5 FM
1999
Urban oldies



WHHL 104.1 FM
2005
Mainstream urban



Washington, DC
WKYS 93.9 FM
early 1990s (?)
Urban contemporary



WMMJ 102.3 FM
1987
Urban adult contemporary



WOL 1450 AM
1980
News/Talk
First property of Radio One and its flagship


WPRS-FM 104.1 FM
2006
Urban gospel



WYCB 1340 AM

Urban gospel



Milestones[edit]


Year
Event


1980
Radio One founded by Cathy Hughes.[8]


1997
Alfred C. Liggins III succeeds Hughes as president and CEO.[9]


1999
Goes public on NASDAQ, trading as ROIA (later changed to ROIAK).[8]


2000
Acquires 12 Clear Channel stations.[18]


2004
TV One launched in joint venture with Comcast.[8]


Purchases a majority stake in Reach Media.[42]


2008
Launches Interactive One.[27]


Acquires social networking firm Community Connect.[50]


2015
Announces deal to buy out Comcast's share of TV One.[26]


See also[edit]


African American portal
Radio portal



Inner City Broadcasting Corporation
TV One
Interactive One
Cathy Hughes
Tom Joyner

References[edit]


^ a b c Radio One Inc. Income Statement, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b Radio One Inc. Balance Sheet, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ Radio One Inc. Profile, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b c Felicia R. Lee, "A Network for Blacks With Sense of Mission", The New York Times, December 11, 2007.
^ "BE 100's 2014". Black Enterprise. Retrieved 2016-11-22. 
^ "Radio One increases stake in Reach Media, makes plans to launch a new Urban network", Target Market News, December 3, 2012.
^ "Blacks In Wax Features Radio One Founder Cathy Hughes", New Pittsburgh Courier, September 26, 2014.
^ a b c d e f g Steven Overly, "With purchase of radio station WOL in 1980, Cathy Hughes launched a media empire", The Washington Post, August 11, 2014.
^ a b c d e f Clea Simon, "Mining an Untapped Market, Radio One Becomes a Force", The New York Times, December 25, 2000.
^ Chandrani Ghosh, "The Comeback Queen", Forbes, September 20, 1999.
^ a b c Jessie Carney Smith, ed., Black Firsts: 4,000 Ground-Breaking and Pioneering Historical Events, Canton, MI: Visible Ink Press, 2003, pp. 63-64.
^ a b Robyn D. Clarke, "High-Frequency Profits", Black Enterprise, June 2000.
^ a b c Clea Simon, "WILD to air new African-American talk-radio network", Boston Globe, October 29, 2005.
^ a b "Radio One's Number One", Wharton Alumni Magazine, Spring 2007.
^ a b c Joe Flint, "Latest protestor of Comcast – NBC deal plays race card and has ex-FCC chairman on board", Los Angeles Times, April 27, 2010.
^ Gail Mitchell, "Q&A: Cathy Hughes", Billboard, December 3, 2005, p. 25.
^ Janean Chun, "Cathy Hughes, Radio One: From Teen Mom to Media Mogul", Huffington Post, September 26, 2012.
^ a b c d e f "Radio One, Inc. History", Funding Universe. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One To Rename As Urban One Inc. - Radio Insight (published November 3, 2016)
^ Radio One Completes Name Change To Urban One - Radio Insight (published May 8, 2017)
^ Seth Schiesel, "Comcast and Radio One in TV Joint Venture", The New York Times, January 13, 2003.
^ Rob Owen, "Tuned In: TV One aims to be BET for grown-ups", Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, January 12, 2006.
^ "Brad Siegel Named TV One President", Deadline.com, December 17, 2014.
^ Wayne Barrett, "Al Sharpton's Radio Power Play", The Daily Beast, July 28, 2011.
^ Sijie Wang, "TV One Rebrands Around Storytelling", The Hollywood Reporter, June 20, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One Gears Up for TV One Deal", Inside Radio, March 20, 2015.
^ a b Nicholas Carlson, "Former AOL Entertainment Boss Mike Rich Goes To Interactive One", Business Insider, July 9, 2010.
^ C. Daniel Baker, "Interactive One Studios Adds Russell Simmons' GlobalGrind.com to its Roster", Black Enterprise, April 15, 2013.
^ Tanzina Vega, "Black News In New Focus", The New York Times, July 11, 2011.
^ William Launder, "Digital Marketer Links Up With Russell Simmons", The Wall Street Journal, April 15, 2013.
^ Todd Spangler, "Interactive One Launches Digital Studio to Produce Series for Women of Color", Variety, February 11, 2015.
^ Jessica Klein, "Interactive One Will Launch HB Studios with Doc 'Women of Color'", Video Ink, February 11, 2015.
^ Matthew Flamm, "Urban websites face off", Crain's New York Business, June 12, 2011.
^ "Interactive One Launches Elev8, a New Site Devoted to Uplifting", PR Newswire, October 27, 2013.
^ "Radio One to Acquire Another Philadelphia Station", The New York Times, December 4, 1999.
^ "Radio One to Buy 12 Clear Channel Stations", The New York Times, March 14, 2000.
^ "Radio One Buying Rival Blue Chip Broadcasting", The New York Times, February 9, 2001.
^ "Radio Broadcaster for Black Listeners to Buy Station", The New York Times, June 27, 2001.
^ "Radio One Acquires Third Station in Houston Market", The New York Times, May 25, 2004.
^ G. Patrick Pawling, "Vintage Radio, Down to Farm Reports and School Menus, Is Signing Off", The New York Times, February 1, 2004.
^ Ben Sisario, "A Radio Merger in New York Reflects a Shifting Industry", The New York Times, April 29, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One to boost Joyner", Los Angeles Times, November 23, 2004.
^ a b Andrea K. Walker, "Radio One to acquire Joyner company", Baltimore Sun, November 23, 2004.
^ Ann Brown, "Radio Play: Radio One Increases Investment in Tom Joyner's Reach Media", Madame Noire, December 5, 2012.
^ "Syndication One To Consolidate With Reach Media", All Access, December 3, 2012.
^ "Alfred Liggins and David Kantor On The Radio One Reach Media Merger", The Urban Daily, March 20, 2013.
^ "Radio One Picks Up Giant Magazine", The New York Times, January 4, 2007.
^ a b Anita Huslin, "Radio One's Losses Grow, Stock Declines", The Washington Post, February 22, 2008.
^ Amanda Ernst, "Giant Magazine Suspends Publication, Moves To Web", Mediabistro, November 30, 2009.
^ a b Dan Frommer, "BlackPlanet Parent Community Connect Sells To Radio One For $38 Million", Business Insider, April 11, 2008.
^ Jeff Clabaugh, "Arlington Capital Partners buys 10 Radio One stations", Washington Business Journal, May 18, 2007.
^ "Reaching Our Audience Wherever They Are", radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One, radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.


External links[edit]

Radio One official website
TV One official website
Reach Media official website
Interactive One official website







v
t
e


Urban One



Key people



Cathy Hughes (Chairman and CEO)





Radio shows



The Tom Joyner Morning Show (via Reach Media under contract)
Russ Parr Morning Show (via AURN)
The Yolanda Adams Morning Show
The Donnie Simpson Show










Radio stations (under the Radio One division)



Mainstream urban



KBFB
KBXX
WCDX
WCKX
WENZ
WERQ-FM
WGPR1
WHHL
WHTA
WIZF
WKYS
WQNC
WQOK





Urban adult
contemporary



KMJQ
WAMJ
WBMO
WDCJ
WDMK
WFXC
WFXK
WKJM
WKJS
WMMJ
WRNB
WTLC-FM
WUMJ
WWIN-FM
WXMG
WZAK





Urban gospel



WJMO
WJYD
WNNL
WPPZ-FM
WPRS-FM
WPZE
WPZR
WPZS
WPZZ
WTLC
WWIN
WYCB





Urban talk



WCHB
WDBZ
WERE
WOL
WOLB





CHR



WNOW-FM
KROI





Rhythmic CHR



WHHH





Rhythmic Oldies



WFUN-FM
WOSF
WOSL





Classic hip hop



KSOC
WPHI-FM
W275BK





China Radio International



WILD





ESPN Radio



WTPS
WXGI













Other






WDNI-CD (Telemundo)
TV One
Interactive One











1 Owned by International Free and Accepted Modern Masons and operated by Radio One under an LMA.










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Urban_One&oldid=788423291"					
Categories: Radio One (company)Radio broadcasting companies of the United StatesCompanies based in MarylandCompanies established in 1980Companies listed on NASDAQ 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 09:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Urban One - Wikipedia





















 






Urban One

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Radio One (company))

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Urban One, Inc.


Type

Public


Traded as
NASDAQ: UONEK


Industry
Media


Founded
1980


Founder
Cathy Hughes


Headquarters
1010 Wayne Avenue
Floor 14
Silver Spring, MD 20910



Area served

United States



Key people

Cathy Hughes
(Chairman)
Alfred C. Liggins III
(President & CEO)


Revenue
 US$ 441.4 million (2014)[1]



Operating income

 US$ 77.2 million (2014)[1]



Net income

 US$ -42.7 million (2014)[1]


Total assets
 US$ 1.4 billion (2014)[2]


Total equity
 US$ 18.9 million (2014)[2]



Number of employees

1,011 (2015)[3]


Divisions
Reach Media
TV One
Interactive One
NewsOne


Website
radio-one.com


Urban One, Inc. is an American media company with holdings in radio, cable television and digital media. Urban One owns and operates 55 radio stations in 16 US markets. It is the largest African American-owned broadcasting company in the US, and the largest radio broadcaster targeting African American and urban listeners.[4] The company's station offerings are primarily hip-hop, rap, R&B, talk radio and news.
As of 2014, the company under the previous name Radio One (until May 2017) was the ninth-highest earning African-American business in the United States.[5]
Urban One owns Reach Media, the largest radio network targeting African American and urban listeners;[6] a majority stake in TV One, a cable television network targeting African American women; and Interactive One, a digital publisher with brands and websites targeting urban users.[7]



Contents


1 History
2 Launches

2.1 TV One
2.2 Interactive One


3 Acquisitions

3.1 Radio stations
3.2 Reach Media
3.3 Print
3.4 Internet


4 Divestures
5 Personalities
6 Stations
7 Milestones
8 See also
9 References
10 External links



History[edit]
Urban One was founded as Radio One in 1980 by Cathy Hughes, a then-recently divorced single mother, with the purchase of the Washington, DC radio station WOL-AM for $995,000.[8][9][10] She changed the station's programming format from all-music to one that examined politics and culture from an African American perspective.[8] Hughes purchased her second station, WMMJ in Washington, seven years later, which began to turn a profit once she converted it into a rhythm and blues station.[9] This established Radio One's early strategy of purchasing small, underperforming radio stations in urban markets and refocusing them to serve the demographics of their communities.[9]
After joining the company in 1985 and managing its day-to-day operations since 1993, Hughes' son, Alfred C. Liggins III, took over as CEO in 1997, with Hughes becoming the board's chairperson.[9][11][12] Under the guidance of recently appointed CEO Liggins, Radio One went public on May 6, 1999, while continuing to be controlled by the family.[13][14] The company's initial public offering was for 6.5 million shares at $24 per share.[12] This made Hughes the first African American woman to chair a public company.[8][11] As of 2010, Hughes and Liggins control 90% of Radio One's voting stock.[15]
In 2001, Radio One expanded into 22 markets, with 18 million listeners, making it the nation's largest urban-market radio broadcasting company.[14] Radio One reached a peak of owning 70 stations in 22 markets in 2007.[16] It is the largest African American-owned-and-operated broadcast company in the US.[11][17]




Radio One logo and slogan used until May 8, 2017.


In 1996, Radio One moved its corporate offices from Washington, DC, to Lanham, Maryland.[18] The company is now based in Silver Spring, Maryland.[8]
Radio One announced that it would rename itself as Urban One, Inc. on January 1, 2017. Each entity will still retain their current brandings (radio stations will still operate under the branding of Radio One, and the same applies to TV One, Interactive One, and Reach Media). This follows the company's move into broader holdings such as the soon-to-open MGM National Harbor casino in Washington DC.[19] The name change was completed on May 8, 2017.[20]
Launches[edit]
TV One[edit]
In January 2003, Radio One and Comcast announced an agreement to a joint venture to create a television network aimed at African Americans ages 25–54.[21] On January 19, 2004, on Martin Luther King Jr.'s birthday, Radio One launched the television station TV One, airing African American entertainment, lifestyle and scripted shows, in 2.2 million households.[4][15][22] Liggins serves as chairman of TV One.[15] Brad Siegel was hired as president of TV One in late 2014.[23]
By the end of 2007, TV One was in 42.2 million homes.[4] In 2011, Comcast and NBC merged, with all Comcast cable holdings subsequently managed by NBC. Also in 2011, Radio One's ownership stake in TV One grew from 36.8% to 50.8%.[24] In 2012, TV One changed its programming, doubling the amount of original content, and changing the logo, while keeping its target audience. As of 2012, TV One reaches 57.4 million US homes.[25]
In March 2015, Radio One announced a deal to buy out Comcast's 47.9% share of TV One for $550 million. To assist with the deal, Radio One refinanced $119 million in outstanding debt, and will ultimately refinance debt totaling approximately $1 billion.[26]
Interactive One[edit]
In 2008, Radio One launched Interactive One, an online portfolio of digital brands, to complement their other media companies. Interactive One operates numerous digital brands, including News One, The Urban Daily and Hello Beautiful.[27][28] In 2011, Interactive One entered into an editorial and sales partnership with NBC News, aligning News One with NBC's The Grio.[29] As of 2013, Interactive One also has a partnership with Global Grind, a website founded by Russell Simmons and focused on pop culture and music content for African American and Hispanic audiences.[30] In 2015, Interactive One launched HB Studios, a video production studio focused on creating scripted and unscripted programming about women and the diversity of their experiences. The programming will be featured on the iOne Women Channel, HelloBeautiful.com, YouTube and Facebook.[31][32]
As of 2011, Interactive was the largest network of owned and operated sites aimed at an African American audience.[33] As of 2014, Interactive One reaches over 18 million unique monthly users on its platform through over 80 national and local brands.[34]
Acquisitions[edit]
Radio stations[edit]
In 1995, Radio One purchased WKYS-FM in Washington, DC, for $34 million, and also entered the Atlanta market by purchasing WHAT-FM for $4.5 million.[18] In 1997, the company entered the Philadelphia market with its purchase of WPHI-FM for $20 million. The company added numerous stations in the second half of the 1990s, including stations in Atlanta, St. Louis, Boston, Cleveland, Richmond, San Francisco, Detroit and Boston.[13][18][35]
In 2000, Radio One purchased 12 stations for approximately $1.3 billion from Clear Channel, bringing Radio One into Los Angeles, Dallas, Houston and Miami, along with stations in Cleveland and Greenville, South Carolina. Soon after, Radio One added two more Dallas stations.[9][18][36] In total, the company added 21 radio stations in 2000.[18]
In February 2001, Radio One purchased rival company Blue Chip Broadcasting for approximately $135 million ($45 million cash with the remainder in stock). The purchase included 15 radio stations owned and operated by Cincinnati-based Blue Chip in Ohio, Minnesota and Kentucky. Earlier that month, Radio One had also purchased another Dallas radio station for $52.5 million.[37] In June 2001, Radio One purchased Georgia radio station WPEZ-FM from US Broadcasting for $55 million.[38]
In 2004, Radio One purchased KRTS-FM in Houston for approximately $72.5 million in cash, giving it three stations in the Houston market.[39] Also in 2004, Radio One purchased country station WSNJ in Bridgeton, New Jersey, for $35 million. It had been on the air since 1937 and family-owned by the Ed and Katherine Bold family for over 50 years.[40]
In 2011, Radio One changed stations in Houston, Cincinnati and Columbus, Ohio, from African American to general interest formats, due to low ratings.[41]
Reach Media[edit]
In November 2004, Radio One acquired a 53% stake in Reach Media, a Texas-based media company owned by radio host Tom Joyner, for $56.1 million in cash and stock.[42][43] The deal also gave Radio One ownership rights to Joyner's syndicated Tom Joyner Morning Show, which was at the time airing on 115 stations to 8 million listeners; and news website BlackAmericaWeb.com, which had at the time approximately 800,000 members, giving Radio One its first strong Internet presence.[43]
In 2005, Radio One teamed up with Reach Media to launch a new African American-centered talk radio network, with programming hosted by the Reverend Al Sharpton, to be broadcast on up to 10 of Radio One's stations, as well as stations owned by other companies.[13] In December 2012, under a new deal, Radio One increased its ownership stake in Reach Media to 80%.[44] That same month, Radio One announced that the following year, it would merge its Syndication One urban programming lineup with Reach Media.[45][46]
Print[edit]
In January 2007, Radio One purchased GIANT magazine for $275,000.[47][48] In December 2009, the company suspended publication of the print version of the bi-monthly magazine, relaunching it online as GIANTLife.com. The website is a part of the Interactive One network.[49]
Internet[edit]
In 2008, Radio One acquired social networking firm Community Connect, the parent company of BlackPlanet, AsianAvenue and MiGente, for $38 million. BlackPlanet at the time had 20 million members and was the nation's fourth-most visited social networking site.[50]
Divestures[edit]
From 2006 through the beginning of 2008, Radio One sold nearly $150 million in assets, primarily underperforming radio stations.[48] In 2007, Radio One sold 10 stations to Main Line Broadcasting for approximately $76 million in cash. The stations sold were in Radio One's markets with the smallest African American populations. The sale decreased the number of Radio One's stations from 71 to 61.[51]
Personalities[edit]
Radio One operates a variety of syndicated shows, with hosts including Tom Joyner, Russ Parr, Yolanda Adams, Rickey Smiley, Bishop T.D. Jakes, DL Hughley and the Reverend Al Sharpton.[52]
Stations[edit]
As of October 2015, Urban One's Radio One division operates 53 radio stations in 16 markets.[53]


Market
Station and Frequency
Owned since
Format
Notes


Atlanta
WAMJ 107.5 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WHTA 107.9 FM
2001
Mainstream urban



WPZE 102.5 FM
2004
Urban gospel



WUMJ 97.5 FM
1995
Classic hip-hop
Simulcast of W275BK


Baltimore
WERQ-FM 92.3 FM
1993
Mainstream urban



WOLB 1010 AM

News/Talk



WWIN 1400 AM

Urban gospel



WWIN-FM 95.9 FM
1992
Urban adult contemporary



Boston
WILD 1090 AM
2001
News/Talk



Charlotte
WOSF 105.3 FM
2012
Urban oldies



WQNC 92.7 FM

Urban contemporary



WPZS 100.9 FM
2004
Urban gospel



Cincinnati
WOSL 100.3 FM
2006
Urban Oldies



WDBZ 1230 AM
2007
Talk/Urban gospel



WIZF 101.1 FM

Urban contemporary



Cleveland
WENZ 107.9 FM
1999
Mainstream urban



WERE 1490 AM
2000
News/Talk



WJMO 1300 AM
1999
Urban gospel



WZAK 93.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary



Columbus, Ohio
WCKX 107.5 FM

Mainstream Urban



WJYD 107.1 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban Gospel
Licensed to Circleville, Ohio


WBMO 106.3 FM
late 1990s
Classic Hip-Hop



WXMG 95.5 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban adult contemporary
Licensed to Lancaster, Ohio


Dallas/Fort Worth
KBFB 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KSOC 94.5 FM
2002
Classic hip-hop



Detroit
WCHB 1200 AM
1998
News/Talk
Has LP simulcast on W260CB 99.9 FM


WDMK 105.9 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WPZR 102.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WGPR 107.5 FM
2011*
Mainstream urban
*Under LMA with International Free and Accepted Modern Masons


Houston
KBXX 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KMJQ 102.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
Operates an urban gospel format on KMJQ-HD2


KROI 92.1 FM
2004
CHR/Top-40



Indianapolis
WHHH 96.3 FM

Rhythmic contemporary



WNOW-FM 100.9 FM

CHR/Top 40



WTLC 1310 AM
2001
Urban gospel



WTLC-FM 106.7 FM
2001
Urban adult contemporary



Philadelphia
WPHI-FM 103.9 FM
1996
Classic hip-hop



WPPZ-FM 107.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WRNB 100.3 FM
2001
Urban oldies



Raleigh/Durham
WFXC 107.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
both WFXC and WFXK are simulcasts


WFXK 104.3 FM


WNNL 103.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WQOK 97.5 FM
2000
Mainstream urban



Richmond, Virginia
WCDX 92.1 FM

Mainstream urban



WKJM 99.3 FM

Urban adult contemporary
both WKJM and WKJS are simulcasts


WKJS 105.7 FM


WPZZ 104.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WTPS 1240 AM
late 1990s
News/Talk



St. Louis
WFUN-FM 95.5 FM
1999
Urban oldies



WHHL 104.1 FM
2005
Mainstream urban



Washington, DC
WKYS 93.9 FM
early 1990s (?)
Urban contemporary



WMMJ 102.3 FM
1987
Urban adult contemporary



WOL 1450 AM
1980
News/Talk
First property of Radio One and its flagship


WPRS-FM 104.1 FM
2006
Urban gospel



WYCB 1340 AM

Urban gospel



Milestones[edit]


Year
Event


1980
Radio One founded by Cathy Hughes.[8]


1997
Alfred C. Liggins III succeeds Hughes as president and CEO.[9]


1999
Goes public on NASDAQ, trading as ROIA (later changed to ROIAK).[8]


2000
Acquires 12 Clear Channel stations.[18]


2004
TV One launched in joint venture with Comcast.[8]


Purchases a majority stake in Reach Media.[42]


2008
Launches Interactive One.[27]


Acquires social networking firm Community Connect.[50]


2015
Announces deal to buy out Comcast's share of TV One.[26]


See also[edit]


African American portal
Radio portal



Inner City Broadcasting Corporation
TV One
Interactive One
Cathy Hughes
Tom Joyner

References[edit]


^ a b c Radio One Inc. Income Statement, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b Radio One Inc. Balance Sheet, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ Radio One Inc. Profile, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b c Felicia R. Lee, "A Network for Blacks With Sense of Mission", The New York Times, December 11, 2007.
^ "BE 100's 2014". Black Enterprise. Retrieved 2016-11-22. 
^ "Radio One increases stake in Reach Media, makes plans to launch a new Urban network", Target Market News, December 3, 2012.
^ "Blacks In Wax Features Radio One Founder Cathy Hughes", New Pittsburgh Courier, September 26, 2014.
^ a b c d e f g Steven Overly, "With purchase of radio station WOL in 1980, Cathy Hughes launched a media empire", The Washington Post, August 11, 2014.
^ a b c d e f Clea Simon, "Mining an Untapped Market, Radio One Becomes a Force", The New York Times, December 25, 2000.
^ Chandrani Ghosh, "The Comeback Queen", Forbes, September 20, 1999.
^ a b c Jessie Carney Smith, ed., Black Firsts: 4,000 Ground-Breaking and Pioneering Historical Events, Canton, MI: Visible Ink Press, 2003, pp. 63-64.
^ a b Robyn D. Clarke, "High-Frequency Profits", Black Enterprise, June 2000.
^ a b c Clea Simon, "WILD to air new African-American talk-radio network", Boston Globe, October 29, 2005.
^ a b "Radio One's Number One", Wharton Alumni Magazine, Spring 2007.
^ a b c Joe Flint, "Latest protestor of Comcast – NBC deal plays race card and has ex-FCC chairman on board", Los Angeles Times, April 27, 2010.
^ Gail Mitchell, "Q&A: Cathy Hughes", Billboard, December 3, 2005, p. 25.
^ Janean Chun, "Cathy Hughes, Radio One: From Teen Mom to Media Mogul", Huffington Post, September 26, 2012.
^ a b c d e f "Radio One, Inc. History", Funding Universe. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One To Rename As Urban One Inc. - Radio Insight (published November 3, 2016)
^ Radio One Completes Name Change To Urban One - Radio Insight (published May 8, 2017)
^ Seth Schiesel, "Comcast and Radio One in TV Joint Venture", The New York Times, January 13, 2003.
^ Rob Owen, "Tuned In: TV One aims to be BET for grown-ups", Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, January 12, 2006.
^ "Brad Siegel Named TV One President", Deadline.com, December 17, 2014.
^ Wayne Barrett, "Al Sharpton's Radio Power Play", The Daily Beast, July 28, 2011.
^ Sijie Wang, "TV One Rebrands Around Storytelling", The Hollywood Reporter, June 20, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One Gears Up for TV One Deal", Inside Radio, March 20, 2015.
^ a b Nicholas Carlson, "Former AOL Entertainment Boss Mike Rich Goes To Interactive One", Business Insider, July 9, 2010.
^ C. Daniel Baker, "Interactive One Studios Adds Russell Simmons' GlobalGrind.com to its Roster", Black Enterprise, April 15, 2013.
^ Tanzina Vega, "Black News In New Focus", The New York Times, July 11, 2011.
^ William Launder, "Digital Marketer Links Up With Russell Simmons", The Wall Street Journal, April 15, 2013.
^ Todd Spangler, "Interactive One Launches Digital Studio to Produce Series for Women of Color", Variety, February 11, 2015.
^ Jessica Klein, "Interactive One Will Launch HB Studios with Doc 'Women of Color'", Video Ink, February 11, 2015.
^ Matthew Flamm, "Urban websites face off", Crain's New York Business, June 12, 2011.
^ "Interactive One Launches Elev8, a New Site Devoted to Uplifting", PR Newswire, October 27, 2013.
^ "Radio One to Acquire Another Philadelphia Station", The New York Times, December 4, 1999.
^ "Radio One to Buy 12 Clear Channel Stations", The New York Times, March 14, 2000.
^ "Radio One Buying Rival Blue Chip Broadcasting", The New York Times, February 9, 2001.
^ "Radio Broadcaster for Black Listeners to Buy Station", The New York Times, June 27, 2001.
^ "Radio One Acquires Third Station in Houston Market", The New York Times, May 25, 2004.
^ G. Patrick Pawling, "Vintage Radio, Down to Farm Reports and School Menus, Is Signing Off", The New York Times, February 1, 2004.
^ Ben Sisario, "A Radio Merger in New York Reflects a Shifting Industry", The New York Times, April 29, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One to boost Joyner", Los Angeles Times, November 23, 2004.
^ a b Andrea K. Walker, "Radio One to acquire Joyner company", Baltimore Sun, November 23, 2004.
^ Ann Brown, "Radio Play: Radio One Increases Investment in Tom Joyner's Reach Media", Madame Noire, December 5, 2012.
^ "Syndication One To Consolidate With Reach Media", All Access, December 3, 2012.
^ "Alfred Liggins and David Kantor On The Radio One Reach Media Merger", The Urban Daily, March 20, 2013.
^ "Radio One Picks Up Giant Magazine", The New York Times, January 4, 2007.
^ a b Anita Huslin, "Radio One's Losses Grow, Stock Declines", The Washington Post, February 22, 2008.
^ Amanda Ernst, "Giant Magazine Suspends Publication, Moves To Web", Mediabistro, November 30, 2009.
^ a b Dan Frommer, "BlackPlanet Parent Community Connect Sells To Radio One For $38 Million", Business Insider, April 11, 2008.
^ Jeff Clabaugh, "Arlington Capital Partners buys 10 Radio One stations", Washington Business Journal, May 18, 2007.
^ "Reaching Our Audience Wherever They Are", radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One, radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.


External links[edit]

Radio One official website
TV One official website
Reach Media official website
Interactive One official website







v
t
e


Urban One



Key people



Cathy Hughes (Chairman and CEO)





Radio shows



The Tom Joyner Morning Show (via Reach Media under contract)
Russ Parr Morning Show (via AURN)
The Yolanda Adams Morning Show
The Donnie Simpson Show










Radio stations (under the Radio One division)



Mainstream urban



KBFB
KBXX
WCDX
WCKX
WENZ
WERQ-FM
WGPR1
WHHL
WHTA
WIZF
WKYS
WQNC
WQOK





Urban adult
contemporary



KMJQ
WAMJ
WBMO
WDCJ
WDMK
WFXC
WFXK
WKJM
WKJS
WMMJ
WRNB
WTLC-FM
WUMJ
WWIN-FM
WXMG
WZAK





Urban gospel



WJMO
WJYD
WNNL
WPPZ-FM
WPRS-FM
WPZE
WPZR
WPZS
WPZZ
WTLC
WWIN
WYCB





Urban talk



WCHB
WDBZ
WERE
WOL
WOLB





CHR



WNOW-FM
KROI





Rhythmic CHR



WHHH





Rhythmic Oldies



WFUN-FM
WOSF
WOSL





Classic hip hop



KSOC
WPHI-FM
W275BK





China Radio International



WILD





ESPN Radio



WTPS
WXGI













Other






WDNI-CD (Telemundo)
TV One
Interactive One











1 Owned by International Free and Accepted Modern Masons and operated by Radio One under an LMA.










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Urban_One&oldid=788423291"					
Categories: Radio One (company)Radio broadcasting companies of the United StatesCompanies based in MarylandCompanies established in 1980Companies listed on NASDAQ 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 09:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 

















 





Urban One - Wikipedia





















 






Urban One

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Radio One (company))

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Urban One, Inc.


Type

Public


Traded as
NASDAQ: UONEK


Industry
Media


Founded
1980


Founder
Cathy Hughes


Headquarters
1010 Wayne Avenue
Floor 14
Silver Spring, MD 20910



Area served

United States



Key people

Cathy Hughes
(Chairman)
Alfred C. Liggins III
(President & CEO)


Revenue
 US$ 441.4 million (2014)[1]



Operating income

 US$ 77.2 million (2014)[1]



Net income

 US$ -42.7 million (2014)[1]


Total assets
 US$ 1.4 billion (2014)[2]


Total equity
 US$ 18.9 million (2014)[2]



Number of employees

1,011 (2015)[3]


Divisions
Reach Media
TV One
Interactive One
NewsOne


Website
radio-one.com


Urban One, Inc. is an American media company with holdings in radio, cable television and digital media. Urban One owns and operates 55 radio stations in 16 US markets. It is the largest African American-owned broadcasting company in the US, and the largest radio broadcaster targeting African American and urban listeners.[4] The company's station offerings are primarily hip-hop, rap, R&B, talk radio and news.
As of 2014, the company under the previous name Radio One (until May 2017) was the ninth-highest earning African-American business in the United States.[5]
Urban One owns Reach Media, the largest radio network targeting African American and urban listeners;[6] a majority stake in TV One, a cable television network targeting African American women; and Interactive One, a digital publisher with brands and websites targeting urban users.[7]



Contents


1 History
2 Launches

2.1 TV One
2.2 Interactive One


3 Acquisitions

3.1 Radio stations
3.2 Reach Media
3.3 Print
3.4 Internet


4 Divestures
5 Personalities
6 Stations
7 Milestones
8 See also
9 References
10 External links



History[edit]
Urban One was founded as Radio One in 1980 by Cathy Hughes, a then-recently divorced single mother, with the purchase of the Washington, DC radio station WOL-AM for $995,000.[8][9][10] She changed the station's programming format from all-music to one that examined politics and culture from an African American perspective.[8] Hughes purchased her second station, WMMJ in Washington, seven years later, which began to turn a profit once she converted it into a rhythm and blues station.[9] This established Radio One's early strategy of purchasing small, underperforming radio stations in urban markets and refocusing them to serve the demographics of their communities.[9]
After joining the company in 1985 and managing its day-to-day operations since 1993, Hughes' son, Alfred C. Liggins III, took over as CEO in 1997, with Hughes becoming the board's chairperson.[9][11][12] Under the guidance of recently appointed CEO Liggins, Radio One went public on May 6, 1999, while continuing to be controlled by the family.[13][14] The company's initial public offering was for 6.5 million shares at $24 per share.[12] This made Hughes the first African American woman to chair a public company.[8][11] As of 2010, Hughes and Liggins control 90% of Radio One's voting stock.[15]
In 2001, Radio One expanded into 22 markets, with 18 million listeners, making it the nation's largest urban-market radio broadcasting company.[14] Radio One reached a peak of owning 70 stations in 22 markets in 2007.[16] It is the largest African American-owned-and-operated broadcast company in the US.[11][17]




Radio One logo and slogan used until May 8, 2017.


In 1996, Radio One moved its corporate offices from Washington, DC, to Lanham, Maryland.[18] The company is now based in Silver Spring, Maryland.[8]
Radio One announced that it would rename itself as Urban One, Inc. on January 1, 2017. Each entity will still retain their current brandings (radio stations will still operate under the branding of Radio One, and the same applies to TV One, Interactive One, and Reach Media). This follows the company's move into broader holdings such as the soon-to-open MGM National Harbor casino in Washington DC.[19] The name change was completed on May 8, 2017.[20]
Launches[edit]
TV One[edit]
In January 2003, Radio One and Comcast announced an agreement to a joint venture to create a television network aimed at African Americans ages 25–54.[21] On January 19, 2004, on Martin Luther King Jr.'s birthday, Radio One launched the television station TV One, airing African American entertainment, lifestyle and scripted shows, in 2.2 million households.[4][15][22] Liggins serves as chairman of TV One.[15] Brad Siegel was hired as president of TV One in late 2014.[23]
By the end of 2007, TV One was in 42.2 million homes.[4] In 2011, Comcast and NBC merged, with all Comcast cable holdings subsequently managed by NBC. Also in 2011, Radio One's ownership stake in TV One grew from 36.8% to 50.8%.[24] In 2012, TV One changed its programming, doubling the amount of original content, and changing the logo, while keeping its target audience. As of 2012, TV One reaches 57.4 million US homes.[25]
In March 2015, Radio One announced a deal to buy out Comcast's 47.9% share of TV One for $550 million. To assist with the deal, Radio One refinanced $119 million in outstanding debt, and will ultimately refinance debt totaling approximately $1 billion.[26]
Interactive One[edit]
In 2008, Radio One launched Interactive One, an online portfolio of digital brands, to complement their other media companies. Interactive One operates numerous digital brands, including News One, The Urban Daily and Hello Beautiful.[27][28] In 2011, Interactive One entered into an editorial and sales partnership with NBC News, aligning News One with NBC's The Grio.[29] As of 2013, Interactive One also has a partnership with Global Grind, a website founded by Russell Simmons and focused on pop culture and music content for African American and Hispanic audiences.[30] In 2015, Interactive One launched HB Studios, a video production studio focused on creating scripted and unscripted programming about women and the diversity of their experiences. The programming will be featured on the iOne Women Channel, HelloBeautiful.com, YouTube and Facebook.[31][32]
As of 2011, Interactive was the largest network of owned and operated sites aimed at an African American audience.[33] As of 2014, Interactive One reaches over 18 million unique monthly users on its platform through over 80 national and local brands.[34]
Acquisitions[edit]
Radio stations[edit]
In 1995, Radio One purchased WKYS-FM in Washington, DC, for $34 million, and also entered the Atlanta market by purchasing WHAT-FM for $4.5 million.[18] In 1997, the company entered the Philadelphia market with its purchase of WPHI-FM for $20 million. The company added numerous stations in the second half of the 1990s, including stations in Atlanta, St. Louis, Boston, Cleveland, Richmond, San Francisco, Detroit and Boston.[13][18][35]
In 2000, Radio One purchased 12 stations for approximately $1.3 billion from Clear Channel, bringing Radio One into Los Angeles, Dallas, Houston and Miami, along with stations in Cleveland and Greenville, South Carolina. Soon after, Radio One added two more Dallas stations.[9][18][36] In total, the company added 21 radio stations in 2000.[18]
In February 2001, Radio One purchased rival company Blue Chip Broadcasting for approximately $135 million ($45 million cash with the remainder in stock). The purchase included 15 radio stations owned and operated by Cincinnati-based Blue Chip in Ohio, Minnesota and Kentucky. Earlier that month, Radio One had also purchased another Dallas radio station for $52.5 million.[37] In June 2001, Radio One purchased Georgia radio station WPEZ-FM from US Broadcasting for $55 million.[38]
In 2004, Radio One purchased KRTS-FM in Houston for approximately $72.5 million in cash, giving it three stations in the Houston market.[39] Also in 2004, Radio One purchased country station WSNJ in Bridgeton, New Jersey, for $35 million. It had been on the air since 1937 and family-owned by the Ed and Katherine Bold family for over 50 years.[40]
In 2011, Radio One changed stations in Houston, Cincinnati and Columbus, Ohio, from African American to general interest formats, due to low ratings.[41]
Reach Media[edit]
In November 2004, Radio One acquired a 53% stake in Reach Media, a Texas-based media company owned by radio host Tom Joyner, for $56.1 million in cash and stock.[42][43] The deal also gave Radio One ownership rights to Joyner's syndicated Tom Joyner Morning Show, which was at the time airing on 115 stations to 8 million listeners; and news website BlackAmericaWeb.com, which had at the time approximately 800,000 members, giving Radio One its first strong Internet presence.[43]
In 2005, Radio One teamed up with Reach Media to launch a new African American-centered talk radio network, with programming hosted by the Reverend Al Sharpton, to be broadcast on up to 10 of Radio One's stations, as well as stations owned by other companies.[13] In December 2012, under a new deal, Radio One increased its ownership stake in Reach Media to 80%.[44] That same month, Radio One announced that the following year, it would merge its Syndication One urban programming lineup with Reach Media.[45][46]
Print[edit]
In January 2007, Radio One purchased GIANT magazine for $275,000.[47][48] In December 2009, the company suspended publication of the print version of the bi-monthly magazine, relaunching it online as GIANTLife.com. The website is a part of the Interactive One network.[49]
Internet[edit]
In 2008, Radio One acquired social networking firm Community Connect, the parent company of BlackPlanet, AsianAvenue and MiGente, for $38 million. BlackPlanet at the time had 20 million members and was the nation's fourth-most visited social networking site.[50]
Divestures[edit]
From 2006 through the beginning of 2008, Radio One sold nearly $150 million in assets, primarily underperforming radio stations.[48] In 2007, Radio One sold 10 stations to Main Line Broadcasting for approximately $76 million in cash. The stations sold were in Radio One's markets with the smallest African American populations. The sale decreased the number of Radio One's stations from 71 to 61.[51]
Personalities[edit]
Radio One operates a variety of syndicated shows, with hosts including Tom Joyner, Russ Parr, Yolanda Adams, Rickey Smiley, Bishop T.D. Jakes, DL Hughley and the Reverend Al Sharpton.[52]
Stations[edit]
As of October 2015, Urban One's Radio One division operates 53 radio stations in 16 markets.[53]


Market
Station and Frequency
Owned since
Format
Notes


Atlanta
WAMJ 107.5 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WHTA 107.9 FM
2001
Mainstream urban



WPZE 102.5 FM
2004
Urban gospel



WUMJ 97.5 FM
1995
Classic hip-hop
Simulcast of W275BK


Baltimore
WERQ-FM 92.3 FM
1993
Mainstream urban



WOLB 1010 AM

News/Talk



WWIN 1400 AM

Urban gospel



WWIN-FM 95.9 FM
1992
Urban adult contemporary



Boston
WILD 1090 AM
2001
News/Talk



Charlotte
WOSF 105.3 FM
2012
Urban oldies



WQNC 92.7 FM

Urban contemporary



WPZS 100.9 FM
2004
Urban gospel



Cincinnati
WOSL 100.3 FM
2006
Urban Oldies



WDBZ 1230 AM
2007
Talk/Urban gospel



WIZF 101.1 FM

Urban contemporary



Cleveland
WENZ 107.9 FM
1999
Mainstream urban



WERE 1490 AM
2000
News/Talk



WJMO 1300 AM
1999
Urban gospel



WZAK 93.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary



Columbus, Ohio
WCKX 107.5 FM

Mainstream Urban



WJYD 107.1 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban Gospel
Licensed to Circleville, Ohio


WBMO 106.3 FM
late 1990s
Classic Hip-Hop



WXMG 95.5 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban adult contemporary
Licensed to Lancaster, Ohio


Dallas/Fort Worth
KBFB 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KSOC 94.5 FM
2002
Classic hip-hop



Detroit
WCHB 1200 AM
1998
News/Talk
Has LP simulcast on W260CB 99.9 FM


WDMK 105.9 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WPZR 102.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WGPR 107.5 FM
2011*
Mainstream urban
*Under LMA with International Free and Accepted Modern Masons


Houston
KBXX 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KMJQ 102.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
Operates an urban gospel format on KMJQ-HD2


KROI 92.1 FM
2004
CHR/Top-40



Indianapolis
WHHH 96.3 FM

Rhythmic contemporary



WNOW-FM 100.9 FM

CHR/Top 40



WTLC 1310 AM
2001
Urban gospel



WTLC-FM 106.7 FM
2001
Urban adult contemporary



Philadelphia
WPHI-FM 103.9 FM
1996
Classic hip-hop



WPPZ-FM 107.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WRNB 100.3 FM
2001
Urban oldies



Raleigh/Durham
WFXC 107.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
both WFXC and WFXK are simulcasts


WFXK 104.3 FM


WNNL 103.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WQOK 97.5 FM
2000
Mainstream urban



Richmond, Virginia
WCDX 92.1 FM

Mainstream urban



WKJM 99.3 FM

Urban adult contemporary
both WKJM and WKJS are simulcasts


WKJS 105.7 FM


WPZZ 104.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WTPS 1240 AM
late 1990s
News/Talk



St. Louis
WFUN-FM 95.5 FM
1999
Urban oldies



WHHL 104.1 FM
2005
Mainstream urban



Washington, DC
WKYS 93.9 FM
early 1990s (?)
Urban contemporary



WMMJ 102.3 FM
1987
Urban adult contemporary



WOL 1450 AM
1980
News/Talk
First property of Radio One and its flagship


WPRS-FM 104.1 FM
2006
Urban gospel



WYCB 1340 AM

Urban gospel



Milestones[edit]


Year
Event


1980
Radio One founded by Cathy Hughes.[8]


1997
Alfred C. Liggins III succeeds Hughes as president and CEO.[9]


1999
Goes public on NASDAQ, trading as ROIA (later changed to ROIAK).[8]


2000
Acquires 12 Clear Channel stations.[18]


2004
TV One launched in joint venture with Comcast.[8]


Purchases a majority stake in Reach Media.[42]


2008
Launches Interactive One.[27]


Acquires social networking firm Community Connect.[50]


2015
Announces deal to buy out Comcast's share of TV One.[26]


See also[edit]


African American portal
Radio portal



Inner City Broadcasting Corporation
TV One
Interactive One
Cathy Hughes
Tom Joyner

References[edit]


^ a b c Radio One Inc. Income Statement, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b Radio One Inc. Balance Sheet, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ Radio One Inc. Profile, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b c Felicia R. Lee, "A Network for Blacks With Sense of Mission", The New York Times, December 11, 2007.
^ "BE 100's 2014". Black Enterprise. Retrieved 2016-11-22. 
^ "Radio One increases stake in Reach Media, makes plans to launch a new Urban network", Target Market News, December 3, 2012.
^ "Blacks In Wax Features Radio One Founder Cathy Hughes", New Pittsburgh Courier, September 26, 2014.
^ a b c d e f g Steven Overly, "With purchase of radio station WOL in 1980, Cathy Hughes launched a media empire", The Washington Post, August 11, 2014.
^ a b c d e f Clea Simon, "Mining an Untapped Market, Radio One Becomes a Force", The New York Times, December 25, 2000.
^ Chandrani Ghosh, "The Comeback Queen", Forbes, September 20, 1999.
^ a b c Jessie Carney Smith, ed., Black Firsts: 4,000 Ground-Breaking and Pioneering Historical Events, Canton, MI: Visible Ink Press, 2003, pp. 63-64.
^ a b Robyn D. Clarke, "High-Frequency Profits", Black Enterprise, June 2000.
^ a b c Clea Simon, "WILD to air new African-American talk-radio network", Boston Globe, October 29, 2005.
^ a b "Radio One's Number One", Wharton Alumni Magazine, Spring 2007.
^ a b c Joe Flint, "Latest protestor of Comcast – NBC deal plays race card and has ex-FCC chairman on board", Los Angeles Times, April 27, 2010.
^ Gail Mitchell, "Q&A: Cathy Hughes", Billboard, December 3, 2005, p. 25.
^ Janean Chun, "Cathy Hughes, Radio One: From Teen Mom to Media Mogul", Huffington Post, September 26, 2012.
^ a b c d e f "Radio One, Inc. History", Funding Universe. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One To Rename As Urban One Inc. - Radio Insight (published November 3, 2016)
^ Radio One Completes Name Change To Urban One - Radio Insight (published May 8, 2017)
^ Seth Schiesel, "Comcast and Radio One in TV Joint Venture", The New York Times, January 13, 2003.
^ Rob Owen, "Tuned In: TV One aims to be BET for grown-ups", Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, January 12, 2006.
^ "Brad Siegel Named TV One President", Deadline.com, December 17, 2014.
^ Wayne Barrett, "Al Sharpton's Radio Power Play", The Daily Beast, July 28, 2011.
^ Sijie Wang, "TV One Rebrands Around Storytelling", The Hollywood Reporter, June 20, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One Gears Up for TV One Deal", Inside Radio, March 20, 2015.
^ a b Nicholas Carlson, "Former AOL Entertainment Boss Mike Rich Goes To Interactive One", Business Insider, July 9, 2010.
^ C. Daniel Baker, "Interactive One Studios Adds Russell Simmons' GlobalGrind.com to its Roster", Black Enterprise, April 15, 2013.
^ Tanzina Vega, "Black News In New Focus", The New York Times, July 11, 2011.
^ William Launder, "Digital Marketer Links Up With Russell Simmons", The Wall Street Journal, April 15, 2013.
^ Todd Spangler, "Interactive One Launches Digital Studio to Produce Series for Women of Color", Variety, February 11, 2015.
^ Jessica Klein, "Interactive One Will Launch HB Studios with Doc 'Women of Color'", Video Ink, February 11, 2015.
^ Matthew Flamm, "Urban websites face off", Crain's New York Business, June 12, 2011.
^ "Interactive One Launches Elev8, a New Site Devoted to Uplifting", PR Newswire, October 27, 2013.
^ "Radio One to Acquire Another Philadelphia Station", The New York Times, December 4, 1999.
^ "Radio One to Buy 12 Clear Channel Stations", The New York Times, March 14, 2000.
^ "Radio One Buying Rival Blue Chip Broadcasting", The New York Times, February 9, 2001.
^ "Radio Broadcaster for Black Listeners to Buy Station", The New York Times, June 27, 2001.
^ "Radio One Acquires Third Station in Houston Market", The New York Times, May 25, 2004.
^ G. Patrick Pawling, "Vintage Radio, Down to Farm Reports and School Menus, Is Signing Off", The New York Times, February 1, 2004.
^ Ben Sisario, "A Radio Merger in New York Reflects a Shifting Industry", The New York Times, April 29, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One to boost Joyner", Los Angeles Times, November 23, 2004.
^ a b Andrea K. Walker, "Radio One to acquire Joyner company", Baltimore Sun, November 23, 2004.
^ Ann Brown, "Radio Play: Radio One Increases Investment in Tom Joyner's Reach Media", Madame Noire, December 5, 2012.
^ "Syndication One To Consolidate With Reach Media", All Access, December 3, 2012.
^ "Alfred Liggins and David Kantor On The Radio One Reach Media Merger", The Urban Daily, March 20, 2013.
^ "Radio One Picks Up Giant Magazine", The New York Times, January 4, 2007.
^ a b Anita Huslin, "Radio One's Losses Grow, Stock Declines", The Washington Post, February 22, 2008.
^ Amanda Ernst, "Giant Magazine Suspends Publication, Moves To Web", Mediabistro, November 30, 2009.
^ a b Dan Frommer, "BlackPlanet Parent Community Connect Sells To Radio One For $38 Million", Business Insider, April 11, 2008.
^ Jeff Clabaugh, "Arlington Capital Partners buys 10 Radio One stations", Washington Business Journal, May 18, 2007.
^ "Reaching Our Audience Wherever They Are", radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One, radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.


External links[edit]

Radio One official website
TV One official website
Reach Media official website
Interactive One official website







v
t
e


Urban One



Key people



Cathy Hughes (Chairman and CEO)





Radio shows



The Tom Joyner Morning Show (via Reach Media under contract)
Russ Parr Morning Show (via AURN)
The Yolanda Adams Morning Show
The Donnie Simpson Show










Radio stations (under the Radio One division)



Mainstream urban



KBFB
KBXX
WCDX
WCKX
WENZ
WERQ-FM
WGPR1
WHHL
WHTA
WIZF
WKYS
WQNC
WQOK





Urban adult
contemporary



KMJQ
WAMJ
WBMO
WDCJ
WDMK
WFXC
WFXK
WKJM
WKJS
WMMJ
WRNB
WTLC-FM
WUMJ
WWIN-FM
WXMG
WZAK





Urban gospel



WJMO
WJYD
WNNL
WPPZ-FM
WPRS-FM
WPZE
WPZR
WPZS
WPZZ
WTLC
WWIN
WYCB





Urban talk



WCHB
WDBZ
WERE
WOL
WOLB





CHR



WNOW-FM
KROI





Rhythmic CHR



WHHH





Rhythmic Oldies



WFUN-FM
WOSF
WOSL





Classic hip hop



KSOC
WPHI-FM
W275BK





China Radio International



WILD





ESPN Radio



WTPS
WXGI













Other






WDNI-CD (Telemundo)
TV One
Interactive One











1 Owned by International Free and Accepted Modern Masons and operated by Radio One under an LMA.










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Urban_One&oldid=788423291"					
Categories: Radio One (company)Radio broadcasting companies of the United StatesCompanies based in MarylandCompanies established in 1980Companies listed on NASDAQ 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 09:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.



























Urban One - Representing Black America


































































































































 



You seem to have Javascript disabled. This website needs javascript in order to function properly!        


























 







 


[sta_anchor id=”brands”]


OUR BRANDS































 
Urban
is the New
Mainstream.


 OUR REACH







Million Unique Visitors








Million App Streams








% of Black America Reached








Million Video Streams


 IN THE MEDIA







%


91% of Blacks believe advertising on black media is more relevant.



%


Blacks spend almost 30% more time watching videos on the Internet than the general population.



%


Blacks watch TV 42% more than the general population.



%


70% of Blacks continue to connect to urban radio.


 
We are
One of a
Kind.


 SOCIAL MEDIA#urban1


@ VIEW ON INSTAGRAM












 




















































Urban One - Wikipedia





















 






Urban One

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Radio One (company))

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Urban One, Inc.


Type

Public


Traded as
NASDAQ: UONEK


Industry
Media


Founded
1980


Founder
Cathy Hughes


Headquarters
1010 Wayne Avenue
Floor 14
Silver Spring, MD 20910



Area served

United States



Key people

Cathy Hughes
(Chairman)
Alfred C. Liggins III
(President & CEO)


Revenue
 US$ 441.4 million (2014)[1]



Operating income

 US$ 77.2 million (2014)[1]



Net income

 US$ -42.7 million (2014)[1]


Total assets
 US$ 1.4 billion (2014)[2]


Total equity
 US$ 18.9 million (2014)[2]



Number of employees

1,011 (2015)[3]


Divisions
Reach Media
TV One
Interactive One
NewsOne


Website
radio-one.com


Urban One, Inc. is an American media company with holdings in radio, cable television and digital media. Urban One owns and operates 55 radio stations in 16 US markets. It is the largest African American-owned broadcasting company in the US, and the largest radio broadcaster targeting African American and urban listeners.[4] The company's station offerings are primarily hip-hop, rap, R&B, talk radio and news.
As of 2014, the company under the previous name Radio One (until May 2017) was the ninth-highest earning African-American business in the United States.[5]
Urban One owns Reach Media, the largest radio network targeting African American and urban listeners;[6] a majority stake in TV One, a cable television network targeting African American women; and Interactive One, a digital publisher with brands and websites targeting urban users.[7]



Contents


1 History
2 Launches

2.1 TV One
2.2 Interactive One


3 Acquisitions

3.1 Radio stations
3.2 Reach Media
3.3 Print
3.4 Internet


4 Divestures
5 Personalities
6 Stations
7 Milestones
8 See also
9 References
10 External links



History[edit]
Urban One was founded as Radio One in 1980 by Cathy Hughes, a then-recently divorced single mother, with the purchase of the Washington, DC radio station WOL-AM for $995,000.[8][9][10] She changed the station's programming format from all-music to one that examined politics and culture from an African American perspective.[8] Hughes purchased her second station, WMMJ in Washington, seven years later, which began to turn a profit once she converted it into a rhythm and blues station.[9] This established Radio One's early strategy of purchasing small, underperforming radio stations in urban markets and refocusing them to serve the demographics of their communities.[9]
After joining the company in 1985 and managing its day-to-day operations since 1993, Hughes' son, Alfred C. Liggins III, took over as CEO in 1997, with Hughes becoming the board's chairperson.[9][11][12] Under the guidance of recently appointed CEO Liggins, Radio One went public on May 6, 1999, while continuing to be controlled by the family.[13][14] The company's initial public offering was for 6.5 million shares at $24 per share.[12] This made Hughes the first African American woman to chair a public company.[8][11] As of 2010, Hughes and Liggins control 90% of Radio One's voting stock.[15]
In 2001, Radio One expanded into 22 markets, with 18 million listeners, making it the nation's largest urban-market radio broadcasting company.[14] Radio One reached a peak of owning 70 stations in 22 markets in 2007.[16] It is the largest African American-owned-and-operated broadcast company in the US.[11][17]




Radio One logo and slogan used until May 8, 2017.


In 1996, Radio One moved its corporate offices from Washington, DC, to Lanham, Maryland.[18] The company is now based in Silver Spring, Maryland.[8]
Radio One announced that it would rename itself as Urban One, Inc. on January 1, 2017. Each entity will still retain their current brandings (radio stations will still operate under the branding of Radio One, and the same applies to TV One, Interactive One, and Reach Media). This follows the company's move into broader holdings such as the soon-to-open MGM National Harbor casino in Washington DC.[19] The name change was completed on May 8, 2017.[20]
Launches[edit]
TV One[edit]
In January 2003, Radio One and Comcast announced an agreement to a joint venture to create a television network aimed at African Americans ages 25–54.[21] On January 19, 2004, on Martin Luther King Jr.'s birthday, Radio One launched the television station TV One, airing African American entertainment, lifestyle and scripted shows, in 2.2 million households.[4][15][22] Liggins serves as chairman of TV One.[15] Brad Siegel was hired as president of TV One in late 2014.[23]
By the end of 2007, TV One was in 42.2 million homes.[4] In 2011, Comcast and NBC merged, with all Comcast cable holdings subsequently managed by NBC. Also in 2011, Radio One's ownership stake in TV One grew from 36.8% to 50.8%.[24] In 2012, TV One changed its programming, doubling the amount of original content, and changing the logo, while keeping its target audience. As of 2012, TV One reaches 57.4 million US homes.[25]
In March 2015, Radio One announced a deal to buy out Comcast's 47.9% share of TV One for $550 million. To assist with the deal, Radio One refinanced $119 million in outstanding debt, and will ultimately refinance debt totaling approximately $1 billion.[26]
Interactive One[edit]
In 2008, Radio One launched Interactive One, an online portfolio of digital brands, to complement their other media companies. Interactive One operates numerous digital brands, including News One, The Urban Daily and Hello Beautiful.[27][28] In 2011, Interactive One entered into an editorial and sales partnership with NBC News, aligning News One with NBC's The Grio.[29] As of 2013, Interactive One also has a partnership with Global Grind, a website founded by Russell Simmons and focused on pop culture and music content for African American and Hispanic audiences.[30] In 2015, Interactive One launched HB Studios, a video production studio focused on creating scripted and unscripted programming about women and the diversity of their experiences. The programming will be featured on the iOne Women Channel, HelloBeautiful.com, YouTube and Facebook.[31][32]
As of 2011, Interactive was the largest network of owned and operated sites aimed at an African American audience.[33] As of 2014, Interactive One reaches over 18 million unique monthly users on its platform through over 80 national and local brands.[34]
Acquisitions[edit]
Radio stations[edit]
In 1995, Radio One purchased WKYS-FM in Washington, DC, for $34 million, and also entered the Atlanta market by purchasing WHAT-FM for $4.5 million.[18] In 1997, the company entered the Philadelphia market with its purchase of WPHI-FM for $20 million. The company added numerous stations in the second half of the 1990s, including stations in Atlanta, St. Louis, Boston, Cleveland, Richmond, San Francisco, Detroit and Boston.[13][18][35]
In 2000, Radio One purchased 12 stations for approximately $1.3 billion from Clear Channel, bringing Radio One into Los Angeles, Dallas, Houston and Miami, along with stations in Cleveland and Greenville, South Carolina. Soon after, Radio One added two more Dallas stations.[9][18][36] In total, the company added 21 radio stations in 2000.[18]
In February 2001, Radio One purchased rival company Blue Chip Broadcasting for approximately $135 million ($45 million cash with the remainder in stock). The purchase included 15 radio stations owned and operated by Cincinnati-based Blue Chip in Ohio, Minnesota and Kentucky. Earlier that month, Radio One had also purchased another Dallas radio station for $52.5 million.[37] In June 2001, Radio One purchased Georgia radio station WPEZ-FM from US Broadcasting for $55 million.[38]
In 2004, Radio One purchased KRTS-FM in Houston for approximately $72.5 million in cash, giving it three stations in the Houston market.[39] Also in 2004, Radio One purchased country station WSNJ in Bridgeton, New Jersey, for $35 million. It had been on the air since 1937 and family-owned by the Ed and Katherine Bold family for over 50 years.[40]
In 2011, Radio One changed stations in Houston, Cincinnati and Columbus, Ohio, from African American to general interest formats, due to low ratings.[41]
Reach Media[edit]
In November 2004, Radio One acquired a 53% stake in Reach Media, a Texas-based media company owned by radio host Tom Joyner, for $56.1 million in cash and stock.[42][43] The deal also gave Radio One ownership rights to Joyner's syndicated Tom Joyner Morning Show, which was at the time airing on 115 stations to 8 million listeners; and news website BlackAmericaWeb.com, which had at the time approximately 800,000 members, giving Radio One its first strong Internet presence.[43]
In 2005, Radio One teamed up with Reach Media to launch a new African American-centered talk radio network, with programming hosted by the Reverend Al Sharpton, to be broadcast on up to 10 of Radio One's stations, as well as stations owned by other companies.[13] In December 2012, under a new deal, Radio One increased its ownership stake in Reach Media to 80%.[44] That same month, Radio One announced that the following year, it would merge its Syndication One urban programming lineup with Reach Media.[45][46]
Print[edit]
In January 2007, Radio One purchased GIANT magazine for $275,000.[47][48] In December 2009, the company suspended publication of the print version of the bi-monthly magazine, relaunching it online as GIANTLife.com. The website is a part of the Interactive One network.[49]
Internet[edit]
In 2008, Radio One acquired social networking firm Community Connect, the parent company of BlackPlanet, AsianAvenue and MiGente, for $38 million. BlackPlanet at the time had 20 million members and was the nation's fourth-most visited social networking site.[50]
Divestures[edit]
From 2006 through the beginning of 2008, Radio One sold nearly $150 million in assets, primarily underperforming radio stations.[48] In 2007, Radio One sold 10 stations to Main Line Broadcasting for approximately $76 million in cash. The stations sold were in Radio One's markets with the smallest African American populations. The sale decreased the number of Radio One's stations from 71 to 61.[51]
Personalities[edit]
Radio One operates a variety of syndicated shows, with hosts including Tom Joyner, Russ Parr, Yolanda Adams, Rickey Smiley, Bishop T.D. Jakes, DL Hughley and the Reverend Al Sharpton.[52]
Stations[edit]
As of October 2015, Urban One's Radio One division operates 53 radio stations in 16 markets.[53]


Market
Station and Frequency
Owned since
Format
Notes


Atlanta
WAMJ 107.5 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WHTA 107.9 FM
2001
Mainstream urban



WPZE 102.5 FM
2004
Urban gospel



WUMJ 97.5 FM
1995
Classic hip-hop
Simulcast of W275BK


Baltimore
WERQ-FM 92.3 FM
1993
Mainstream urban



WOLB 1010 AM

News/Talk



WWIN 1400 AM

Urban gospel



WWIN-FM 95.9 FM
1992
Urban adult contemporary



Boston
WILD 1090 AM
2001
News/Talk



Charlotte
WOSF 105.3 FM
2012
Urban oldies



WQNC 92.7 FM

Urban contemporary



WPZS 100.9 FM
2004
Urban gospel



Cincinnati
WOSL 100.3 FM
2006
Urban Oldies



WDBZ 1230 AM
2007
Talk/Urban gospel



WIZF 101.1 FM

Urban contemporary



Cleveland
WENZ 107.9 FM
1999
Mainstream urban



WERE 1490 AM
2000
News/Talk



WJMO 1300 AM
1999
Urban gospel



WZAK 93.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary



Columbus, Ohio
WCKX 107.5 FM

Mainstream Urban



WJYD 107.1 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban Gospel
Licensed to Circleville, Ohio


WBMO 106.3 FM
late 1990s
Classic Hip-Hop



WXMG 95.5 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban adult contemporary
Licensed to Lancaster, Ohio


Dallas/Fort Worth
KBFB 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KSOC 94.5 FM
2002
Classic hip-hop



Detroit
WCHB 1200 AM
1998
News/Talk
Has LP simulcast on W260CB 99.9 FM


WDMK 105.9 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WPZR 102.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WGPR 107.5 FM
2011*
Mainstream urban
*Under LMA with International Free and Accepted Modern Masons


Houston
KBXX 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KMJQ 102.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
Operates an urban gospel format on KMJQ-HD2


KROI 92.1 FM
2004
CHR/Top-40



Indianapolis
WHHH 96.3 FM

Rhythmic contemporary



WNOW-FM 100.9 FM

CHR/Top 40



WTLC 1310 AM
2001
Urban gospel



WTLC-FM 106.7 FM
2001
Urban adult contemporary



Philadelphia
WPHI-FM 103.9 FM
1996
Classic hip-hop



WPPZ-FM 107.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WRNB 100.3 FM
2001
Urban oldies



Raleigh/Durham
WFXC 107.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
both WFXC and WFXK are simulcasts


WFXK 104.3 FM


WNNL 103.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WQOK 97.5 FM
2000
Mainstream urban



Richmond, Virginia
WCDX 92.1 FM

Mainstream urban



WKJM 99.3 FM

Urban adult contemporary
both WKJM and WKJS are simulcasts


WKJS 105.7 FM


WPZZ 104.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WTPS 1240 AM
late 1990s
News/Talk



St. Louis
WFUN-FM 95.5 FM
1999
Urban oldies



WHHL 104.1 FM
2005
Mainstream urban



Washington, DC
WKYS 93.9 FM
early 1990s (?)
Urban contemporary



WMMJ 102.3 FM
1987
Urban adult contemporary



WOL 1450 AM
1980
News/Talk
First property of Radio One and its flagship


WPRS-FM 104.1 FM
2006
Urban gospel



WYCB 1340 AM

Urban gospel



Milestones[edit]


Year
Event


1980
Radio One founded by Cathy Hughes.[8]


1997
Alfred C. Liggins III succeeds Hughes as president and CEO.[9]


1999
Goes public on NASDAQ, trading as ROIA (later changed to ROIAK).[8]


2000
Acquires 12 Clear Channel stations.[18]


2004
TV One launched in joint venture with Comcast.[8]


Purchases a majority stake in Reach Media.[42]


2008
Launches Interactive One.[27]


Acquires social networking firm Community Connect.[50]


2015
Announces deal to buy out Comcast's share of TV One.[26]


See also[edit]


African American portal
Radio portal



Inner City Broadcasting Corporation
TV One
Interactive One
Cathy Hughes
Tom Joyner

References[edit]


^ a b c Radio One Inc. Income Statement, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b Radio One Inc. Balance Sheet, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ Radio One Inc. Profile, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b c Felicia R. Lee, "A Network for Blacks With Sense of Mission", The New York Times, December 11, 2007.
^ "BE 100's 2014". Black Enterprise. Retrieved 2016-11-22. 
^ "Radio One increases stake in Reach Media, makes plans to launch a new Urban network", Target Market News, December 3, 2012.
^ "Blacks In Wax Features Radio One Founder Cathy Hughes", New Pittsburgh Courier, September 26, 2014.
^ a b c d e f g Steven Overly, "With purchase of radio station WOL in 1980, Cathy Hughes launched a media empire", The Washington Post, August 11, 2014.
^ a b c d e f Clea Simon, "Mining an Untapped Market, Radio One Becomes a Force", The New York Times, December 25, 2000.
^ Chandrani Ghosh, "The Comeback Queen", Forbes, September 20, 1999.
^ a b c Jessie Carney Smith, ed., Black Firsts: 4,000 Ground-Breaking and Pioneering Historical Events, Canton, MI: Visible Ink Press, 2003, pp. 63-64.
^ a b Robyn D. Clarke, "High-Frequency Profits", Black Enterprise, June 2000.
^ a b c Clea Simon, "WILD to air new African-American talk-radio network", Boston Globe, October 29, 2005.
^ a b "Radio One's Number One", Wharton Alumni Magazine, Spring 2007.
^ a b c Joe Flint, "Latest protestor of Comcast – NBC deal plays race card and has ex-FCC chairman on board", Los Angeles Times, April 27, 2010.
^ Gail Mitchell, "Q&A: Cathy Hughes", Billboard, December 3, 2005, p. 25.
^ Janean Chun, "Cathy Hughes, Radio One: From Teen Mom to Media Mogul", Huffington Post, September 26, 2012.
^ a b c d e f "Radio One, Inc. History", Funding Universe. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One To Rename As Urban One Inc. - Radio Insight (published November 3, 2016)
^ Radio One Completes Name Change To Urban One - Radio Insight (published May 8, 2017)
^ Seth Schiesel, "Comcast and Radio One in TV Joint Venture", The New York Times, January 13, 2003.
^ Rob Owen, "Tuned In: TV One aims to be BET for grown-ups", Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, January 12, 2006.
^ "Brad Siegel Named TV One President", Deadline.com, December 17, 2014.
^ Wayne Barrett, "Al Sharpton's Radio Power Play", The Daily Beast, July 28, 2011.
^ Sijie Wang, "TV One Rebrands Around Storytelling", The Hollywood Reporter, June 20, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One Gears Up for TV One Deal", Inside Radio, March 20, 2015.
^ a b Nicholas Carlson, "Former AOL Entertainment Boss Mike Rich Goes To Interactive One", Business Insider, July 9, 2010.
^ C. Daniel Baker, "Interactive One Studios Adds Russell Simmons' GlobalGrind.com to its Roster", Black Enterprise, April 15, 2013.
^ Tanzina Vega, "Black News In New Focus", The New York Times, July 11, 2011.
^ William Launder, "Digital Marketer Links Up With Russell Simmons", The Wall Street Journal, April 15, 2013.
^ Todd Spangler, "Interactive One Launches Digital Studio to Produce Series for Women of Color", Variety, February 11, 2015.
^ Jessica Klein, "Interactive One Will Launch HB Studios with Doc 'Women of Color'", Video Ink, February 11, 2015.
^ Matthew Flamm, "Urban websites face off", Crain's New York Business, June 12, 2011.
^ "Interactive One Launches Elev8, a New Site Devoted to Uplifting", PR Newswire, October 27, 2013.
^ "Radio One to Acquire Another Philadelphia Station", The New York Times, December 4, 1999.
^ "Radio One to Buy 12 Clear Channel Stations", The New York Times, March 14, 2000.
^ "Radio One Buying Rival Blue Chip Broadcasting", The New York Times, February 9, 2001.
^ "Radio Broadcaster for Black Listeners to Buy Station", The New York Times, June 27, 2001.
^ "Radio One Acquires Third Station in Houston Market", The New York Times, May 25, 2004.
^ G. Patrick Pawling, "Vintage Radio, Down to Farm Reports and School Menus, Is Signing Off", The New York Times, February 1, 2004.
^ Ben Sisario, "A Radio Merger in New York Reflects a Shifting Industry", The New York Times, April 29, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One to boost Joyner", Los Angeles Times, November 23, 2004.
^ a b Andrea K. Walker, "Radio One to acquire Joyner company", Baltimore Sun, November 23, 2004.
^ Ann Brown, "Radio Play: Radio One Increases Investment in Tom Joyner's Reach Media", Madame Noire, December 5, 2012.
^ "Syndication One To Consolidate With Reach Media", All Access, December 3, 2012.
^ "Alfred Liggins and David Kantor On The Radio One Reach Media Merger", The Urban Daily, March 20, 2013.
^ "Radio One Picks Up Giant Magazine", The New York Times, January 4, 2007.
^ a b Anita Huslin, "Radio One's Losses Grow, Stock Declines", The Washington Post, February 22, 2008.
^ Amanda Ernst, "Giant Magazine Suspends Publication, Moves To Web", Mediabistro, November 30, 2009.
^ a b Dan Frommer, "BlackPlanet Parent Community Connect Sells To Radio One For $38 Million", Business Insider, April 11, 2008.
^ Jeff Clabaugh, "Arlington Capital Partners buys 10 Radio One stations", Washington Business Journal, May 18, 2007.
^ "Reaching Our Audience Wherever They Are", radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One, radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.


External links[edit]

Radio One official website
TV One official website
Reach Media official website
Interactive One official website







v
t
e


Urban One



Key people



Cathy Hughes (Chairman and CEO)





Radio shows



The Tom Joyner Morning Show (via Reach Media under contract)
Russ Parr Morning Show (via AURN)
The Yolanda Adams Morning Show
The Donnie Simpson Show










Radio stations (under the Radio One division)



Mainstream urban



KBFB
KBXX
WCDX
WCKX
WENZ
WERQ-FM
WGPR1
WHHL
WHTA
WIZF
WKYS
WQNC
WQOK





Urban adult
contemporary



KMJQ
WAMJ
WBMO
WDCJ
WDMK
WFXC
WFXK
WKJM
WKJS
WMMJ
WRNB
WTLC-FM
WUMJ
WWIN-FM
WXMG
WZAK





Urban gospel



WJMO
WJYD
WNNL
WPPZ-FM
WPRS-FM
WPZE
WPZR
WPZS
WPZZ
WTLC
WWIN
WYCB





Urban talk



WCHB
WDBZ
WERE
WOL
WOLB





CHR



WNOW-FM
KROI





Rhythmic CHR



WHHH





Rhythmic Oldies



WFUN-FM
WOSF
WOSL





Classic hip hop



KSOC
WPHI-FM
W275BK





China Radio International



WILD





ESPN Radio



WTPS
WXGI













Other






WDNI-CD (Telemundo)
TV One
Interactive One











1 Owned by International Free and Accepted Modern Masons and operated by Radio One under an LMA.










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Urban_One&oldid=788423291"					
Categories: Radio One (company)Radio broadcasting companies of the United StatesCompanies based in MarylandCompanies established in 1980Companies listed on NASDAQ 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 09:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 







需要安全验证




Facebook加入或登录 Facebook   邮箱或手机号密码忘记帐户？登录想加入 Facebook 吗？注册注册安全验证码请输入以下文本看不清楚上面的文字？换一个或播放语音验证信息框中文字：这是什么？安全验证这是一个标准的安全测试，用于阻止垃圾邮件制造者创建假帐户并向用户发送垃圾信息。提交中文(简体)English (US)日本語한국어Français (France)Bahasa IndonesiaPolskiEspañolPortuguês (Brasil)DeutschItalianoMessengerFacebook Lite用户地点游戏位置名人二手市场小组食谱彩色气球Instagram公司简介创建广告创建主页开发者招聘信息隐私权政策Cookie广告选项条款设置活动日志 Facebook © 2017





Urban One - Wikipedia





















 






Urban One

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
  (Redirected from Radio One (company))

					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Urban One, Inc.


Type

Public


Traded as
NASDAQ: UONEK


Industry
Media


Founded
1980


Founder
Cathy Hughes


Headquarters
1010 Wayne Avenue
Floor 14
Silver Spring, MD 20910



Area served

United States



Key people

Cathy Hughes
(Chairman)
Alfred C. Liggins III
(President & CEO)


Revenue
 US$ 441.4 million (2014)[1]



Operating income

 US$ 77.2 million (2014)[1]



Net income

 US$ -42.7 million (2014)[1]


Total assets
 US$ 1.4 billion (2014)[2]


Total equity
 US$ 18.9 million (2014)[2]



Number of employees

1,011 (2015)[3]


Divisions
Reach Media
TV One
Interactive One
NewsOne


Website
radio-one.com


Urban One, Inc. is an American media company with holdings in radio, cable television and digital media. Urban One owns and operates 55 radio stations in 16 US markets. It is the largest African American-owned broadcasting company in the US, and the largest radio broadcaster targeting African American and urban listeners.[4] The company's station offerings are primarily hip-hop, rap, R&B, talk radio and news.
As of 2014, the company under the previous name Radio One (until May 2017) was the ninth-highest earning African-American business in the United States.[5]
Urban One owns Reach Media, the largest radio network targeting African American and urban listeners;[6] a majority stake in TV One, a cable television network targeting African American women; and Interactive One, a digital publisher with brands and websites targeting urban users.[7]



Contents


1 History
2 Launches

2.1 TV One
2.2 Interactive One


3 Acquisitions

3.1 Radio stations
3.2 Reach Media
3.3 Print
3.4 Internet


4 Divestures
5 Personalities
6 Stations
7 Milestones
8 See also
9 References
10 External links



History[edit]
Urban One was founded as Radio One in 1980 by Cathy Hughes, a then-recently divorced single mother, with the purchase of the Washington, DC radio station WOL-AM for $995,000.[8][9][10] She changed the station's programming format from all-music to one that examined politics and culture from an African American perspective.[8] Hughes purchased her second station, WMMJ in Washington, seven years later, which began to turn a profit once she converted it into a rhythm and blues station.[9] This established Radio One's early strategy of purchasing small, underperforming radio stations in urban markets and refocusing them to serve the demographics of their communities.[9]
After joining the company in 1985 and managing its day-to-day operations since 1993, Hughes' son, Alfred C. Liggins III, took over as CEO in 1997, with Hughes becoming the board's chairperson.[9][11][12] Under the guidance of recently appointed CEO Liggins, Radio One went public on May 6, 1999, while continuing to be controlled by the family.[13][14] The company's initial public offering was for 6.5 million shares at $24 per share.[12] This made Hughes the first African American woman to chair a public company.[8][11] As of 2010, Hughes and Liggins control 90% of Radio One's voting stock.[15]
In 2001, Radio One expanded into 22 markets, with 18 million listeners, making it the nation's largest urban-market radio broadcasting company.[14] Radio One reached a peak of owning 70 stations in 22 markets in 2007.[16] It is the largest African American-owned-and-operated broadcast company in the US.[11][17]




Radio One logo and slogan used until May 8, 2017.


In 1996, Radio One moved its corporate offices from Washington, DC, to Lanham, Maryland.[18] The company is now based in Silver Spring, Maryland.[8]
Radio One announced that it would rename itself as Urban One, Inc. on January 1, 2017. Each entity will still retain their current brandings (radio stations will still operate under the branding of Radio One, and the same applies to TV One, Interactive One, and Reach Media). This follows the company's move into broader holdings such as the soon-to-open MGM National Harbor casino in Washington DC.[19] The name change was completed on May 8, 2017.[20]
Launches[edit]
TV One[edit]
In January 2003, Radio One and Comcast announced an agreement to a joint venture to create a television network aimed at African Americans ages 25–54.[21] On January 19, 2004, on Martin Luther King Jr.'s birthday, Radio One launched the television station TV One, airing African American entertainment, lifestyle and scripted shows, in 2.2 million households.[4][15][22] Liggins serves as chairman of TV One.[15] Brad Siegel was hired as president of TV One in late 2014.[23]
By the end of 2007, TV One was in 42.2 million homes.[4] In 2011, Comcast and NBC merged, with all Comcast cable holdings subsequently managed by NBC. Also in 2011, Radio One's ownership stake in TV One grew from 36.8% to 50.8%.[24] In 2012, TV One changed its programming, doubling the amount of original content, and changing the logo, while keeping its target audience. As of 2012, TV One reaches 57.4 million US homes.[25]
In March 2015, Radio One announced a deal to buy out Comcast's 47.9% share of TV One for $550 million. To assist with the deal, Radio One refinanced $119 million in outstanding debt, and will ultimately refinance debt totaling approximately $1 billion.[26]
Interactive One[edit]
In 2008, Radio One launched Interactive One, an online portfolio of digital brands, to complement their other media companies. Interactive One operates numerous digital brands, including News One, The Urban Daily and Hello Beautiful.[27][28] In 2011, Interactive One entered into an editorial and sales partnership with NBC News, aligning News One with NBC's The Grio.[29] As of 2013, Interactive One also has a partnership with Global Grind, a website founded by Russell Simmons and focused on pop culture and music content for African American and Hispanic audiences.[30] In 2015, Interactive One launched HB Studios, a video production studio focused on creating scripted and unscripted programming about women and the diversity of their experiences. The programming will be featured on the iOne Women Channel, HelloBeautiful.com, YouTube and Facebook.[31][32]
As of 2011, Interactive was the largest network of owned and operated sites aimed at an African American audience.[33] As of 2014, Interactive One reaches over 18 million unique monthly users on its platform through over 80 national and local brands.[34]
Acquisitions[edit]
Radio stations[edit]
In 1995, Radio One purchased WKYS-FM in Washington, DC, for $34 million, and also entered the Atlanta market by purchasing WHAT-FM for $4.5 million.[18] In 1997, the company entered the Philadelphia market with its purchase of WPHI-FM for $20 million. The company added numerous stations in the second half of the 1990s, including stations in Atlanta, St. Louis, Boston, Cleveland, Richmond, San Francisco, Detroit and Boston.[13][18][35]
In 2000, Radio One purchased 12 stations for approximately $1.3 billion from Clear Channel, bringing Radio One into Los Angeles, Dallas, Houston and Miami, along with stations in Cleveland and Greenville, South Carolina. Soon after, Radio One added two more Dallas stations.[9][18][36] In total, the company added 21 radio stations in 2000.[18]
In February 2001, Radio One purchased rival company Blue Chip Broadcasting for approximately $135 million ($45 million cash with the remainder in stock). The purchase included 15 radio stations owned and operated by Cincinnati-based Blue Chip in Ohio, Minnesota and Kentucky. Earlier that month, Radio One had also purchased another Dallas radio station for $52.5 million.[37] In June 2001, Radio One purchased Georgia radio station WPEZ-FM from US Broadcasting for $55 million.[38]
In 2004, Radio One purchased KRTS-FM in Houston for approximately $72.5 million in cash, giving it three stations in the Houston market.[39] Also in 2004, Radio One purchased country station WSNJ in Bridgeton, New Jersey, for $35 million. It had been on the air since 1937 and family-owned by the Ed and Katherine Bold family for over 50 years.[40]
In 2011, Radio One changed stations in Houston, Cincinnati and Columbus, Ohio, from African American to general interest formats, due to low ratings.[41]
Reach Media[edit]
In November 2004, Radio One acquired a 53% stake in Reach Media, a Texas-based media company owned by radio host Tom Joyner, for $56.1 million in cash and stock.[42][43] The deal also gave Radio One ownership rights to Joyner's syndicated Tom Joyner Morning Show, which was at the time airing on 115 stations to 8 million listeners; and news website BlackAmericaWeb.com, which had at the time approximately 800,000 members, giving Radio One its first strong Internet presence.[43]
In 2005, Radio One teamed up with Reach Media to launch a new African American-centered talk radio network, with programming hosted by the Reverend Al Sharpton, to be broadcast on up to 10 of Radio One's stations, as well as stations owned by other companies.[13] In December 2012, under a new deal, Radio One increased its ownership stake in Reach Media to 80%.[44] That same month, Radio One announced that the following year, it would merge its Syndication One urban programming lineup with Reach Media.[45][46]
Print[edit]
In January 2007, Radio One purchased GIANT magazine for $275,000.[47][48] In December 2009, the company suspended publication of the print version of the bi-monthly magazine, relaunching it online as GIANTLife.com. The website is a part of the Interactive One network.[49]
Internet[edit]
In 2008, Radio One acquired social networking firm Community Connect, the parent company of BlackPlanet, AsianAvenue and MiGente, for $38 million. BlackPlanet at the time had 20 million members and was the nation's fourth-most visited social networking site.[50]
Divestures[edit]
From 2006 through the beginning of 2008, Radio One sold nearly $150 million in assets, primarily underperforming radio stations.[48] In 2007, Radio One sold 10 stations to Main Line Broadcasting for approximately $76 million in cash. The stations sold were in Radio One's markets with the smallest African American populations. The sale decreased the number of Radio One's stations from 71 to 61.[51]
Personalities[edit]
Radio One operates a variety of syndicated shows, with hosts including Tom Joyner, Russ Parr, Yolanda Adams, Rickey Smiley, Bishop T.D. Jakes, DL Hughley and the Reverend Al Sharpton.[52]
Stations[edit]
As of October 2015, Urban One's Radio One division operates 53 radio stations in 16 markets.[53]


Market
Station and Frequency
Owned since
Format
Notes


Atlanta
WAMJ 107.5 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WHTA 107.9 FM
2001
Mainstream urban



WPZE 102.5 FM
2004
Urban gospel



WUMJ 97.5 FM
1995
Classic hip-hop
Simulcast of W275BK


Baltimore
WERQ-FM 92.3 FM
1993
Mainstream urban



WOLB 1010 AM

News/Talk



WWIN 1400 AM

Urban gospel



WWIN-FM 95.9 FM
1992
Urban adult contemporary



Boston
WILD 1090 AM
2001
News/Talk



Charlotte
WOSF 105.3 FM
2012
Urban oldies



WQNC 92.7 FM

Urban contemporary



WPZS 100.9 FM
2004
Urban gospel



Cincinnati
WOSL 100.3 FM
2006
Urban Oldies



WDBZ 1230 AM
2007
Talk/Urban gospel



WIZF 101.1 FM

Urban contemporary



Cleveland
WENZ 107.9 FM
1999
Mainstream urban



WERE 1490 AM
2000
News/Talk



WJMO 1300 AM
1999
Urban gospel



WZAK 93.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary



Columbus, Ohio
WCKX 107.5 FM

Mainstream Urban



WJYD 107.1 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban Gospel
Licensed to Circleville, Ohio


WBMO 106.3 FM
late 1990s
Classic Hip-Hop



WXMG 95.5 FM
November 12, 2015
Urban adult contemporary
Licensed to Lancaster, Ohio


Dallas/Fort Worth
KBFB 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KSOC 94.5 FM
2002
Classic hip-hop



Detroit
WCHB 1200 AM
1998
News/Talk
Has LP simulcast on W260CB 99.9 FM


WDMK 105.9 FM
1998
Urban adult contemporary



WPZR 102.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WGPR 107.5 FM
2011*
Mainstream urban
*Under LMA with International Free and Accepted Modern Masons


Houston
KBXX 97.9 FM
2000
Rhythmic contemporary



KMJQ 102.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
Operates an urban gospel format on KMJQ-HD2


KROI 92.1 FM
2004
CHR/Top-40



Indianapolis
WHHH 96.3 FM

Rhythmic contemporary



WNOW-FM 100.9 FM

CHR/Top 40



WTLC 1310 AM
2001
Urban gospel



WTLC-FM 106.7 FM
2001
Urban adult contemporary



Philadelphia
WPHI-FM 103.9 FM
1996
Classic hip-hop



WPPZ-FM 107.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WRNB 100.3 FM
2001
Urban oldies



Raleigh/Durham
WFXC 107.1 FM
2000
Urban adult contemporary
both WFXC and WFXK are simulcasts


WFXK 104.3 FM


WNNL 103.9 FM
2000
Urban gospel



WQOK 97.5 FM
2000
Mainstream urban



Richmond, Virginia
WCDX 92.1 FM

Mainstream urban



WKJM 99.3 FM

Urban adult contemporary
both WKJM and WKJS are simulcasts


WKJS 105.7 FM


WPZZ 104.7 FM
1999
Urban gospel



WTPS 1240 AM
late 1990s
News/Talk



St. Louis
WFUN-FM 95.5 FM
1999
Urban oldies



WHHL 104.1 FM
2005
Mainstream urban



Washington, DC
WKYS 93.9 FM
early 1990s (?)
Urban contemporary



WMMJ 102.3 FM
1987
Urban adult contemporary



WOL 1450 AM
1980
News/Talk
First property of Radio One and its flagship


WPRS-FM 104.1 FM
2006
Urban gospel



WYCB 1340 AM

Urban gospel



Milestones[edit]


Year
Event


1980
Radio One founded by Cathy Hughes.[8]


1997
Alfred C. Liggins III succeeds Hughes as president and CEO.[9]


1999
Goes public on NASDAQ, trading as ROIA (later changed to ROIAK).[8]


2000
Acquires 12 Clear Channel stations.[18]


2004
TV One launched in joint venture with Comcast.[8]


Purchases a majority stake in Reach Media.[42]


2008
Launches Interactive One.[27]


Acquires social networking firm Community Connect.[50]


2015
Announces deal to buy out Comcast's share of TV One.[26]


See also[edit]


African American portal
Radio portal



Inner City Broadcasting Corporation
TV One
Interactive One
Cathy Hughes
Tom Joyner

References[edit]


^ a b c Radio One Inc. Income Statement, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b Radio One Inc. Balance Sheet, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ Radio One Inc. Profile, Yahoo! Finance. Accessed June 16, 2015.
^ a b c Felicia R. Lee, "A Network for Blacks With Sense of Mission", The New York Times, December 11, 2007.
^ "BE 100's 2014". Black Enterprise. Retrieved 2016-11-22. 
^ "Radio One increases stake in Reach Media, makes plans to launch a new Urban network", Target Market News, December 3, 2012.
^ "Blacks In Wax Features Radio One Founder Cathy Hughes", New Pittsburgh Courier, September 26, 2014.
^ a b c d e f g Steven Overly, "With purchase of radio station WOL in 1980, Cathy Hughes launched a media empire", The Washington Post, August 11, 2014.
^ a b c d e f Clea Simon, "Mining an Untapped Market, Radio One Becomes a Force", The New York Times, December 25, 2000.
^ Chandrani Ghosh, "The Comeback Queen", Forbes, September 20, 1999.
^ a b c Jessie Carney Smith, ed., Black Firsts: 4,000 Ground-Breaking and Pioneering Historical Events, Canton, MI: Visible Ink Press, 2003, pp. 63-64.
^ a b Robyn D. Clarke, "High-Frequency Profits", Black Enterprise, June 2000.
^ a b c Clea Simon, "WILD to air new African-American talk-radio network", Boston Globe, October 29, 2005.
^ a b "Radio One's Number One", Wharton Alumni Magazine, Spring 2007.
^ a b c Joe Flint, "Latest protestor of Comcast – NBC deal plays race card and has ex-FCC chairman on board", Los Angeles Times, April 27, 2010.
^ Gail Mitchell, "Q&A: Cathy Hughes", Billboard, December 3, 2005, p. 25.
^ Janean Chun, "Cathy Hughes, Radio One: From Teen Mom to Media Mogul", Huffington Post, September 26, 2012.
^ a b c d e f "Radio One, Inc. History", Funding Universe. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One To Rename As Urban One Inc. - Radio Insight (published November 3, 2016)
^ Radio One Completes Name Change To Urban One - Radio Insight (published May 8, 2017)
^ Seth Schiesel, "Comcast and Radio One in TV Joint Venture", The New York Times, January 13, 2003.
^ Rob Owen, "Tuned In: TV One aims to be BET for grown-ups", Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, January 12, 2006.
^ "Brad Siegel Named TV One President", Deadline.com, December 17, 2014.
^ Wayne Barrett, "Al Sharpton's Radio Power Play", The Daily Beast, July 28, 2011.
^ Sijie Wang, "TV One Rebrands Around Storytelling", The Hollywood Reporter, June 20, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One Gears Up for TV One Deal", Inside Radio, March 20, 2015.
^ a b Nicholas Carlson, "Former AOL Entertainment Boss Mike Rich Goes To Interactive One", Business Insider, July 9, 2010.
^ C. Daniel Baker, "Interactive One Studios Adds Russell Simmons' GlobalGrind.com to its Roster", Black Enterprise, April 15, 2013.
^ Tanzina Vega, "Black News In New Focus", The New York Times, July 11, 2011.
^ William Launder, "Digital Marketer Links Up With Russell Simmons", The Wall Street Journal, April 15, 2013.
^ Todd Spangler, "Interactive One Launches Digital Studio to Produce Series for Women of Color", Variety, February 11, 2015.
^ Jessica Klein, "Interactive One Will Launch HB Studios with Doc 'Women of Color'", Video Ink, February 11, 2015.
^ Matthew Flamm, "Urban websites face off", Crain's New York Business, June 12, 2011.
^ "Interactive One Launches Elev8, a New Site Devoted to Uplifting", PR Newswire, October 27, 2013.
^ "Radio One to Acquire Another Philadelphia Station", The New York Times, December 4, 1999.
^ "Radio One to Buy 12 Clear Channel Stations", The New York Times, March 14, 2000.
^ "Radio One Buying Rival Blue Chip Broadcasting", The New York Times, February 9, 2001.
^ "Radio Broadcaster for Black Listeners to Buy Station", The New York Times, June 27, 2001.
^ "Radio One Acquires Third Station in Houston Market", The New York Times, May 25, 2004.
^ G. Patrick Pawling, "Vintage Radio, Down to Farm Reports and School Menus, Is Signing Off", The New York Times, February 1, 2004.
^ Ben Sisario, "A Radio Merger in New York Reflects a Shifting Industry", The New York Times, April 29, 2012.
^ a b "Radio One to boost Joyner", Los Angeles Times, November 23, 2004.
^ a b Andrea K. Walker, "Radio One to acquire Joyner company", Baltimore Sun, November 23, 2004.
^ Ann Brown, "Radio Play: Radio One Increases Investment in Tom Joyner's Reach Media", Madame Noire, December 5, 2012.
^ "Syndication One To Consolidate With Reach Media", All Access, December 3, 2012.
^ "Alfred Liggins and David Kantor On The Radio One Reach Media Merger", The Urban Daily, March 20, 2013.
^ "Radio One Picks Up Giant Magazine", The New York Times, January 4, 2007.
^ a b Anita Huslin, "Radio One's Losses Grow, Stock Declines", The Washington Post, February 22, 2008.
^ Amanda Ernst, "Giant Magazine Suspends Publication, Moves To Web", Mediabistro, November 30, 2009.
^ a b Dan Frommer, "BlackPlanet Parent Community Connect Sells To Radio One For $38 Million", Business Insider, April 11, 2008.
^ Jeff Clabaugh, "Arlington Capital Partners buys 10 Radio One stations", Washington Business Journal, May 18, 2007.
^ "Reaching Our Audience Wherever They Are", radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.
^ Radio One, radio-one.com. Accessed October 26, 2014.


External links[edit]

Radio One official website
TV One official website
Reach Media official website
Interactive One official website







v
t
e


Urban One



Key people



Cathy Hughes (Chairman and CEO)





Radio shows



The Tom Joyner Morning Show (via Reach Media under contract)
Russ Parr Morning Show (via AURN)
The Yolanda Adams Morning Show
The Donnie Simpson Show










Radio stations (under the Radio One division)



Mainstream urban



KBFB
KBXX
WCDX
WCKX
WENZ
WERQ-FM
WGPR1
WHHL
WHTA
WIZF
WKYS
WQNC
WQOK





Urban adult
contemporary



KMJQ
WAMJ
WBMO
WDCJ
WDMK
WFXC
WFXK
WKJM
WKJS
WMMJ
WRNB
WTLC-FM
WUMJ
WWIN-FM
WXMG
WZAK





Urban gospel



WJMO
WJYD
WNNL
WPPZ-FM
WPRS-FM
WPZE
WPZR
WPZS
WPZZ
WTLC
WWIN
WYCB





Urban talk



WCHB
WDBZ
WERE
WOL
WOLB





CHR



WNOW-FM
KROI





Rhythmic CHR



WHHH





Rhythmic Oldies



WFUN-FM
WOSF
WOSL





Classic hip hop



KSOC
WPHI-FM
W275BK





China Radio International



WILD





ESPN Radio



WTPS
WXGI













Other






WDNI-CD (Telemundo)
TV One
Interactive One











1 Owned by International Free and Accepted Modern Masons and operated by Radio One under an LMA.










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Urban_One&oldid=788423291"					
Categories: Radio One (company)Radio broadcasting companies of the United StatesCompanies based in MarylandCompanies established in 1980Companies listed on NASDAQ 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 1 July 2017, at 09:04.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Data Dumps  |  Freebase API (Deprecated)
       |  Google Developers
    
    
      
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
      
    
    
    All Products
  
  Sign in

  
  Send feedback
  





            Hey there! Are you maybe looking for Firebase instead?

            







    Data Dumps
  


The Freebase API will be completely shut-down on Aug 31 2016. This page provides access to the last available data dump. Read more.
Data Dumps are a downloadable version of the data in Freebase. They constitute a snapshot of the data stored in Freebase and the Schema that structures it, and are provided under the same CC-BY license. The Freebase/Wikidata mappings are provided under the CC0 license.

Freebase Triples
Freebase Deleted Triples
Freebase/Wikidata Mappings
License
Citing

Freebase Triples


This dataset contains every fact currently in Freebase.

Total triples: 1.9 billion
Updated: Weekly
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC-BY

22 GB gzip250 GB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.date> "2001-02"^^<http://www.w3.org/2001/XMLSchema#gYearMonth>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.source> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11x1gf2m6>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/type.object.type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.rate> 4.5 .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://www.w3.org/1999/02/22-rdf-syntax-ns#type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .


If you're writing your own code to parse the RDF dumps its often more efficient to read directly from GZip file rather than extracting the data first and then processing the uncompressed data.
<subject>  <predicate>  <object> .
Note: In Freebase, objects have MIDs that look like /m/012rkqx. In RDF those MIDs become m.012rkqx. Likewise, Freebase schema like /common/topic are written as common.topic.
The subject is the ID of a Freebase object. It can be a Freebase MID (ex. m.012rkqx) for topics and CVTs or a human-readable ID (ex. common.topic) for schema.
The predicate is always a human-readable ID for a Freebase property or a property from a standard RDF vocabulary like RDFS. Freebase foreign key namespaces are also used as predicates to make it easier to look up keys by namespace.
The object field may contain a Freebase MID for an object or a human-readable ID for schema from Freebase or other RDF vocabularies. It may also include literal values like strings, booleans and numeric values.
Topic descriptions often contain newlines. In order to make each triple fit on one line, we have escaped newlines with "\n".
Freebase Deleted Triples
We also provide a dump of triples that have been deleted from Freebase over time. This is a one-time dump through March 2013. In the future, we might consider providing periodic updates of recently deleted triples, but at the moment we have no specific timeframe for doing so, and are only providing this one-time dump. 

The dump is distributed as a .tar.gz file (2.1Gb compressed, 7.7Gb uncompressed). It contains 63,036,271 deleted triples in 20 files (there is no particular meaning to the individual files, it is just easier to manipulate several smaller files than one huge file).


Thanks to Chun How Tan and John Giannandrea for making this data release possible.




Total triples: 63 million
Updated: June 9, 2013
Data Format: CSV
License: CC-BY

2 GB gzip8 GB uncompressed

Download



The data format is essentially CSV with one important caveat. The object field may contain any characters, including commas (as well as any other reasonable delimiters you could think of). However, all the other fields are guaranteed not to contain commas, so the data can still be parsed unambiguously.

The columns in the dataset are defined as:

creation_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
creator
deletion_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
deletor
subject (MID)
predicate (MID)
object (MID/Literal)
language_code



CSV
1352854086000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,1352855856000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,/m/03r90,/type/object/key,/wikipedia/en/$B816,en
1355171076000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364258198000,/user/turtlewax_bot,/m/0nncp9z,/music/recording/artist,/m/01vbfm4,en
1176630380000,/user/mwcl_images,1335928144000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/029w57m,/common/image/size,/m/0kly56,en
1292854917000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364823418001,/user/mbz_pipeline_merge_bot,/m/0fv1vl8,/type/object/type,/common/topic,en
1205530905000,/user/mwcl_images,1336022041000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/01x5scz,/common/licensed_object/license,/m/02x6b,en
1302391361000,/user/content_administrator,1336190973000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/0gkb45y,/type/object/type,/type/content,en
1176728962002,/user/mwcl_images,1335954186000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/08430h,/common/topic/image,/m/02cs147,en
1172002568007,/user/mwcl_chefmoz,1283588560000,/user/delete_bot,/m/01z4c1z,/type/object/name,La Casa Rosa Mexican Restaurant,en


Freebase/Wikidata Mappings


The data has been created based on the Wikidata-Dump of October 28, 2013, and contains only those links that have at least two common Wikipedia-Links and not a single disagreeing Wikipedia-Link. Furthermore, the lines are sorted by the number of common Wikipedia-Links (although in Turtle this does not really matter).

Total triples: 2.1M
Updated: October 28, 2013
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC0

21.2 MB gzip242.9 MB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0695j>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q6718> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.05nrg>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs7>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q538> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0jgd>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q414> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0d_23>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q2537> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.04g7d>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q315> .


License
Freebase Data Dumps are provided free of charge for any purpose with regular updates by Google. They are distributed, like Freebase itself, under the Creative Commons Attribution (aka CC-BY) and use is subject to the Terms of Service.
The Freebase/Wikidata ID mappings are provided under CC0 and can be used without restrictions.
Citing
If you'd like to cite these data dumps in a publication, you may use:

Google, Freebase Data Dumps, https://developers.google.com/freebase/data, <month> <day>, <year>

Or as BibTeX:


BibTex

@misc{freebase:datadumps,
  title = "Freebase Data Dumps"
  author = "Google",
  howpublished = "\url{https://developers.google.com/freebase/data}",
  edition = "<month> <day>, <year>",
  year = "<year>"
}




Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution 3.0 License, and code samples are licensed under the Apache 2.0 License. For details, see our Site Policies. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.

      
      Last updated February 10, 2017.
    




Send feedback about...
          
          This page
        
            
            Documentation feedback
          
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
        
            
            Product feedback
          
        
        Cancel
      
